Contents

Prefaces

Original Preface: London, June 11, 1878
1885 Preface: London, September 23, 1885
1894 Preface: London, May 23, 1894

Introduction

Chapter 1: General
Chapter 2: What Herr Dühring promises

Part I: Philosophy

Chapter 3:  Classification. Apriorism
Chapter 4:  World Schematism

Philosophy of Nature

Chapter 5:  Time and Space
Chapter 6:  Cosmogony, Physics, Chemistry.
Chapter 7:  The Organic World.
Chapter 8:  The Organic World. (Conclusion)

Morality and Law

Chapter 9:  Eternal Truths.
Chapter 10: Equality.
Chapter 11: Freedom and Necessity.

Dialectics

Chapter 12: Quantity and Quality.
Chapter 13: Negation of the Negation.

Chapter 14: Conclusion.

Part II: Political Economy

Chapter 1:  Subject Matter and Method
Chapter 2:  Theory of Force.
Chapter 3:  Theory of Force. (Continuation)
Chapter 4:  Theory of Force. (Conclusion)
Chapter 5:  Theory of Value.
Chapter 6:  Simple and Compound Labour.
Chapter 7:  Capital and Surplus-Value.
Chapter 8:  Capital and Surplus-Value. (Conclusion)
Chapter 9:  Natural Laws of the Economy. Rent of Land.
Chapter 10: From _Kritische Geschichte_.

Part III: Socialism

Chapter 1:  Historical.
Chapter 2:  Theoretical.
Chapter 3:  Production.
Chapter 4:  Distribution.
Chapter 5:  State, Family, Education.

Notes

Notes from Marx-Engels Collected Works
Notes by Engels
Fragment on Ireland
Fragment on Thomas More.



ANTI-DÜHRING


Frederick Engels

Herr Eugen Dühring's Revolution in Science

Written: September 1876 - June 1878;
Published: in _Vorwärts_, Jan 3 1877-July 7 1878;
Published: as a book, Leipzig 1878;
Translated: by Emile Burns from 1894 edition;
Source: Frederick Engels, _Anti-Dühring. Herr Eugen Dühring’s Revolution
in Science_, Progress Publishers, 1947;
Transcribed: meia@marx.org, August 1996;
Proofed and corrected: Mark Harris 2010.
Original HTML:
www.marxists.org/archive/marx/works/1877/anti-duhring/index.htm.

------------------------------------------------------------------------



I — LONDON, JUNE 11 1878


------------------------------------------------------------------------

The following work is by no means the fruit of any "inner urge". On the
contrary.

When three years ago Herr Dühring, as an adept and at the same time a
reformer of socialism, suddenly issued his challenge to his age, friends
in Germany repeatedly urged on me their desire that I should subject
this new socialist theory to a critical examination in the central organ
of the Social Democratic Party, at that time the _Volksstaat._ They
thought this absolutely necessary if the occasion for sectarian
divisions and confusions were not once again to arise within the Party,
which was still so young and had but just achieved definite unity.
^([2]) They were in a better position than I was to judge the situation
in Germany, and I was therefore duty bound to accept their view.
Moreover, it became apparent that the new convert was being welcomed by
a section of the socialist press with a warmth which it is true was only
extended to Herr Dühring's good will, but which at the same time also
indicated that in this section of the Party press there existed the good
will, precisely on account of Herr Dühring's good will, to take also,
without examination, Herr Dühring's doctrine into the bargain. ^([3])
There were, besides, people who were already preparing to spread this
doctrine in a popularised form among the workers. ^([4]) And finally
Herr Dühring and his little sect were using all the arts of
advertisement and intrigue to force the _Volksstaat_ to take a definite
stand in relation to the new doctrine which had come forward with such
mighty pretensions. ^([5])

Nevertheless it was a year before I could make up my mind to neglect
other work and get my teeth into this sour apple. It was the kind of
apple that, once bitten into, had to be completely devoured; and it was
not only very sour, but also very large. The new socialist theory was
presented as the ultimate practical fruit of a new philosophical system.
It was therefore necessary to examine it in the context of this system,
and in doing so to examine the system itself; it was necessary to follow
Herr Dühring into that vast territory in which he dealt with all things
under the sun and with some others as well. That was the origin of a
series of articles which appeared in the Leipzig _Vorwärts_, the
successor of the _Volksstaat_, from the beginning of 1877 onwards and
are here presented as a connected whole.

It was thus the nature of the object itself which forced the criticism
to go into such detail as is entirely out of proportion to the
scientific content of this object, that is to say, of Dühring's
writings. But there are also two other considerations which may excuse
this length of treatment. On the one hand it gave me, in connection with
the very diverse subjects to be touched on here, the opportunity of
setting forth in a positive form my views on controversial issues which
are today of quite general scientific or practical interest. This has
been done in every single chapter, and although this work cannot in any
way aim at presenting another system as an alternative to Herr Dühring's
“system”, yet it is to be hoped that the reader will not fail to observe
the connection inherent in the various views which I have advanced. I
have already had proof enough that in this respect my work has not been
entirely fruitless.

On the other hand, the “system-creating” Herr Dühring is by no means an
isolated phenomenon in contemporary Germany. For some time now in
Germany systems of cosmogony, of philosophy of nature in general, of
politics, of economics, etc., have been springing up by the dozen
overnight, like mushrooms. The most insignificant _doctor philosophiae_
and even a student will not go in for anything less than a complete
“system”. Just as in the modern state it is presumed that every citizen
is competent to pass judgment on all the issues on which he is called to
vote; and just as in economics it is assumed that every consumer is a
connoisseur of all the commodities which he has occasion to buy for his
maintenance — so similar assumptions are now to be made in science.
Freedom of science is taken to mean that people write on every subject
which they have not studied, and put this forward as the only strictly
scientific method. Herr Dühring, however, is one of the most
characteristic types of this bumptious pseudo-science which in Germany
nowadays is forcing its way to the front everywhere and is drowning
everything with its resounding — sublime nonsense. Sublime nonsense in
poetry, in philosophy, in politics, in economics, in historiography,
sublime nonsense in the lecture room and on the platform, sublime
nonsense everywhere; sublime nonsense which lays claim to a superiority
and depth of thought distinguishing it from the simple, commonplace
nonsense of other nations; sublime nonsense, the most characteristic
mass product of Germany's intellectual industry — cheap but bad — just
like other German-made goods, only that unfortunately it was not
exhibited along with them at Philadelphia. ^([6]) Even German socialism
has lately, particularly since Herr Dühring's good example, gone in for
a considerable amount of sublime nonsense, producing various persons who
give themselves airs about “science”, of which they “really never learnt
a word”. ^([7]) This is an infantile disease which marks, and is
inseparable from, the incipient conversion of the German student to
Social Democracy, but which our workers with their remarkably healthy
nature will undoubtedly overcome.

It was not my fault that I had to follow Herr Dühring into realms where
at best I can only claim to be a dilettante. In such cases I have for
the most part limited myself to putting forward the correct, undisputed
facts in opposition to my adversary's false or distorted assertions.
This applies to jurisprudence and in some instances also to natural
science. In other cases it has been a question of general views
connected with the theory of natural science — that is, a field where
even the professional natural scientist is compelled to pass beyond his
own speciality and encroach on neighbouring territory — territory on
which he is therefore, as Herr Virchow has admitted, just as much a
semi-initiate" as any one of us. I hope that in respect of minor
inexactitudes and clumsiness of expression, I shall be granted the same
indulgence as is shown to another in this domain.

Just as I was completing this preface I received a publishers' notice,
composed by Herr Dühring, of a new “authoritative” work of Herr
Dühring's: _Neue Grundgesetze zur rationellen Physik und Chemie._
Conscious as I am of the inadequacy of my knowledge of physics and
chemistry, I nevertheless believe that I know my Herr Dühring, and
therefore, without having seen the work itself, think that I am entitled
to say in advance that the laws of physics and chemistry put forward in
it will be worthy to take their place, by their erroneousness or
platitudinousness, among the laws of economics, world schematism, etc.,
which were discovered earlier by Herr Dühring and are examined in this
book of mine; and also that the rhigometer, or instrument constructed by
Herr Dühring for measuring extremely low temperatures, will serve as a
measure not of temperatures either high or low, but simply and solely of
the ignorant arrogance of Herr Dühring.

_London_,
June 11, 1878

------------------------------------------------------------------------



II — 1885 PREFACE


I had not expected that a new edition of this book would have to be
published. The subject matter of its criticism is now practically
forgotten; the work itself was not only available to many thousands of
readers in the form of a series of articles published in the Leipzig
_Vorwärts_ in 1877 and 1878, but also appeared in its entirety as a
separate book, of which a large edition was printed. How then can anyone
still be interested in what I had to say about Herr Dühring years ago?

I think that I owe this in the first place to the fact that this book,
as in general almost all my works that were still current at the time,
was prohibited within the German Empire immediately after the
Anti-Socialist Law ^([8]) was promulgated. To anyone whose brain has not
been ossified by the hereditary bureaucratic prejudices of the countries
of the Holy Alliance, ^([9]) the effect of this measure must have been
self-evident: a doubled and trebled sale of the prohibited books, and
the exposure of the impotence of the gentlemen in Berlin who issue
prohibitions and are unable to enforce them. Indeed the kindness of the
Imperial Government has brought me more new editions of my minor works
than I could really cope with; I have had no time to make a proper
revision of the text, and in most cases have been obliged simply to
allow it to be reprinted as it stood.

But there was also another factor. The “system” of Herr Dühring which is
criticised in this book ranges over a very wide theoretical domain; and
I was compelled to follow him wherever he went and to oppose my
conceptions to his. As a result, my negative criticism became positive,
the polemic was transformed into a more or less connected exposition of
the dialectical method and of the communist world outlook championed by
Marx and myself — an exposition covering a fairly comprehensive range of
subjects. After its first presentation to the world in Marx’s _Misére de
la philosophie_ and in the _Communist Manifesto_, this mode of outlook
of ours, having passed through an incubation period of fully twenty
years before the publication of _Capital_, has been more and more
rapidly extending its influence among ever widening circles, and now
finds recognition and support far beyond the boundaries of Europe, in
every country which contains on the one hand proletarians and on the
other undaunted scientific theoreticians. It seems therefore that there
is a public whose interest in the subject is great enough for them to
take into the bargain the polemic against the Dühring tenets merely for
the sake of the positive conceptions developed alongside this polemic,
in spite of the fact that the latter has now largely lost its point.

I must note in passing that inasmuch as the mode of outlook expounded in
this book was founded and developed in far greater measure by Marx, and
only to an insignificant degree by myself, it was self-understood
between us that this exposition of mine should not be issued without his
knowledge. I read the whole manuscript to him before it was printed, and
the tenth chapter of the part on economics (“From _Kritische
Geschichte_”) was written by Marx ^([10]) but unfortunately had to be
shortened somewhat by me for purely external reasons. As a matter of
fact, we had always been accustomed to help each other out in special
subjects.

With the exception of one chapter, the present new edition is an
unaltered reprint of the former edition. For one thing, I had no time
for a thoroughgoing revision, although there was much in the
presentation that I should have liked to alter. Besides I am under the
obligation to prepare for the press the manuscripts which Marx has left,
and this is much more important than anything else. Then again, my
conscience rebels against making any alterations. The book is a polemic,
and I think that I owe it to my adversary not to improve anything in my
work when he is unable to improve his. I could only claim the right to
make a rejoinder to Herr Dühring's reply. But I have not read, and will
not read, unless there is some special reason to do so, what Herr
Dühring has written concerning my attack ^([11]); in point of theory I
have :finished with him. Besides, I must observe the rules of decency in
literary warfare all the more strictly in his regard because of the
despicable injustice that has since been done to him by the University
of Berlin. It is true that the University has not gone unpunished. A
university which so abases itself as to deprive Herr Dühring, in
circumstances which are well known, of his academic freedom ^([12]) must
not be surprised to find Herr Schweninger forced on it in circumstances
which are equally well known.

The only chapter in which I have allowed myself some additional
elucidation is the second of Part III, "Theoretical". This chapter deals
simply and solely with the exposition of a pivotal point in the mode of
outlook for which I stand, and my adversary cannot therefore complain if
I attempt to state it in a more popular form and to make it more
coherent. And there was in fact an extraneous reason for doing this. I
had revised three chapters of the book (the first chapter of the
Introduction and the first and second of Part III) for my friend
Lafargue with a view to their translation into French ^([13]) and
publication as a separate pamphlet and after the French edition had
served as the basis for Italian and Polish editions, a German edition
was issued by me under the title: _Die Entwicklung des Sozialismus von
der Utopie zur Wissenschaft._ This ran through three editions within a
few months, and also appeared in Russian ^([14]) and Danish
translations. In all these editions it was only the chapter in question
which had been amplified, and it would have been pedantic, in the new
edition of the original work, to have tied myself down to its original
text instead of the later text which had become known internationally.

Whatever else I should have liked to alter relates in the main to two
points. First, to the history of primitive society, the key to which was
provided by Morgan only in 1877. But as I have since then had the
opportunity, in my work: _Der Ursprung der Familie_, _des
Privateigenthums und des Staats_ (Zurich, 1884) to work up the material
which in the meantime had become available to me, a reference to this
later work meets the case. The second point concerns the section dealing
with theoretical natural science. There is much that is clumsy in my
exposition and much of it could be expressed today in a clearer and more
definite form. I have not allowed myself the right to improve this
section, and for that very reason am under an obligation to criticise
myself here instead.

Marx and I were pretty well the only people to rescue conscious
dialectics from German idealist philosophy and apply it in the
materialist conception of nature and history. But a knowledge of
mathematics and natural science is essential to a conception of nature
which is dialectical and at the same time materialist. Marx was well
versed in mathematics, but we could keep up with natural science only
piecemeal, intermittently and sporadically. For this reason, when I
retired from business and transferred my home to London, ^([15]) thus
enabling myself to give the necessary time to it, I went through as
complete as possible a “moulting”, as Liebig calls it, ^([16]) in
mathematics and the natural sciences, and spent the best part of eight
years on it. I was right in the middle of this “moulting” process when
it happened that I had to occupy myself with Herr Dühring's so-called
natural philosophy. It was therefore only too natural that in dealing
with this subject I was sometimes unable to find the correct technical
expression, and in general moved with considerable clumsiness in the
field of theoretical natural science. On the other hand, my lack of
assurance in this field, which I had not yet overcome, made me cautious,
and I cannot be charged with real blunders in relation to the facts
known at that time or with incorrect presentation of recognised
theories. In this connection there was only one unrecognised genius of a
mathematician a who complained in a letter to Marx ^([17]) that I had
made a wanton attack upon the honour of  [the square root of minus one].

It goes without saying that my recapitulation of mathematics and the
natural sciences was undertaken in order to convince myself also in
detail — of what in general I was not in doubt — that in nature, amid
the welter of innumerable changes, the same dialectical laws of motion
force their way through as those which in history govern the apparent
fortuitousness of events; the same laws which similarly form the thread
running through the history of the development of human thought and
gradually rise to consciousness in thinking man; the laws which Hegel
first developed in all-embracing but mystic form, and which we made it
one of our aims to strip of this mystic form and to bring clearly before
the mind in their complete simplicity and universality. It goes without
saying that the old philosophy of nature — in spite of its real value
and the many fruitful seeds it contained ^(*1) — was unable to satisfy
us. As is more fully brought out in this book, natural philosophy,
particularly in the Hegelian form, erred because it did not concede to
nature any development in time, any “succession”, but only
“co-existence”. This was on the one hand grounded in the Hegelian system
itself, which ascribed historical evolution only to the “spirit”, but on
the other hand was also due to the whole state of the natural sciences
in that period. In this Hegel fell far behind Kant, whose nebular theory
had already indicated the origin of the solar system, and whose
discovery of the retardation of the earth's rotation by the tides also
had proclaimed the doom of that system. And finally, to me there could
be no question of building the laws of dialectics into nature, but of
discovering them in it and evolving them from it.

But to do this systematically and in each separate department, is a
gigantic task. Not only is the domain to be mastered almost boundless;
natural science in this entire domain is itself undergoing such a mighty
process of being revolutionised that even people who can devote the
whole of their spare time to it can hardly keep pace. Since Karl Marx’s
death, however, my time has been requisitioned for more urgent duties,
and I have therefore been compelled to lay aside my work. For the
present I must content myself with the indications given in this book,
and must wait to find some later opportunity to put together and publish
the results which I have arrived at, perhaps in conjunction with the
extremely important mathematical manuscripts left by Marx. ^([18])

Yet the advance of theoretical natural science may possibly make my work
to a great extent or even altogether superfluous. For the revolution
which is being forced on theoretical natural science by the mere need to
set in order the purely empirical discoveries great masses of which have
been piled up, is of such a kind that it must bring the dialectical
character of natural processes more and more to the consciousness even
of those empiricists who are most opposed to it. The old rigid
antagonisms, the sharp, impassable dividing lines are more and more
disappearing. Since even the last “true” gases have been liquefied, and
since it has been proved that a body can be brought into a condition in
which the liquid and the gaseous forms are indistinguishable, the
aggregate states have lost the last relics of their former absolute
character. ^([19]) With the thesis of the kinetic theory of gases, that
in perfect gases at equal temperatures the squares of the speeds with
which the individual gas molecules move are in inverse ratio to their
molecular weights heat also takes its place directly among the forms of
motion which can be immediately measured as such. Whereas only ten years
ago the great basic law of motion, then recently discovered, was as yet
conceived merely as a law of the _conservation_ of energy, as the mere
expression of the indestructibility and uncreatability of motion, that
is, merely in its quantitative aspect, this narrow negative conception
is being more and more supplanted by the positive idea of the
_transformation_ of energy, in which for the first time the qualitative
content of the process comes into its own, and the last vestige of an
extramundane creator is obliterated. That the quantity of motion
(so-called energy) remains unaltered when it is transformed from kinetic
energy (so-called mechanical force) into electricity, heat, potential
energy, etc., and vice versa, no longer needs to be preached as
something new; it serves as the already secured basis for the now much
more pregnant investigation into the very process of transformation, the
great basic process, knowledge of which comprises all knowledge of
nature. And since biology has been pursued in the light of the theory of
evolution, one rigid boundary line of classification after another has
been swept away in the domain of organic nature. The almost
unclassifiable intermediate links are growing daily more numerous,
closer investigation throws organisms out of one class into another, and
distinguishing characteristics which almost became articles of faith are
losing their absolute validity; we now have mammals that lay eggs, and,
if the report is confirmed, also birds that walk on all fours. Years ago
Virchow was compelled, following on the discovery of the cell, to
dissolve the unity of the individual animal being into a federation of
cell-states — thus acting more progressively rather than scientifically
and dialectically ^([20]) — and now the conception of animal (therefore
also human) individuality is becoming far more complex owing to the
discovery of the white blood corpuscles which creep about amoeba-like
within the bodies of the higher animals. It is however precisely the
polar antagonisms put forward as irreconcilable and insoluble, the
forcibly fixed lines of demarcation and class distinctions, which have
given modern theoretical natural science its restricted, metaphysical
character. The recognition that these antagonisms and distinctions,
though to be found in nature, are only of relative validity, and that on
the other hand their imagined rigidity and absolute validity have been
introduced into nature only by our reflective minds — this recognition
is the kernel of the dialectical conception of nature. It is possible to
arrive at this recognition because the accumulating facts of natural
science compel us to do so; but one arrives at it more easily if one
approaches the dialectical character of these facts equipped with an
understanding of the laws of dialectical thought. In any case natural
science has now advanced so far that it can no longer escape dialectical
generalisation. However it will make this process easier for itself if
it does not lose sight of the fact that the results in which its
experiences are summarised are concepts, that the art of working with
concepts is not inborn and also is not given with ordinary everyday
consciousness, but requires real thought, and that this thought
similarly has a long empirical history, not more and not less than
empirical natural science. Only by learning to assimilate the results of
the development of philosophy during the past two and a half thousand
years will it rid itself on the one hand of any natural philosophy
standing apart from it, outside it and above it, and on the other hand
also of its own limited method of thought, which is its inheritance from
English empiricism.

_London_,
September 23, 1885

------------------------------------------------------------------------



III — 1894 PREFACE


The following new edition is a reprint of the former, except for a few
very unimportant stylistic changes. It is only in one chapter — the
tenth of Part II: "From _Kritische Geschichte_" that I have allowed
myself to make substantial additions, on the following grounds.

As already stated in the preface to the second edition, this chapter was
in all essentials the work of Marx. I was forced to make considerable
cuts in Marx's manuscript, which in its first wording had been intended
as an article for a journal; and I had to cut precisely those parts of
it in which the critique of Dühring's propositions was overshadowed by
Marx's own revelations from the history of economics. But this is just
the section of the manuscript which is even today of the greatest and
most permanent interest. I consider myself under an obligation to give
in as full and faithful a form as possible the passages in which Marx
assigns to people like Petty, North, Locke and Hume their appropriate
place in the genesis of classical political economy; and even more his
explanation of Quesnay's economic _Tableau_, which has remained an
insoluble riddle of the sphinx to all modern political economy. On the
other hand, wherever the thread of the argument makes this possible, I
have omitted passages which refer exclusively to Herr Dühring's
writings.

For the rest I may well be perfectly satisfied with the degree to which,
since the previous edition of this book was issued, the views maintained
in it have penetrated into the social consciousness of scientific
circles and of the working class in every civilised country of the
world.

_London_
May 23, 1894

_F. Engels_

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------



INTRODUCTION


General

Modern socialism is, in its essence, the direct product of the
recognition, on the one hand, of the class antagonisms existing in the
society of today between proprietors and non-proprietors, between
capitalists and wage-workers; on the other hand, of the anarchy existing
in production. But, in its theoretical form, modern socialism originally
appears ostensibly as a more logical extension of the principles laid
down by the great French philosophers of the eighteenth century. Like
every new theory, modern socialism had, at first, to connect itself with
the intellectual stock-in-trade ready to its hand, however deeply its
roots lay in economic facts.

The great men, who in France prepared men’s minds for the coming
revolution, were themselves extreme revolutionists. They recognised no
external authority of any kind whatever. Religion, natural science,
society, political institutions — everything was subjected to the most
unsparing criticism; everything must justify its existence before the
judgment-seat of reason or give up existence. Reason became the sole
measure of everything. It was the time when, as Hegel says, the world
stood upon its head; first in the sense that the human head, and the
principles arrived at by its thought, claimed to be the basis of all
human action and association; but by and by, also, in the wider sense
that the reality which was in contradiction to these principles had, in
fact, to be turned upside down. Every form of society and government
then existing, every old traditional notion was flung into the lumber
room as irrational; the world had hitherto allowed itself to be led
solely by prejudices; everything in the past deserved only pity and
contempt. Now, for the first time, appeared the light of day, henceforth
superstition, injustice, privilege, oppression, were to be superseded by
eternal truth, eternal Right, equality based on nature and the
inalienable rights of man.

We know today that this kingdom of reason was nothing more than the
idealised kingdom of the bourgeoisie; that this eternal Right found its
realisation in bourgeois justice; that this equality reduced itself to
bourgeois equality before the law; that bourgeois property was
proclaimed as one of the essential rights of man; and that the
government of reason, the Contrat Social of Rousseau, ^([21]) came into
being, and only could come into being, as a democratic bourgeois
republic. The great thinkers of the eighteenth century could, no more
than their predecessors, go beyond the limits imposed upon them by their
epoch.

But, side by side with the antagonism of the feudal nobility and the
burghers, was the general antagonism of exploiters and exploited, of
rich idlers and poor workers. It was this very circumstance that made it
possible for the representatives of the bourgeoisie to put themselves
forward as representing not one special class, but the whole of
suffering humanity. Still further. From its origin the bourgeoisie was
saddled with its antithesis: capitalists cannot exist without
wage-workers, and, in the same proportion as the mediaeval burgher of
the guild developed into the modern bourgeois, the guild journeyman and
the day-labourer, outside the guilds, developed into the proletarian.
And although, upon the whole, the bourgeoisie, in their struggle with
the nobility, could claim to represent at the same time the interests of
the different working classes of that period, yet in every great
bourgeois movement there were independent outbursts of that class which
was the forerunner, more or less developed, of the modern proletariat.
For example, at the time of the German Reformation and the Peasant War,
Thomas Münzer; in the great English Revolution, the Levellers ^([22]);
in the great French Revolution, Babeuf. There were theoretical
enunciations corresponding with these revolutionary uprisings of a class
not yet developed; in the sixteenth and seventeenth centuries utopian
pictures of ideal social conditions ^([23]); in the eighteenth, actual
communistic theories (Morelly and Mably). The demand for equality was no
longer limited to political rights; it was extended also to the social
conditions of individuals. It was not simply class privileges that were
to be abolished, but class distinctions themselves. A communism,
ascetic, Spartan, was the first form of the new teaching. Then came the
three great utopians: Saint-Simon, to whom the middle-class movement,
side by side with the proletarian, still had a certain significance;
Fourier, and Owen, who in the country where capitalist production was
most developed, and under the influence of the antagonisms begotten of
this, worked out his proposals for the removal of class distinctions
systematically and in direct relation to French materialism.

One thing is common to all three. Not one of them appears as a
representative of the interests of that proletariat which historical
development had, in the meantime, produced. Like the French
philosophers, they do not claim to emancipate a particular class, but
all humanity. Like them, they wish to bring in the kingdom of reason and
eternal justice, but this kingdom, as they see it, is as far as heaven
from earth, from that of the French philosophers.

For the bourgeois world, based upon the principles of these
philosophers, is quite as irrational and unjust, and, therefore, finds
its way to the dust-hole quite as readily as feudalism and all the
earlier stages of society. If pure reason and justice have not,
hitherto, ruled the world, this has been the case only because men have
not rightly understood them. What was wanted was the individual man of
genius, who has now arisen and who understands the truth. That he has
now arisen, that the truth has now been clearly understood, is not an
inevitable event, following of necessity in the chain of historical
development, but a mere happy accident. He might just as well have been
born 500 years earlier, and might then have spared humanity 500 years of
error, strife, and suffering.

This mode of outlook is essentially that of all English and French and
of the first German socialists, including Weitling. Socialism is the
expression of absolute truth, reason and justice and has only to be
discovered to conquer all the world by virtue of its own power. And as
absolute truth is independent of time, space, and of the historical
development of man, it is a mere accident when and where it is
discovered. With all this, absolute truth, reason, and justice are
different with the founder of each different school. And as each one”s
special kind of absolute truth, reason, and justice is again conditioned
by his subjective understanding, his conditions of existence, the
measure of his knowledge and his intellectual training, there is no
other ending possible in this conflict of absolute truths than that they
shall be mutually exclusive one of the other. Hence, from this nothing
could come but a kind of eclectic, average socialism, which, as a matter
of fact, has up to the present time dominated the minds of most of the
socialist workers in France and England. Hence, a mish-mash allowing of
the most manifold shades of opinion; a mish-mash of less striking
critical statements, economic theories pictures of future society by the
founders of different sects, a mish-mash which is the more easily brewed
the more the definite sharp edges of the individual constituents are
rubbed down in the stream of debate, like rounded pebbles in a brook.

To make a science of socialism, it had first to be placed upon a real
basis.

In the meantime, along with and after the French philosophy of the
eighteenth century had arisen the new German philosophy, culminating in
Hegel. Its greatest merit was the taking up again of dialectics as the
highest form of reasoning. The old Greek philosophers were all born
natural dialecticians, and Aristotle, the most encyclopaedic intellect
of them, had already analysed the most essential forms of dialectic
thought. The newer philosophy on the other hand, although in it also
dialectics had brilliant exponents (e.g., Descartes and Spinoza), had,
especially through English influence, become more and more rigidly fixed
in the so-called metaphysical mode of reasoning, by which also the
French of the eighteenth century were almost wholly dominated at all
events in their special philosophical work. Outside philosophy in the
restricted sense, the French nevertheless produced masterpieces of
dialectic. We need only call to mind Diderot’s _Le neveu de Rameau_
^([24]) and Rousseau's _Discours sur l'origine et les fondemens de
l'inégalité parmi les hommes._ We give here, in brief, the essential
character of these two modes of thought. We shall have to return to them
later in greater detail.

When we consider and reflect upon nature at large or the history of
mankind or our own intellectual activity, at first we see the picture of
an endless entanglement of relations and reactions in which nothing
remains what, where and as it was, but everything moves, changes, comes
into being and passes away. This primitive, naive but intrinsically
correct conception of the world is that of ancient Greek philosophy, and
was first clearly formulated by Heraclitus: everything is and is not,
for everything _is fluid_, _is_ constantly changing, constantly coming
into being and passing away.

But this conception, correctly as it expresses the general character of
the picture of appearances as a whole, does not suffice to explain the
details of which this picture is made up, and so long as we do not
understand these, we have not a clear idea of the whole picture. In
order to understand these details we must detach them from their natural
or historical connection and examine each one separately, its nature,
special causes, effects, etc. This is, primarily, the task of natural
science and historical research: branches of science which the Greeks of
classical times on very good grounds, relegated to a subordinate
position, because they had first of all to collect the material. The
beginnings of the exact natural sciences were first worked out by the
Greeks of the Alexandrian period, ^([25]) and later on, in the Middle
Ages, by the Arabs. Real natural science dates from the second half of
the fifteenth century, and thence onward it has advanced with constantly
increasing rapidity. The analysis of nature into its individual parts,
the grouping of the different natural processes and objects in definite
classes, the study of the internal anatomy of organic bodies in their
manifold forms — these were the fundamental conditions of the gigantic
strides in our knowledge of nature that have been made during the last
four hundred years. But this method of work has also left us as legacy
the habit of observing natural objects and processes in isolation, apart
from their connection with the vast whole; of observing them in repose,
not in motion; as constants, not as essentially variables, in their
death, not in their life. And when this way of looking at things was
transferred by Bacon and Locke from natural science to philosophy, it
begot the narrow, metaphysical mode of thought peculiar to the preceding
centuries.

To the metaphysician, things and their mental reflexes, ideas, are
isolated, are to be considered one after the other and apart from each
other, are objects of investigation fixed, rigid, given once for all. He
thinks in absolutely irreconcilable antitheses. “His communication is
‘yea, yea; nay, nay’; for whatsoever is more than these cometh of evil.”
[Matthew 5:37. — _Ed._] For him a thing either exists or does not exist;
a thing cannot at the same time be itself and something else. Positive
and negative absolutely exclude one another, cause and effect stand in a
rigid antithesis one to the other.

At first sight this mode of thinking seems to us very luminous, because
it is that of so-called sound common sense. Only sound common sense,
respectable fellow that he is, in the homely realm of his own four
walls, has very wonderful adventures directly he ventures out into the
wide world of research. And the metaphysical mode of thought,
justifiable and even necessary as it is in a number of domains whose
extent varies according to the nature of the particular object of
investigation, sooner or later reaches a limit, beyond which it becomes
one-sided, restricted, abstract, lost in insoluble contradictions. In
the contemplation of individual things it forgets the connection between
them; in the contemplation of their existence, it forgets the beginning
and end of that existence; of their repose, it forgets their motion. It
cannot see the wood for the trees.

For everyday purposes we know and can say, e.g., whether an animal is
alive or not. But, upon closer inquiry, we find that this is, in many
cases, a very complex question, as the jurists know very well. They have
cudgelled their brains in vain to discover a rational limit beyond which
the killing of the child in its mother's womb is murder. It is just as
impossible to determine absolutely the moment of death, for physiology
proves that death is not an instantaneous momentary phenomenon, but a
very protracted process.

In like manner, every organic being is every moment the same and not the
same, every moment it assimilates matter supplied from without, and gets
rid of other matter; every moment some cells of its body die and others
build themselves anew; in a longer or shorter time the matter of its
body is completely renewed, and is replaced by other atoms of matter, so
that every organic being is always itself, and yet something other than
itself.

Further, we find upon closer investigation that the two poles of an
antithesis positive and negative, e.g., are as inseparable as they are
opposed and that despite all their opposition, they mutually
interpenetrate. And we find, in like manner, that cause and effect are
conceptions which only hold good in their application to individual
cases; but as soon as we consider the individual cases in their general
connection with the universe as a whole, they run into each other, and
they become confounded when we contemplate that universal action and
reaction in which causes and effects are eternally changing places, so
that what is effect here and now will be cause there and then, and vice
versa.

None of these processes and modes of thought enters into the framework
of metaphysical reasoning. Dialectics, on the other hand, comprehends
things and their representations, ideas, in their essential connection,
concatenation, motion, origin, and ending. Such processes as those
mentioned above are, therefore, so many corroborations of its own method
of procedure.

Nature is the proof of dialectics, and it must be said for modern
science that it has furnished this proof with very rich materials
increasing daily, and thus has shown that, in the last resort, nature
works dialectically and not metaphysically. But the naturalists who have
learned to think dialectically are few and far between, and this
conflict of the results of discovery with preconceived modes of thinking
explains the endless confusion now reigning in theoretical natural
science, the despair of teachers as well as learners, of authors and
readers alike.

An exact representation of the universe, of its evolution, of the
development of mankind, and of the reflection of this evolution in the
minds of men, can therefore only be obtained by the methods of
dialectics with its constant regard to the innumerable actions and
reactions of life and death, of progressive or retrogressive changes.
And in this spirit the new German philosophy has worked. Kant began his
career by resolving the stable solar system of Newton and its eternal
duration, after the famous initial impulse had once been given, into the
result of a historic process, the formation of the sun and all the
planets out of a rotating nebulous mass. From this he at the same time
drew the conclusion that, given this origin of the solar system, its
future death followed of necessity. His theory half a century later was
established mathematically by Laplace, and half a century after that the
spectroscope proved the existence in space of such incandescent masses
of gas in various stages of condensation. ^([26])

This new German philosophy culminated in the Hegelian system. In this
system — and herein is its great merit — for the first time the whole
world, natural, historical, intellectual, is represented as a process,
i.e., as in constant motion, change transformation, development; and the
attempt is made to trace out the internal connection that makes a
continuous whole of all this movement and development. From this point
of view the history of mankind no longer appeared as a wild whirl of
senseless deeds of violence, all equally condemnable at the
judgment-seat of mature philosophic reason and which are best forgotten
as quickly as possible, but as the process of evolution of man himself.
It was now the task of the intellect to follow the gradual march of this
process through all its devious ways, and to trace out the inner law
running through all its apparently accidental phenomena.

That Hegel did not solve the problem is here immaterial. His
epoch-making merit was that he propounded the problem. This problem is
one that no single individual will ever be able to solve. Although Hegel
was — with Saint-Simon — the most encyclopaedic mind of his time, yet he
was limited, first, by the necessarily limited extent of his own
knowledge and, second, by the limited extent and depth of the knowledge
and conceptions of his age. To these limits a third must be added. Hegel
was an idealist. To him the thoughts within his brain were not the more
or less abstract pictures of actual things and processes, but,
conversely, things and their evolution were only the realised pictures
of the “Idea”, existing somewhere from eternity before the world was.
This way of thinking turned everything upside down, and completely
reversed the actual connection of things in the world. Correctly and
ingeniously as many individual groups of facts were grasped by Hegel,
yet, for the reasons just given, there is much that is botched,
artificial, laboured, in a word, wrong in point of detail. The Hegelian
system, in itself, was a colossal miscarriage — but it was also the last
of its kind. It was suffering, in fact, from an internal and incurable
contradiction. Upon the one hand, its essential proposition was the
conception that human history is a process of evolution, which, by its
very nature, cannot find its intellectual final term in the discovery of
any so-called absolute truth. But, on the other hand, it laid claim to
being the very essence of this absolute truth. A system of natural and
historical knowledge, embracing everything, and final for all time, is a
contradiction to the fundamental laws of dialectic reasoning. This law,
indeed, by no means excludes, but, on the contrary, includes the idea
that the systematic knowledge of the external universe can make giant
strides from age to age.

The perception of the fundamental contradiction in German idealism led
necessarily back to materialism, but, _nota bene_, not to the simply
metaphysical, exclusively mechanical materialism of the eighteenth
century. In contrast to the naively revolutionary, simple rejection of
all previous history, modern materialism sees in the latter the process
of evolution of humanity, it being its task to discover the laws of
motion thereof. With the French of the eighteenth century, and with
Hegel, the conception obtained of nature as a whole, moving in narrow
circles, and forever immutable, with its eternal celestial bodies, as
Newton, and unalterable organic species, as Linnaeus, taught. Modern
materialism embraces the more recent discoveries of natural science,
according to which nature also has its history in time, the celestial
bodies, like the organic species that, under favourable conditions,
people them, being born and perishing. And even if nature, as a whole,
must still be said to move in recurrent cycles, these cycles assume
infinitely larger dimensions. In both cases modern materialism is
essentially dialectic, and no longer needs any philosophy standing above
the other sciences. As soon as each special science is bound to make
clear its position in the great totality of things and of our knowledge
of things, a special science dealing with this totality is superfluous.
That which still survives, independently, of all earlier philosophy is
the science of thought and its laws — formal logic and dialectics.
Everything else is subsumed in the positive science of nature and
history.

Whilst, however, the revolution in the conception of nature could only
be made in proportion to the corresponding positive materials furnished
by research, already much earlier certain historical facts had occurred
which led to a decisive change in the conception of history. In 1831,
the first working-class rising took place in Lyons; between 1838 and
1842, the first national working-class movement, that of the English
Chartists, reached its height. The class struggle between proletariat
and bourgeoisie came to the front in the history of the most advanced
countries in Europe, in proportion to the development, upon the one
hand, of modern industry [_grosse Industrie_], upon the other, of the
newly-acquired political supremacy of the bourgeoisie. Facts more and
more strenuously gave the lie to the teachings of bourgeois economy as
to the identity of the interests of capital and labour, as to the
universal harmony and universal prosperity that would be the consequence
of unbridled competition. All these things could no longer be ignored,
any more than the French and English socialism, which was their
theoretical, though very imperfect, expression. But the old idealist
conception of history, which was not yet dislodged knew nothing of class
struggles based upon economic interests, knew nothing of economic
interests; production and all economic relations appeared in it only as
incidental, subordinate elements in the “history of civilisation”.

The new facts made imperative a new examination of all past history.
Then it was seen that _all_ past history was the history of class
struggles ^([27]); that these warring classes of society are always the
products of the modes of production and of exchange — in a word, of the
_economic_ conditions of their time; that the economic structure of
society always furnishes the real basis, starting from which we can
alone work out the ultimate explanation of the whole superstructure of
juridical and political institutions as well as of the religious,
philosophical, and other ideas of a given historical period. But now
idealism was driven from its last refuge, the philosophy of history; now
a materialistic treatment of history was propounded, and a method found
of explaining man’s “knowing” by his “being”, instead of, as heretofore,
his “being” by his “knowing”.

But the socialism of earlier days was as incompatible with this
materialistic conception as the conception of nature of the French
materialists was with dialectics and modern natural science. The
socialism of earlier days certainly criticised the existing capitalistic
mode of production and its consequences. But it could not explain them,
and, therefore, could not get the mastery of them. It could only simply
reject them as bad. But for this it was necessary (1) to present the
capitalistic method of production in its historical connection and its
inevitableness during a particular historical period, and therefore,
also, to present its inevitable downfall; and (2) to lay bare its
essential character, which was still a secret, as its critics had
hitherto attacked its evil consequences rather than the process of the
thing itself. This was done by the discovery of _surplus-value._ It was
shown that the appropriation of unpaid labour is the basis of the
capitalist mode of production and of the exploitation of the worker that
occurs under it, that even if the capitalist buys the labour-power of
his labourer at its full value as a commodity on the market, he yet
extracts more value from it than he paid for; and that in the ultimate
analysis this surplus-value forms those sums of value from which are
heaped up the constantly increasing masses of capital in the hands of
the possessing classes. The genesis of capitalist production and the
production of capital were both explained.

These two great discoveries, the materialistic conception of history and
the revelation of the secret of capitalistic production through
surplus-value, we owe to _Marx._ With these discoveries socialism became
a science. The next thing was to work out all its details and relations.

This, approximately, was how things stood in the fields of theoretical
socialism and extinct philosophy, when Herr Eugen Dühring, not without
considerable din, sprang on to the stage and announced that he had
accomplished a complete revolution in philosophy, political economy and
socialism.

Let us see what Herr Dühring promises us and how he fulfills his
promises.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------



II. WHAT HERR DÜHRING PROMISES


The writings of Herr Dühring with which we are here primarily concerned
are his _Kursus der Philosophie_, his _Kursus der National- und
Sozialökonomie_, and his _Kritische Geschichte der Nationalökonomie und
des Sozialismus_. ^([28]) The first-named work is the one which
particularly claims our attention here.

On the very first page Herr Dühring introduces himself as

“the man who _claims to represent_ this power” (philosophy) “in his age
and for its immediately foreseeable development” {D. Ph. 1}.

He thus proclaims himself to be the only true philosopher of today and
of the “foreseeable” future. Whoever departs from him departs from
truth. Many people, even before Herr Dühring, have _thought_ something
of this kind about themselves, but — except for Richard Wagner — he is
probably the first who has calmly blurted it out. And the truth to which
he refers is

“a final and ultimate truth” {2}.

Herr Dühring's philosophy is

“the _natural_ system or the _philosophy of reality_... In it reality is
so conceived as to _exclude any tendency_ to a visionary and
subjectively limited conception of the world” {13}

This philosophy is therefore of such a nature that it lifts Herr Dühring
above the limits he himself can hardly deny of his personal, subjective
limitations. And this is in fact necessary if he is to be in a position
to lay down final and ultimate truths, although so far we do not see how
this miracle should come to pass.

This “natural system of knowledge which in itself is of value to the
mind" {508} has, "without the slightest detraction from the profundity
of thought, _securely established_ the basic forms of being” {556-57}.
From its “really critical standpoint” {404} it provides “the elements of
a philosophy which is real and therefore directed to the reality of
nature and of life, a philosophy which cannot allow the validity of any
merely apparent horizon, but _in its powerfully revolutionising movement
unfolds all earths and heavens of outer and inner nature_” {430}. It is
a “new mode of thought” {543}, and its results are “from the ground up
original conclusions and views ... system-creating ideas {525} ...
established truths” {527}. In it we have before us “a work which must
find its strength in concentrated initiative” {38} — whatever that may
mean; an “investigation _going to the roots_ {200} ... a _deep-rooted_
science {219} ... a _strictly scientific_ conception of things and men
{387} ... an _all-round penetrating_ work of thought {D. C. III} ... a
_creative_ evolving of premises and conclusions controllable by thought
{6} ... the _absolutely fundamental”_ {150}.

In the economic and political sphere he gives us not only

“historical and systematically comprehensive works” {532}, of which the
historical ones are, to boot, notable for “_my_ historical depiction _in
the grand style”_ {D. K. G. 556}, while those dealing with political
economy have brought about “creative turns” {462},

but he even finishes with a fully worked-out socialist plan of his own
for the society of the future, a plan which is the

"practical fruit of a _clear_ theory _going to the ultimate roots of
things"_ {D. C. 555-56}

and, like the Dühring philosophy, is consequently infallible and offers
the only way to salvation; for

_“only in that_ socialist structure which I have sketched _in my Cursus
der National- und Socialökonomie_ can a true Own take the place of
ownership which is merely apparent and transitory or even based on
violence” {D. Ph. 242}. And the future has to follow these directions.

This bouquet of glorifications of Herr Dühring by Herr Dühring could
easily be enlarged tenfold. It may already have created some doubt in
the mind of the reader as to whether it is really a philosopher with
whom he is dealing, or a — but we must beg the reader to reserve
judgment until he has got to know the above-mentioned “deep-rootedness”
at closer quarters. We have given the above anthology only for the
purpose of showing that we have before us not any ordinary philosopher
and socialist, who merely expresses his ideas and leaves it to the
future to judge their worth, but quite an extraordinary creature, who
claims to be not less infallible than the Pope, and whose doctrine is
the only way to salvation and simply must be accepted by anyone who does
not want to fall into the most abominable heresy. What we are here
confronted with is certainly not one of those works in which all
socialist literature, recently also German, has abounded — works in
which people of various calibres, in the most straightforward way in the
world, try to clear up in their minds problems for the solution of which
they may be more or less short of material; works in which, whatever
their scientific and literary shortcomings, the socialist good will is
always deserving of recognition. On the contrary, Herr Dühring offers us
principles which he declares are final and ultimate truths and therefore
any views conflicting with these are false from the outset; he is in
possession not only of the exclusive truth but also of the sole strictly
scientific method of investigation, in contrast with which all others
are unscientific. Either he is right — and in this case we have before
us the greatest genius of all time, the first superhuman, because
infallible, man. Or he is wrong, and in that case, whatever our judgment
may be, benevolent consideration shown for any good intentions he may
possibly have had would nevertheless be the most deadly insult to Herr
Dühring.

When a man is in possession of the final and ultimate truth and of the
only strictly scientific method, it is only natural that he should have
a certain contempt for the rest of erring and unscientific humanity. We
must therefore not be surprised that Herr Dühring should speak of his
predecessors with extreme disdain, and that there are only a few great
men, thus styled by way of exception by himself, who find mercy at the
bar of his "deep-rootedness".

Let us hear first what he has to say about the philosophers:

_“Leibniz_, devoid of any nobler sentiments ... that best of all
court-philosophisers” {D. Ph. 346}.

_Kant_ is still just about tolerated; but after him everything got into
a muddle {197}:

there followed the “wild ravings and equally childish and windy
stupidities of the immediately succeeding epigoni, namely, a _Fichte_
and a _Schelling_ {227} ... monstrous caricatures of ignorant natural
philosophising {56} ... the post-Kantian monstrosities” and “the
delirious fantasies” {449} crowned by “a _Hegel”_ {197}. The last-named
used a “Hegel jargon” {D. K. C. 491} and spread the “Hegel pestilence”
{D. Ph. 486} by means of his “moreover even in form unscientific
demeanour” and his “crudities” {D. K. G. 235}.

The natural scientists fare no better, but as only Darwin is cited by
name we must confine ourselves to him:

“Darwinian semi-poetry and dexterity in metamorphosis, with their
coarsely sentient narrowness of comprehension and blunted power of
differentiation {D. Ph. 142} ... In our view what is specific to
Darwinism, from which of course the Lamarckian formulations must be
excluded, is _a piece of brutality directed against humanity_.” {117}.

But the socialists come off worst of all. With the exception at any rate
of Louis Blanc — the most insignificant of them all — they are all and
sundry sinners and fall short of the reputation which they should have
before (or behind) Herr Dühring. And not only in regard to truth and
scientific method — no, also in regard to their character. Except for
Babeuf and a few Communards of 1871 none of them are "men" {D. K. G.
239}. The three utopians are called “social alchemists” {237}. As to
them, a certain indulgence is shown to Saint-Simon, in so far as he is
merely charged with “exaltation of mind” {252}, and there is a
compassionate suggestion that he suffered from religious mania. With
Fourier, however, Herr Dühring completely loses patience. For Fourier

“revealed every element of insanity ... ideas which one would normally
have most expected to find in madhouses {276} ... the wildest dreams ...
products of delirium...” {283}. “The unspeakably silly Fourier” {222},
this “infantile mind” {284}, this “idiot” {286}, is withal not even a
socialist; his phalanstery ^([29]) is absolutely not a piece of rational
socialism, but “a caricature constructed on the pattern of everyday
commerce” {283}.

And finally:

“Anyone who does not find those effusions” (of Fourier's, concerning
Newton) “... sufficient to convince himself that in Fourier's name and
in the whole of Fourierism it is only the first syllable” (_fou_ —
crazy) “that has any _truth_ in _it_, _should himself be classed under
some category of idiots”_ {286}.

Finally, Robert Owen

“had feeble _and paltry_ ideas {295} ... _his_ reasoning, _so_ crude in
ethics {296} ... a few commonplaces which degenerated into perversions
... nonsensical and crude way of looking at things {297} ... the course
of Owen’s ideas is hardly worth subjecting to more serious criticism
{298} ... his vanity” {299-300} — and so on.

With extreme wit Herr Dühring characterises the utopians by reference to
their names, as follows: Saint-Simon — _saint_ (holy), Fourier — _fou_
(crazy), Enfantin — _enfant_ (childish) {303}; he only needs to add:
Owen — o woe! and a very important period in the history of socialism
has in four words been roundly condemned; and anyone who has any doubts
about it “should himself be classed under some category of idiots”.

As for Dühring's opinion of the later socialists, we shall, for the sake
of brevity, cite him only on Lassalle and Marx:

_Lassalle:_ “Pedantic, hair-splitting efforts to popularise ... rampant
scholasticism ... a monstrous hash of general theories and paltry trash
{509} ... Hegel-superstition, senseless and formless ... a horrifying
example {511} ... peculiarly limited {513} ... pompous display of the
most paltry trifles {514} ... our Jewish hero {515} ... pamphleteer
{519} ... common {520} ... inherent instability in his view of life and
of the world” {529}.

_Marx:_ “Narrowness of conception ... his works and achievements in and
by themselves, that is, regarded from a purely theoretical standpoint,
are without any permanent significance in our domain” (the critical
history of socialism), “and in the general history of intellectual
tendencies they are to be cited at most as symptoms of the influence of
one branch of modern sectarian scholastics {D. K. G. 495} ... impotence
of the faculties of concentration and systematisation ... deformity of
thought and style, undignified affectation of language ... anglicised
vanity ... duping {497} ... barren conceptions which in fact are only
bastards of historical and logical fantasy ... deceptive twisting {498}
... personal vanity {499} ... vile mannerisms ... snotty ... buffoonery
pretending to be witty ... Chinese erudition {506} ... philosophical and
scientific backwardness” {507}.

And so on, and so forth — for this is only a small superficially culled
bouquet out of the Dühring rose garden. It must be understood that, at
the moment, we are not in the least concerned whether these amiable
expressions of abuse — which, if he had any education, should forbid
Herr Dühring from finding _anything_ vile and snotty — are also final
and ultimate truths. And — for the moment — we will guard against
voicing any doubt as to their deep-rootedness, as we might otherwise be
prohibited even from trying to find the category of idiots to which we
belong. We only thought it was our duty to give, on the one hand, an
example of what Herr Dühring calls

“the select language of the considerate and, in the real sense of the
word, moderate mode of expression” {D. Ph. 260},

and on the other hand, to make it clear that to Herr Dühring the
worthlessness of his predecessors is a no less established fact than his
own infallibility. Whereupon we sink to the ground in deepest reverence
before the mightiest genius of all time — if that is how things really
stand.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------



PART I: PHILOSOPHY



III. CLASSIFICATION. APRIORISM


Philosophy, according to Herr Dühring, is the development of the highest
form of consciousness of the world and of life {D. Ph. 2},and in a wider
sense embraces the _principles_ of all knowledge and volition. Wherever
a series of cognitions or stimuli or a group of forms of being come to
be examined by human consciousness, the _principles_ underlying these
manifestations of necessity become an object of philosophy. These
principles are the simple, or until now assumed to be simple,
constituents of manifold knowledge and volition {8}. Like the chemical
composition of bodies, the general constitution of things can be reduced
to basic forms and basic elements. These ultimate constituents or
principles, once they have been discovered, are valid not only for what
is immediately known and accessible, but also for the world which is
unknown and inaccessible to us. Philosophical principles consequently
provide the final supplement required by the sciences in order to become
a uniform system by which nature and human life can be explained {9}.
Apart from the fundamental forms of all existence, philosophy has only
two specific subjects of investigation — nature and the world of man
{14}. Accordingly, our material arranges itself _quite naturally_ into
three groups, namely, the general scheme of the universe, the science of
the principles of nature, and finally the science of mankind. This
succession at the same time contains _an inner logical sequence_, for
the formal principles which are valid for all being take precedence, and
the realms of the objects to which they are _to be applied_ then follow
in the degree of their subordination {15}.

So far Herr Dühring, and almost entirely word for word.

What he is dealing with are therefore _principles_, formal tenets
derived from _thought_ and not from the external world, which are to be
applied to nature and the realm of man, and to which therefore nature
and man have to conform. But whence does thought obtain these
principles? From itself? No, for Herr Dühring himself says: the realm of
pure thought is limited to logical schemata and mathematical forms {42}
(the latter, moreover, as we shall see, is wrong). Logical schemata can
only relate to _forms of thought;_ but what we are dealing with here is
solely forms of _being_, of the external world, and these forms can
never be created and derived by thought out of itself, but only from the
external world. But with this the whole relationship is inverted: the
principles are not the starting-point of the investigation, but its
final result; they are not applied to nature and human history, but
abstracted from them, it is not nature and the realm of man which
conform to these principles, but the principles are only valid in so far
as they are in conformity with nature and history. That is the only
materialist conception of the matter, and Herr Dühring's contrary
conception is idealistic, makes things stand completely on their heads,
and fashions the real world out of ideas, out of schemata, schemes or
categories existing somewhere before the world, from eternity — just
like a _Hegel_.

In fact, let us compare Hegel’s _Encyclopaedia_ ^([30]) and all its
delirious fantasies with Herr Dühring»s final and ultimate truths. With
Herr Dühring we have in the first place general world schematism, which
Hegel calls _Logic._ Then with both of them we have the application of
these schemata or logical categories to nature: the philosophy of
nature; and finally their application to the realm of man, which Hegel
calls the philosophy of mind. The “inner logical sequence” of the
Dühring succession therefore leads us “quite naturally” {D. Ph. 15} back
to Hegel’s _Encyclopaedia_, from which it has been taken with a loyalty
which would move that wandering Jew of the Hegelian school, Professor
Michelet of Berlin, to tears. ^([31])

That is what comes of accepting “consciousness”, “thought”, quite
naturalistically, as something given, something opposed from the outset
to being, to nature. If that were so, it must seem extremely strange
that consciousness and nature, thinking and being, the laws of thought
and the laws of nature, should correspond so closely. But if the further
question is raised what thought and consciousness really are and where
they come from, it becomes apparent that they are products of the human
brain and that man himself is a product of nature, which has developed
in and along with its environment; hence it is self-evident that the
products of the human brain, being in the last analysis also products of
nature, do not contradict the rest of nature's interconnections but are
in correspondence with them. ^([32])

But Herr Dühring cannot permit himself such a simple treatment of the
subject. He thinks not only in the name of humanity — in itself no small
achievement — but in the name of the conscious and reasoning beings on
all celestial bodies. Indeed, it would be

“a degradation of the basic forms of consciousness and knowledge to
attempt to rule out or even to put under suspicion their sovereign
validity and their unconditional claim to truth, by applying the epithet
‘human’ to them” {2}.

Hence, in order that no suspicion may arise that on some celestial body
or other twice two makes five {30-31}, Herr Dühring dare not designate
thought as being human, and so he has to sever it from the only real
foundation on which we find it, namely, man and nature; and with that he
tumbles hopelessly into an ideology ^([33]) which reveals him as the
epigone of the “epigone” Hegel {197}. By the way, we shall often meet
Herr Dühring again on other celestial bodies.

It goes without saying that no materialist doctrine can be founded on
such an ideological basis. Later on we shall see that Herr Dühring is
forced more than once to endow nature surreptitiously with conscious
activity, with what in plain language is called God.

However, our philosopher of reality had also other motives for shifting
the basis of all reality from the real world to the world of thought.
The science of this general world schematism, of these formal principles
of being, is precisely the foundation of Herr Dühring's philosophy. If
we deduce world schematism not from our minds, but only _through_ our
minds from the real world, if we deduce principles of being from what
is, we need no philosophy for this purpose, but positive knowledge of
the world and of what happens in it; and what this yields is also not
philosophy, but positive science. In that case, however, Herr Dühring's
whole volume would be nothing but love's labour lost.

Further: if no philosophy as such is any longer required, then also
there is no more need of any system, not even of any natural system of
philosophy. The perception that all the processes of nature are
systematically connected drives science on to prove this systematic
connection throughout, both in general and in particular. But an
adequate, exhaustive scientific exposition of this interconnection, the
formation of an exact mental image of the world system in which we live,
is impossible for us, and will always remain impossible. If at any time
in the development of mankind such a final, conclusive system of the
interconnections within the world — physical as well as mental and
historical — were brought about, this would mean that human knowledge
had reached its limit, and, from the moment when society had been
brought into accord with that system, further historical development
would be cut short — which would be an absurd idea, sheer nonsense.
Mankind therefore finds itself faced with a contradiction: on the one
hand, it has to gain an exhaustive knowledge of the world system in all
its interrelations; and on the other hand, because of the nature both of
men and of the world system, this task can never be completely
fulfilled. But this contradiction lies not only in the nature of the two
factors — the world, and man — it is also the main lever of all
intellectual advance, and finds its solution continuously, day by day,
in the endless progressive development of humanity, just as for example
mathematical problems find their solution in an infinite series or
continued fractions. Each mental image of the world system is and
remains in actual fact limited, objectively by the historical conditions
and subjectively by the physical and mental constitution of its
originator. But Herr Dühring explains in advance that his mode of
reasoning is such that it excludes any tendency to a subjectively
limited conception of the world. We saw above that he was omnipresent —
on all possible celestial bodies. We now see that he is also omniscient.
He has solved the ultimate problems of science and thus nailed boards
across the future of all science.

As with the basic forms of being, so also with the whole of pure
mathematics: Herr Dühring thinks that he can produce it _a priori_ that
is, without making use of the experience offered us by the external
world, can construct it in his head.

In pure mathematics the mind deals “with its own free creations and
imaginations” {D. Ph. 43}; the concepts of number and figure are “the
adequate object of that pure science which it can create of itself”
{42}, and hence it has a “validity which is independent of _particular_
experience and of the real content of the world” {43}.

That pure mathematics has a validity which is independent of the
_particular_ experience of each individual is, for that matter, correct,
and this is true of all established facts in every science, and indeed
of all facts whatsoever. The magnetic poles, the fact that water is
composed of hydrogen and oxygen, the fact that Hegel is dead and Herr
Dühring alive, hold good independently of my own experience or that of
any other individual, and even independently of Herr Dühring’s
experience, when he begins to sleep the sleep of the just. But it is not
at all true that in pure mathematics the mind deals only with its own
creations and imaginations. The concepts of number and figure have not
been derived from any source other than the world of reality. The ten
fingers on which men learnt to count, that is, to perform the first
arithmetical operation, are anything but a free creation of the mind.
Counting requires not only objects that can be counted, but also the
ability to exclude all properties of the objects considered except their
number — and this ability is the product of a long historical
development based on experience. Like the idea of number, so the idea of
figure is borrowed exclusively from the external world, and does not
arise in the mind out of pure thought. There must have been things which
had shape and whose shapes were compared before anyone could arrive at
the idea of figure. Pure mathematics deals with the space forms and
quantity relations of the real world — that is, with material which is
very real indeed. The fact that this material appears in an extremely
abstract form can only superficially conceal its origin from the
external world. But in order to make it possible to investigate these
forms and relations in their pure state, it is necessary to separate
them entirely from their content, to put the content aside as
irrelevant; thus we get points without dimensions, lines without breadth
and thickness, _a_ and _b_ and _x_ and _y_, constants and variables; and
only at the very end do we reach the free creations and imaginations of
the mind itself, that is to say, imaginary magnitudes. Even the apparent
derivation of mathematical magnitudes from each other does not prove
their _a priori_ origin, but only their rational connection. Before one
came upon the idea of deducing the _form_ of a cylinder from the
rotation of a rectangle about one of its sides, a number of real
rectangles and cylinders, however imperfect in form, must have been
examined. Like all other sciences, mathematics arose out of the _needs_
of men: from the measurement of land and the content of vessels, from
the computation of time and from mechanics. But, as in every department
of thought, at a certain stage of development the laws, which were
abstracted from the real world, become divorced from the real world, and
are set up against it as something independent, as laws coming from
outside, to which the world has to conform. That is how things happened
in society and in the state, and in this way, and not otherwise, _pure_
mathematics was subsequently _applied_ to the world, although it is
borrowed from this same world and represents only one part of its forms
of interconnection — and it is only _just because of this_ that it can
be applied at all.

But just as Herr Dühring imagines that, out of the axioms of
mathematics,

“which also in accordance with pure logic neither require nor are
capable of substantiation” {34},

he can deduce the whole of pure mathematics without any kind of
empirical admixture, and then apply it to the world, so he likewise
imagines that he can, in the first place, produce out of his head the
basic forms of being, the simple elements of all knowledge, the axioms
of philosophy, deduce from these the whole of philosophy or world
schematism, and then, by sovereign decree, impose this constitution of
his on nature and humanity. Unfortunately nature is not at all, and
humanity only to an infinitesimal degree, composed of the Manteuffelite
Prussians of 1850. ^([34])

Mathematical axioms are expressions of the scantiest thought-content,
which mathematics is obliged to borrow from logic. They can be reduced
to two:

1) The whole is greater than its part. This statement is pure tautology,
as the quantitatively conceived idea “part” is from the outset
definitely related to the idea “whole”, and in fact in such a way that
“part” simply means that the quantitative “whole” consists of several
quantitative “parts”. In stating this explicitly, the so-called axiom
does not take us a step further. This tautology can even in a way _be
proved_ by saying: a whole is that which consists of several parts; a
part is that of which several make a whole; hence the part is less than
the whole — in which the inanity of repetition brings out even more
clearly the inanity of content.

2) If two quantities are equal to a third, they are equal to each other.
This statement, as Hegel has already shown, is a conclusion, the
correctness of which is vouched for by logic, and which is therefore
proved, although outside of pure mathematics. The remaining axioms
relating to equality and inequality are merely logical extensions of
this conclusion.

These meagre principles do not cut much ice, either in mathematics or
anywhere else. In order to get any further, we are obliged to bring in
real relations, relations and space forms which are taken from real
bodies. The ideas of lines, planes, angles, polygons, cubes, spheres,
etc., are all taken from reality, and it requires a pretty good portion
of naive ideology to believe the mathematicians that the first line came
into existence through the movement of a point in space, the first plane
through the movement of a line, the first solid through the movement of
a plane, and so on. Even language rebels against such a conception. A
mathematical figure of three dimensions is called a solid body, _corpus
solidum_, hence, in Latin, even a tangible object; it therefore has a
name derived from sturdy reality and by no means from the free
imagination of the mind.

But why all this prolixity? After Herr Dühring, on pages 42 and 43,
^([35]) has enthusiastically sung the independence of pure mathematics
from the world of experience, its apriority, its preoccupation with the
mind’s own free creations and imaginations, he says on page 63:

“It is, of course, easily overlooked that those mathematical elements
(number, magnitude, time, space and geometric motion) are _ideal only in
their form_, _... absolute magnitudes_ are therefore something
completely _empirical_, no matter to what species they belong”, ... but
“mathematical schemata are capable of characterisation which is adequate
even though _divorced_ from experience.”

The last statement is more or less true of _every_ abstraction, but does
not by any means prove that it is not abstracted from reality. In world
schematism pure mathematics arose out of pure thought — in the
philosophy of nature it is something completely empirical, taken from
the external world and then divorced from it. Which are we to believe?

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------



IV. WORLD SCHEMATISM


“All-embracing being is _one._ In its self-sufficiency it has nothing
alongside it or over it. To associate a second being with it would be to
make it something that it is not, namely, a part or constituent of a
more comprehensive whole. Due to the fact that we extend our _unified_
thought like a framework, nothing that should be comprised in this
thought-unity can retain a duality within itself. Nor, again, can
anything escape this thought-unity... The essence of all thought
consists in bringing together the elements of consciousness into a unity
{D. Ph. 16} ... It is the point of unity of the synthesis where the
_indivisible idea of the world_ came into being and the universe, as the
name itself implies, is apprehended as something in which everything is
united into _unity_” {17}.

Thus far Herr Dühring. This is the first application of the mathematical
method:

“Every question is to be decided _axiomatically_ in accordance with
simple basic forms, as if we were dealing with the simple ... principles
of mathematics” {224}.

“All-embracing being is one.” If tautology, the simple repetition in the
predicate of what is already expressed in the subject — if that makes an
axiom, then we have here one of the purest water. Herr Dühring tells us
in the subject that being embraces everything, and in the predicate he
intrepidly declares that in that case there is nothing outside it. What
colossal “system-creating thought” {525}!

This is indeed system-creating! Within the space of the next six lines
Herr Dühring has transformed the _oneness_ of being, by means of our
unified thought, into its _unit._ As the essence of all thought consists
in bringing things together into a unity, so being, as soon as it is
conceived, is conceived as unified, and the idea of the world as
indivisible; and because _conceived_ being, the _idea of the world_, is
unified, therefore real being, the real world, is also an indivisible
unity. And with that

“there is no longer any room for things beyond, once the mind has learnt
to conceive being in its homogeneous universality” {D. Ph. 523}.

That is a campaign which puts Austerlitz and Jena, Königgrätz and Sedan
completely in the shade. ^([36]) In a few sentences, hardly a page after
we have mobilised the first axiom, we have already done away with, cast
overboard, destroyed, everything beyond the world — God and the heavenly
hosts, heaven, hell and purgatory, along with the immortality of the
soul.

How do we get from the oneness of being to its unity? By the very fact
of conceiving it. In so far as we spread our unified thought around
being like a frame, its oneness becomes a unity in thought, a
thought-unity; for the essence of _all_ thought consists in bringing
together the elements of consciousness into a unity.

This last statement is simply untrue. In the first place, thought
consists just as much in the taking apart of objects of consciousness
into their elements as in the putting together of related elements into
a unity. Without analysis, no synthesis. Secondly, without making
blunders thought can bring together into a unity only those elements of
consciousness in which or in whose real prototypes this unity already
_existed before._ If I include a shoe-brush in the unity mammals, this
does not help it to get mammary glands. The unity of being, or rather,
the question whether its conception as a unity is justified, is
therefore precisely what was to be proved; and when Herr Dühring assures
us that he conceives being as a unity and not as twofold, he tells us
nothing more than his own unauthoritative opinion.

If we try to state his process of thought in unalloyed form, we get the
following: I begin with being. I therefore think what being is. The
thought of being is a unified thought. But thinking and being must be in
agreement, they are in conformity with each other, they “coincide”.
Therefore being is a unity also in reality. Therefore there cannot be
anything “beyond”. If Herr Dühring had spoken without disguise in this
way, instead of treating us to the above oracular passages, his ideology
would have been clearly visible. To attempt to prove the reality of any
product of thought by the identity of thinking and being was indeed one
of the most absurd delirious fantasies of — a Hegel.

Even if his whole method of proof had been correct, Herr Dühring would
still not have won an inch of ground from the spiritualists. The latter
would reply briefly: to us, too, the universe is simple; the division
into this world and the world beyond exists only for our specifically
earthly, original-sin standpoint; in and for itself, that is, in God,
all being is a unity. And they would accompany Herr Dühring to his other
beloved celestial bodies and show him one or several on which there had
been no original sin, where therefore no opposition exists between this
world and the beyond, and where the unity of the universe is a dogma of
faith.

The most comical part of the business is that Herr Dühring, in order to
prove the non-existence of God from the idea of being, uses the
ontological proof for the existence of God. This runs: when we think of
God, we conceive him as the sum total of all perfections. But the sum
total of all perfections includes above all existence, since. a
non-existent being is necessarily imperfect. We must therefore include
existence among the perfections of God. Hence God must exist. Herr
Dühring reasons in exactly the same way: when we think of _being_, we
conceive it as _one_ idea. Whatever is comprised in _one_ idea is a
unity. Being would not correspond to the idea of being if it were not a
unity. Consequently it must be a unity. Consequently there is no God,
and so on.

When we speak of _being_, and _purely_ of being, unity can only consist
in that all the objects to which we are referring — _are_, exist. They
are comprised in the unity of this being, and in no other unity, and the
general dictum that they all _are_ not only cannot give them any
additional qualities, whether common or not, but provisionally excludes
all such qualities from consideration. For as soon as we depart even a
millimetre from the simple basic fact that being is common to all these
things, the _differences_ between these things begin to emerge — and
whether these differences consist in the circumstance that some are
white and others black, that some are animate and others inanimate, that
some may be of this world and others of the world beyond, cannot be
decided by us from the fact that mere existence is in equal manner
ascribed to them all.

The unity of the world does not consist in its being, although its being
is a precondition of its unity, as it must certainly first _be_ before
it can be _one._ Being, indeed, is always an open question beyond the
point where our sphere of observation ends. _The real unity of the world
consists in its materiality, and this is proved not by a few juggled
phrases, but by a long and wearisome development of philosophy and
natural science._

To return to the text. The _being_ which Herr Dühring is telling us
about is

“not that pure, self-equal being which lacks all special determinants,
and in fact represents only the counterpart of the idea of _nothing_ or
of the absence of idea” {D. Ph. 22}.

But we shall see very soon that Herr Dühring's universe really starts
with a being which lacks all inner differentiation, all motion and
change, and is therefore in fact only a counterpart of the idea of
nothing, and therefore really nothing. Only out of this _being-nothing_
develops the present differentiated, changing state of the universe,
which represents a development, a _becoming;_ and it is only after we
have grasped this that we are able, even within this perpetual change,
to

“maintain the conception of universal being in a self-equal state” {D.
Ph. 23}.

We have now, therefore, the idea of being on a higher plane, where it
includes within itself both inertness and change, being and becoming.
Having reached this point, we find that

“genus and species, or the general and the particular, are the simplest
means of differentiation, without which the constitution of things
cannot be understood” {24}.

But these are means of differentiation of _qualities;_ and after these
have been dealt with, we proceed:

“in opposition to genus stands the concept of magnitude, as of a
homogeneity in which no further differences of species exist” {26};

and so from _quality_ we pass to _quantity_, and this is always
“_measurable_” {26}.

Let us now compare this “sharp division of the general effect-schemata”
{D.C. 6} and its “really critical standpoint” {D. Ph. 404} with the
crudities, wild ravings and delirious fantasies of a Hegel. We find that
Hegel's logic starts from _being_ — as with Herr Dühring; that being
turns out to be _nothing_, just as with Herr Dühring; that from this
being-nothing there is a transition to _becoming_ the result of which is
determinate being [Dasein], i.e., a higher, fuller form of being [Sein]
— just the same as with Herr Dühring. Determinate being leads on to
_quality_, and quality on to _quantity_ — just the same as with Herr
Dühring. And so that no essential feature may be missing, Herr Dühring
tells us on another occasion:

“From the realm of non-sensation a transition is made to that of
sensation, in spite of all quantitative gradations, only through a
_qualitative leap_, of which we can say that it is infinitely different
from the mere gradation of one and the same property” {142}.

This is precisely the Hegelian nodal dine of measure relations, in
which, at certain definite nodal points, the purely quantitative
increase or decrease gives rise to a _qualitative leap;_ for example, in
the case of heated or cooled water, where boiling-point and
freezing-point are the nodes at which — under normal pressure — the leap
to a new state of aggregation takes place, and where consequently
quantity is transformed into quality.

Our investigation has likewise tried to reach down to the roots, and it
finds the roots of the deep-rooted basic schemata of Herr Dühring to be
— the “delirious fantasies” of a Hegel, the categories of Hegelian
_Logic_, Part I, the Doctrine of Being, in strictly old-Hegelian
“succession” and with hardly any attempt to cloak the plagiarism!

And not content with pilfering from his worst-slandered predecessor the
latter's whole scheme of being, Herr Dühring, after himself giving the
above-quoted example of the leaplike change from quantity into quality,
says of Marx without the slightest perturbation:

“How ridiculous, for example, is the reference” (made by Marx) “to the
Hegelian _confused_, _hazy notion_ that _quantity is transformed into
quality_!” {D. K. G. 498}.

Confused, hazy notion! Who has been transformed here? And who is
ridiculous here, Herr Dühring?

All these pretty little things are therefore not only not “axiomatically
decided”, as prescribed, but are merely imported from outside, that is
to say, from Hegel&rsquo;s _Logic._ And in fact in such a form that in
the whole chapter there is not even the semblance of any internal
coherence unless borrowed from Hegel, and the whole question finally
trickles out in a meaningless subtilising about space and time,
inertness and change.

From being Hegel passes to essence, to dialectics. Here he deals with
the determinations of reflection, their internal _antagonisms_ and
contradictions, as for example, positive and negative; he then comes to
_causality_ or the relation of cause and effect and ends with
_necessity._ Not otherwise Herr Dühring. What Hegel calls the doctrine
of essence Herr Dühring translates into “logical properties of being”
{D. Ph. 29}. These, however, consist above all in the “antagonism of
forces” {31}, in _opposites._ Contradiction, however, Herr Dühring
absolutely denies; we will return to this point later. Then he passes
over to _causality_, and from this to _necessity. So_ that when- Herr
Dühring says of himself:

“We, who do not philosophise out _of a cage_” {41},

he apparently means that he philosophises _in_ a cage, namely, the cage
of the Hegelian schematism of categories.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------



V. PHILOSOPHY OF NATURE. TIME AND SPACE


We now come to _philosophy of nature._ Here again Herr Dühring has every
cause for dissatisfaction with his predecessors.

“Natural philosophy sank so low that it became an arid, spurious
doggerel founded on ignorance”, and “fell to the prostituted
philosophistics of a Schelling and his like, rigging themselves out in
the priesthood of the Absolute and hoodwinking the public”. Fatigue has
saved us from these “deformities”; but up to now it has only given place
to “instability”; “and as far as the public at large is concerned, it is
well known that the disappearance of a great charlatan is often only the
opportunity for a lesser but commercially more experienced successor to
put out again, under another signboard; the products of his
predecessor”. Natural scientists themselves feel little “inclination to
make excursions into the realm of world-encompassing ideas”, and
consequently jump to “wild and hasty conclusions in the theoretical
sphere” {D. Ph. 56-57}.

The need for deliverance is therefore urgent, and by a stroke of good
luck Herr Dühring is at hand.

In order properly to appreciate the revelations which now follow on the
development of the world in time and its limitations in space, we must
turn back again to certain passages in "world schematism" {15}.

Infinity — which Hegel calls _bad_ infinity — is attributed to being
also in accordance with Hegel _(Encyclopaedia_, _§ 93)_, and then this
infinity is investigated.

“The clearest form of an infinity which can be conceived _without
contradiction_ is the unlimited accumulation of numbers in a numerical
series {18} ... As we can add yet another unit to any number, without
ever exhausting the possibility of further numbers, so also to every
state of being a further state succeeds, and infinity consists in the
unlimited begetting of these states. This _exactly conceived_ infinity
has consequently only one single basic form with one single direction.
For although it is immaterial to our thought whether or not it conceives
an opposite direction in the accumulation of states, this retrogressing
infinity is nevertheless only a rashly constructed thought-image.
Indeed, since this infinity would have to be traversed in reality in the
_reverse_ direction, it would in each of its states have an infinite
succession of numbers behind itself. But this would involve the
impermissible contradiction of a counted infinite numerical series, and
so it is contrary to reason to postulate any second direction in
infinity” {19}.

The first conclusion drawn from this conception of infinity is that the
chain of causes and effects in the world must at some time have had a
beginning:

“an infinite number of causes which assumedly already have lined up next
to one another is inconceivable, just because it presupposes that the
uncountable has been counted” {37}.

And thus a _final cause_ is proved.

The second conclusion is

“the law of definite number: the accumulation of identities of any
actual species of independent things is only conceivable as forming a
definite number“. Not only must the number of celestial bodies existing
at any point of time be in itself definite, but so must also the total
number of all, even the tiniest independent particles of matter existing
in the world. This latter requisite is the real reason why no
composition can be conceived without atoms. All actual division has
always a definite limit, and must have it if the contradiction of the
counted uncountable is to be avoided. For the same reason, not only must
the number of the earth's revolutions round the sun up to the present
time be a definite number, even though it cannot be stated, but all
periodical processes of nature must have had some beginning, and all
differentiation, all the multifariousness of nature which appears in
succession must have its roots in one _self-equal state._ This state
may, without involving a contradiction, have existed from eternity; but
even this idea would be excluded if time in itself were composed of real
parts and were not, on the contrary, merely arbitrarily divided up by
our minds owing to the variety of conceivable possibilities. The case is
quite different with the real, and in itself distinguished content of
time; this real filling of time with distinguishable facts and the forms
of being of this sphere belong, precisely because of their
distinguishability, to the realm of the countable {64-65}. If we imagine
a state in which no change occurs and which in its self-equality
provides no differences of succession whatever, the more specialised
idea of time transforms itself into the more general idea of being. What
the accumulation of empty duration would mean is quite unimaginable
{70}.

Thus far Herr Dühring, and he is not a little edified by the
significance of these revelations. At first he hopes that they will “at
least not be regarded as paltry truths” {64}; but later we find:

“Recall to your mind _the extremely simple_ methods by which _we_ helped
forward the concepts of infinity and their critique to a _hitherto
unknown import..._ the elements of the universal conception of space and
time, which have been given such _simple_ form by the sharpening and
deepening now effected” {427-28}.

_We_ helped forward! The deepening and sharpening now effected! Who are
"we", and when is this "now"? Who is deepening and sharpening?

"Thesis: The world has a beginning in time, and with regard to space is
also limited. — Proof: For if it is assumed that the world has no
beginning in time, then an eternity must have elapsed up to every given
point of time, and consequently an infinite series of successive states
of things must have passed away in the world. The infinity of a series,
however, consists precisely in this, that it can never be completed by
means of a successive synthesis. Hence an infinite elapsed series of
worlds is impossible, and consequently a beginning of the world is a
necessary condition of its existence. And this was the first thing to be
proved. — With regard to the second, if the opposite is again assumed,
then the world must be an infinite given total of co-existent things.
Now we cannot conceive the dimensions of a quantum, which is not given
within certain limits of an intuition, in any other way than by means of
the synthesis of its parts, and can conceive the total of such a quantum
only by means of a completed synthesis, or by the repeated addition of a
unit to itself. Accordingly, to conceive the world, which fills all
spaces, as a whole, the successive synthesis of the parts of an infinite
world would have to be looked upon as completed; that is, an infinite
time would have to be regarded as elapsed in the enumeration of all
co-existing things. This is impossible. For this reason an infinite
aggregate of actual things cannot be regarded as a given whole nor,
therefore, as given _at the same time._ Hence it follows that the world
is not infinite, as regards extension in space, but enclosed in limits.
And this was the second thing" (to be proved).

These sentences are copied word for word from a well-known book which
first appeared in 1781 and is called: _Kritik der reinen Vernunft_ by
Immanuel Kant, where all and sundry can read them, in the first part,
Second Division, Book II, Chapter II, Section II: The First Antinomy of
Pure Reason. So that Herr Dühring's fame rests solely on his having
tacked on the _name —_ Law of Definite Number — to an idea expressed by
Kant, and on having made the discovery that there was once a time when
as yet there was no time, though there was a world. As regards all the
rest, that is, anything in Herr Dühring's exegesis which has some
meaning, “We” — is Immanuel Kant, and the “now” is only ninety-five
years ago. Certainly “extremely simple”! Remarkable “hitherto unknown
import”!

Kant, however, does not at all claim that the above propositions are
established by his proof. On the contrary; on the opposite page he
states and proves the reverse: that the world has no beginning in time
and no end in space; and it is precisely in this that he finds the
antinomy, the insoluble contradiction, that the one is just as
demonstrable as the other. People of smaller calibre might perhaps fuel
a little doubt here on account of “a Kant” having found an insoluble
difficulty. But not so our valiant fabricator of “from the ground up
original conclusions and views” {D. Ph. 525}; he indefatigably copies
down as much of Kant’s antinomy as suits his purpose, and throws the
rest aside.

The problem itself has a very simple solution. Eternity in time,
infinity in space, signify from the start, and in the simple meaning of
the words, that there is no end in _any_ direction neither forwards nor
backwards, upwards or downwards, to the right or to the left. This
infinity is something quite different from that of an infinite series,
for the latter always starts from one, with a first term. The
inapplicability of this idea of series to our object becomes clear
directly we apply it to space. The infinite series, transferred to the
sphere of space, is a line drawn from a definite point in a definite
direction to infinity. Is the infinity of space expressed in this even
in the remotest way? On the contrary, the idea of spatial dimensions
involves six lines drawn from this one point in three opposite
directions, and consequently we would have six of these dimensions. Kant
saw this so clearly that he transferred his numerical series only
indirectly, in a roundabout way, to the space relations of the world.
Herr Dühring, on the other hand, compels us to accept six dimensions in
space, and immediately afterwards can find no words to express his
indignation at the mathematical mysticism of Gauss, who would not rest
content with the usual three dimensions of space ^([37]) {See D. Ph.
67-68}.

As applied to time, the line or series of units infinite in both
directions has a certain figurative meaning. But if we think of time as
a series counted from _one_ forward, or as a line starting from a
_definite point_, we imply in advance that time has a beginning: we put
forward as a premise precisely what we are to prove. We give the
infinity of time a one-sided, halved character; but a one-sided, halved
infinity is also a contradiction in itself, the exact opposite of an
“infinity conceived without contradiction”. We can only get past this
contradiction if we assume that the _one_ from which we begin to count
the series, the point from which we proceed to measure the line is any
_one_ in the series, that it is any one of the points in the line, and
that it is a matter of indifference to the line or to the series where
we place this _one_ or this point.

But what of the contradiction of “the counted infinite numerical
series”? We shall be in a position to examine this more closely as soon
as Herr Dühring has performed for us the clever trick of _counting it._
When he has completed the task of counting from (minus infinity) to 0
let him come again. It is certainly obvious that, at whatever point he
begins to count, he will leave behind him an infinite series and, with
it, the task which he is to fulfil. Let him just reverse his own
infinite series 1 + 2 + 3 + 4 ... and try to count from the infinite end
back to 1; it would obviously only be attempted by a man who has not the
faintest understanding of what the problem is. And again: if Herr
Dühring states that the infinite series of elapsed time has been
counted, he is thereby stating that time has a beginning; for otherwise
he would not have been able to start “counting” at all. Once again,
therefore, he puts into the argument, as a premise, the thing that he
has to prove.

The idea of an infinite series which has been counted, in other words,
the world-encompassing Dühringian law of definite number, is therefore a
_contradictio in adjecto_, [“contradiction in definition” — ed.]
contains within itself a contradiction, and in fact an _absurd_
contradiction.

It is clear that an infinity which has an end but no beginning is
neither more nor less infinite than that which has a beginning but no
end. The slightest dialectical insight should have told Herr Dühring
that beginning and end necessarily belong together, like the north pole
and the south pole, and that if the end is left out, the beginning just
becomes the end — the _one_ end which the series has; and vice versa.
The whole deception would be impossible but for the mathematical usage
of working with infinite series. Because in mathematics it is necessary
to start from definite, finite terms in order to reach the indefinite,
the infinite, all mathematical series, positive or negative, must start
from 1, or they cannot be used for calculation. The abstract requirement
of a mathematician is, however, far from being a compulsory law for the
world of reality.

For that matter, Herr Dühring will never succeed in conceiving real
infinity without contradiction. Infinity is a contradiction, and is full
of contradictions. From the outset it is a contradiction that an
infinity is composed of nothing but finites, and yet this is the case.
The limitedness of the material world leads no less to contradictions
than its unlimitedness, and every attempt to get over these
contradictions leads, as we have seen, to new and worse contradictions.
It is just _because_ infinity is a contradiction that it is an infinite
process, unrolling endlessly in time and in space. The removal of the
contradiction would be the end of infinity. Hegel saw this quite
correctly, and for that reason treated with well-merited contempt the
gentlemen who subtilised over this contradiction.

Let us pass on. So time had a beginning. What was there before this
beginning? The universe, which was then in a self-equal, unchanging
state. And as in this state no changes succeed one another, the more
specialised idea of time transforms itself into the more general idea of
_being._ In the first place, we are here not in the least concerned with
what ideas change in Herr Dühring's head. The subject at issue is not
the _idea of time_, but _real_ time, which Herr Dühring cannot rid
himself of so cheaply. In the second place, however much the idea of
time may convert itself into the more general idea of being, this does
not take us one step further. For the basic forms of all being are space
and time, and being out of time is just as gross an absurdity as being
out of space. The Hegelian “being past away non-temporally” and the
neo-Schellingian “unpremeditatable being” are rational ideas compared
with this being out of time. And for this reason Herr Dühring sets to
work very cautiously; actually it is of course time, but of such a kind
as cannot really be called time, time, indeed, in itself does not
consist of real parts, and is only divided up at will by our mind — only
an actual filling of time with distinguishable facts is susceptible of
being counted — what the accumulation of empty duration means is quite
unimaginable. What this accumulation is supposed to mean is here beside
the point; the question is, whether the world, in the state here
assumed, has duration, passes through a duration in time. We have long
known that we can get nothing by measuring such a duration without
content just as we can get nothing by measuring without aim or purpose
in empty space; and Hegel, just because of the weariness of such an
effort, calls such an infinity _bad._ According to Herr Dühring time
exists only through change; change in and through time does not exist.
Just because time is different from change, is independent of it, it is
possible to measure it by change, for measuring always requires
something different from the thing to be measured. And time in which no
recognisable changes occur is very far removed from _not_ being time; it
is rather _pure_ time, unaffected by any foreign admixtures, that is,
real time, time _as such._ In fact, if we want to grasp the idea of time
in all its purity, divorced from all alien and extraneous admixtures, we
are compelled to put aside, as not being relevant here, all the various
events which occur simultaneously or one after another in time, and in
this way to form the idea of a time in which nothing happens. In doing
this, therefore, we have not let the concept of time be submerged in the
general idea of being, but have thereby for the first time arrived at
the pure concept of time.

But all these contradictions and impossibilities are only mere child”s
play compared with the confusion into which Herr Dühring falls with his
self-equal initial state of the world. If the world had ever been in a
state in which no change whatever was taking place, how could it pass
from this state to alteration? The absolutely unchanging, especially
when it has been in this state from eternity, cannot possibly get out of
such a state by itself and pass over into a state of motion and change.
An initial impulse must therefore have come from outside, from outside
the universe, an impulse which set it in motion. But as everyone knows,
the “initial impulse” is only another expression for God. God and the
beyond, which in his world schematism Herr Dühring pretended to have so
beautifully dismantled, are both introduced again by him here, sharpened
and deepened, into natural philosophy.

Further, Herr Dühring says:

“Where magnitude is attributed to a constant element of being, it will
remain unchanged in its determinateness. This holds good ... of matter
and mechanical force” {D. Ph. 26}.

The first sentence, it may be noted in passing, is a precious example of
Herr Dühring's axiomatic-tautological grandiloquence: where magnitude
does not change, it remains the same. Therefore the amount of mechanical
force which exists in the world remains the same for all eternity. We
will overlook the fact that, in so far as this is correct, Descartes
already knew and said it in philosophy nearly three hundred years ago;
that in natural science the theory of the conservation of energy has
held sway for the last twenty years; and that Herr Dühring, in limiting
it to _mechanical_ force, does not in any way improve on it. But where
was the mechanical force at the time of the unchanging state? Herr
Dühring obstinately refuses to give us any answer to this question.

Where, Herr Dühring, was the eternally self-equal mechanical force at
that time, and what did it put in motion? The reply:

“The original state of the universe, or to put it more plainly, of an
unchanging existence of matter which comprised no accumulation of
changes in time, is a question which can be spurned only by a mind that
sees the acme of wisdom in the self-mutilation of its own generative
power.” {78-79}.

Therefore: either you accept without examination my unchanging original
state, or I, Eugen Dühring, the possessor of creative power, will
certify you as intellectual eunuchs. That may, of course, deter a good
many people. But we, who have already seen some examples of Herr
Dühring's generative power, can permit ourselves to leave this genteel
abuse unanswered for the moment, and ask once again: But Herr Dühring,
if you please, what about that mechanical force?

Herr Dühring at once grows embarrassed.

In actual fact, he stammers, “the absolute identity of that initial
extreme state does not in itself provide any principle of transition.
But we must remember that at bottom the position is similar with every
new link, however small, in the chain of existence with which we are
familiar. So that whoever wants to raise difficulties in the fundamental
case now under consideration must take care that he does not allow
himself to pass them by on less obvious occasions. Moreover, there
exists the possibility of interposing successively graduated
intermediate stages, and also a bridge of continuity by which it is
possible to move backwards and reach the extinction of the process of
change. It is true that from a purely conceptual standpoint this
continuity does not help us pass the main difficulty, but to us it is
the basic form of all regularity and of every known form of transition
in general, so that we are entitled to use it also as a medium between
that first equilibrium and the disturbance of it. But if we had
conceived the so to speak” (!) “motionless equilibrium on the model of
the ideas which are accepted without any particular objection” (!) “in
our present-day mechanics, there would be no way of explaining how
matter could have reached the process of change.” Apart from the
mechanics of masses there is, however, we are told, also a
transformation of mass movement into the movement of extremely small
particles, but as to how this takes place — “for this up to the present
we have no general principle at our disposal and consequently we should
not be surprised if these processes take place somewhat in _the dark_”
{79-80, 81}.

That is all Herr Dühring has to say. And in fact, we would have to see
the acme of wisdom not only in the “self-mutilation of our generative
power” {79}, but also in blind, implicit faith, if we allowed ourselves
to be put off with these really pitiable rank subterfuges and
circumlocutions. Herr Dühring admits that absolute identity cannot of
itself effect the transition to change. Nor is there any means whereby
absolute equilibrium can of itself pass into motion. What is there,
then? Three lame, false arguments.

Firstly: it is just as difficult to show the transition from each link,
however small, in the chain of existence with which we are familiar, to
the next one. — Herr Dühring seems to think his readers are infants. The
establishment of individual transitions and connections between the
tiniest links in the chain of existence is precisely the content of
natural science, and when there is a hitch at some point in its work no
one, not even Herr Dühring, thinks of explaining prior motion as having
arisen out of nothing, but always only as a transfer, transformation or
transmission of some previous motion. But here the issue is admittedly
one of accepting motion as having arisen out of immobility, that is,
_out of nothing._

In the second place, we have the “bridge of continuity”. From a purely
conceptual standpoint, this, to be sure, does not help us over the
difficulty, but all the same we are entitled to _use_ it as a medium
between immobility and motion. Unfortunately the continuity of
immobility consists in _not_ moving; how therefore it is to produce
motion remains more mysterious than ever. And however infinitely small
the parts into which Herr Dühring minces his transition from complete
non-motion to universal motion, and however long the duration he assigns
to it, we have not got a ten-thousandth part of a millimetre further.
Without an act of creation we can never get from nothing to something,
even if the something were as small as a mathematical differential. The
bridge of continuity is therefore not even an asses’ bridge ^([37a]); it
is passable only for Herr Dühring.

Thirdly: so long as present-day mechanics holds good — and this science,
according to Herr Dühring, is one of the most essential levers for the
formation of thought — it cannot be explained at all how it is possible
to pass from immobility to motion. But the mechanical theory of heat
shows us that the movement of masses under certain conditions changes
into molecular movement (although here too one motion originates from
another motion, but never from immobility); and this, Herr Dühring shyly
suggests, may possibly furnish a bridge between the strictly static (in
equilibrium) and dynamic (in motion). But these processes take place
“somewhat in the dark”. And it is in the dark that Herr Dühring leaves
us sitting.

This is the point we have reached with all his deepening and sharpening
— that we have perpetually gone deeper into ever sharper nonsense, and
finally land up where of necessity we had to land up — “in the dark”.
But this does not abash Herr Dühring much. Right on the next page he has
the effrontery to declare that he has

“been able to provide a real content for the idea of self-equal
stability directly from the behaviour of matter _and the mechanical
forces_” {D. Ph. 82}.

And this man describes other people as “charlatans”!

Fortunately, in spite of all this helpless wandering and confusion “in
the dark”, we are left with one consolation, and this is certainly
edifying to the soul:

“The mathematics of the inhabitants of other celestial bodies can rest
on no other axioms than our own!” {69}.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------



VI. PHILOSOPHY OF NATURE. COSMOGONY, PHYSICS, CHEMISTRY


Passing on, we come now to the theories concerning the manner in which
the present world came into existence.

A state of universal dispersion of matter, we are told, was the point of
departure of the ionic philosophers, but later, particularly from the
time of Kant, the assumption of a primordial nebula played a new role,
gravitation and the radiation of heat having been instrumental in the
gradual formation of separate solid celestial bodies. The contemporary
mechanical theory of heat makes it possible to deduce the earlier states
of the universe in a far more definite form. However, “the state of
gaseous dispersion can be a starting-point for serious deductions only
when it is possible to characterise beforehand more definitely the
mechanical system existing in it. Otherwise not only does the idea in
fact remain extremely nebulous, but also the original nebula, as the
deductions progress, really becomes ever thicker and more impenetrable;
... meanwhile it all still remains in the vagueness and formlessness of
an idea of diffusion that cannot be more closely determined”, and so
“this gaseous universe” provides us with “only an extremely airy
conception” {D. Ph. 85-87}.

The Kantian theory of the origin of all existing celestial bodies from
rotating nebular masses was the greatest advance made by astronomy since
Copernicus. For the first time the conception that nature had no history
in time began to be shaken. Until then the celestial bodies were
believed to have been always, from the very beginning, in the same
states and always to have followed the same courses; and even though
individual organisms on the various celestial bodies died out,
nevertheless genera and species were held to be immutable. It is true
that nature was obviously in constant motion, but this motion appeared
as an incessant repetition of the same processes. Kant made the first
breach in this conception, which corresponded exactly to the
metaphysical mode of thought, and he did it in such a scientific way
that most of the proofs furnished by him still hold good today. At the
same time, the Kantian theory is still, strictly considered, only a
hypothesis. But the Copernican world system, too, is still no more than
this, ^([38]) and since the spectroscopic proof of the existence of such
red-hot gaseous masses in the starry heavens, proof that brooks no
contradiction, the scientific opposition to Kant ’s theory has been
silenced. Even Herr Dühring cannot complete his construction of the
world without such a nebular stage, but takes his revenge for this by
demanding to be shown the mechanical system existing in this nebular
stage, and because no one can show him this, he applies all kinds of
depreciatory epithets to this nebular stage of the universe.
Contemporary science unfortunately cannot describe this system to Herr
Dühring ’s satisfaction. Just as little is it able to answer many other
questions. To the question: Why do toads have no tails? — up to now it
has only been able to answer: Because they have lost them. But should
anyone get excited over that and say that this is to leave the whole
question in the vagueness and formlessness of an idea of loss which
cannot be determined more closely, and that it is an extremely airy
conception, such an application of morality to natural science does not
take us one step further. Such expressions of dislike and bad temper can
be used always and everywhere, and just for that reason they should
never be used anywhere. After all, who is stopping Herr Dühring from
himself discovering the mechanical system of the primordial nebula?

Fortunately we now learn that

the Kantian nebular mass “is far from coinciding with a completely
identical state of the world medium, or, to put it another way, with the
self-equal state of matter” {D. Ph. 87}.

It was really fortunate for Kant that he was able to content himself
with going back from the existing celestial bodies to the nebular ball,
and did not even dream of the self-equal state of matter! It may be
remarked in passing that when contemporary natural science describes the
Kantian nebular ball as primordial nebula, this, it goes without saying,
is only to be understood in a relative sense. It is primordial nebula,
on the one hand, in that it is the origin of the existing celestial
bodies, and on the other hand because it is the earliest form of matter
which we have up to now been able to work back to. This certainly does
not exclude but rather implies the supposition that before the nebular
stage matter passed through an infinite series of other forms.

Herr Dühring sees his advantage here. Where we, with science, stand
still for the time being at what for the time being is deemed primordial
nebula, his science of sciences helps him much further back to that

“state of the world medium which cannot be understood either as purely
static in the present meaning of the idea, or as dynamic” {87} —

which therefore cannot be understood at all.

“The unity of matter and mechanical force which we call the world medium
is what might be termed a logical-real formula for indicating the
self-equal state of matter as the prerequisite of all innumerable stages
of evolution” {87-88}.

We are clearly not by a long shot rid of the self-equal primordial state
of matter. Here it is spoken of as the unity of matter and mechanical
force, and this as a logical-real formula, etc. Hence, as soon as the
unity of matter and mechanical force comes to an end, motion begins.

The logical-real formula is nothing but a lame attempt to make the
Hegelian categories “in itself ” [An sich] and "for itself" [Für sich]
usable in the philosophy of reality. With Hegel, “in itself ” covers the
original identity of the hidden, undeveloped contradictions within a
thing, a process or an idea, and “for itself ” contains the distinction
and separation of these hidden elements and the starting-point of their
conflict. We are therefore to think of the motionless primordial state
as the unity of matter and mechanical force, and of the transition to
movement as their separation and opposition. What we have gained by this
is not any proof of the reality of that fantastic primordial state, but
only the fact that it is possible to bring this state under the Hegelian
category of “in itself”, and its equally fantastic termination under the
category of “for itself”. Hegel help us!

Matter, Herr Dühring says, is the bearer of all reality; accordingly,
there can be no mechanical force apart from matter. Mechanical force is
furthermore a state of matter {See D. Ph. 73}. In the original state,
when nothing happened, matter and its state, mechanical force, were one.
Afterwards, when something began to happen, this state must apparently
have become different from matter. So we are to let ourselves be
dismissed with these mystical phrases and with the assurance that the
self-equal state was neither static nor dynamic, neither in equilibrium
nor in motion. We still do not know where mechanical force was in that
state, and how we are to get from absolute immobility to motion without
an impulse from outside, that is, without God.

The materialists before Herr Dühring spoke of matter and motion. He
reduces motion to mechanical force as its supposed basic form, and
thereby makes it impossible for himself to understand the real
connection between matter and motion, which moreover was also unclear to
all former materialists. And yet it is simple enough. _Motion is the
mode of existence of matter._ Never anywhere has there been matter
without motion, nor can there be. Motion in cosmic space, mechanical
motion of smaller masses on the various celestial bodies, the vibration
of molecules as heat or as electrical or magnetic currents, chemical
disintegration and combination, organic life — at each given moment each
individual atom of matter in the world is in one or other of these forms
of motion, or in several forms at once. All rest, all equilibrium, is
only relative, only has meaning in relation to one or other definite
form of motion. On the earth, for example, a body may be in mechanical
equilibrium, may be mechanically at rest; but this in no way prevents it
from participating in the motion of the earth and in that of the whole
solar system, just as little as it prevents its most minute physical
particles from carrying out the vibrations determined by its
temperature, or its atoms from passing through a chemical process.
Matter without motion is just as inconceivable as motion without matter.
Motion is therefore as uncreatable and indestructible as matter itself;
as the older philosophy (Descartes) expressed it, the quantity of motion
existing in the world is always the same. Motion therefore cannot be
created; it can only be transferred. When motion is transferred from one
body to another, it may be regarded, in so far as it transfers itself,
is active, as the- cause of motion, in so far as the latter is
transferred, is passive. We call this active motion _force_, and the
passive, the _manifestation of force._ Hence it is as clear as daylight
that a force is as great as its manifestation, because in fact the
_same_ motion takes place in both.

A motionless state of matter is therefore one of the most empty and
nonsensical of ideas — a “delirious fantasy ” of the purest water. In
order to arrive at such an idea it is necessary to conceive the relative
mechanical equilibrium, a state in which a body on the earth may be, as
absolute rest, and then to extend this equilibrium over the whole
universe. This is certainly made easier if universal motion is reduced
to purely mechanical force. And the restriction of motion to purely
mechanical force has the further advantage that a force can be conceived
as at rest, as tied up, and therefore for the moment inoperative. For
if, as is very often the case, the transfer of a motion is a somewhat
complex process containing a number of intermediate links, it is
possible to postpone the actual transmission to any moment desired by
omitting the last link in the chain. This is the case, for instance, if
a man loads a gun and postpones the moment when, by the pulling of the
trigger, the discharge, the transfer of the motion set free by the
combustion of the powder, takes place. It is therefore possible to
imagine that during its motionless, self-equal state, matter was loaded
with force, and this, if anything at all, seems to be what Herr Dühring
understands by the unity of matter and mechanical force. This conception
is nonsensical, because it transfers to the entire universe a state as
absolute, which by its nature is relative and therefore can only affect
_a part_ of matter at any one time. Even if we overlook this point, the
difficulty still remains: first, how did the world come to be loaded,
since nowadays guns do not load themselves; and second, whose finger was
it then that pulled the trigger? We may turn and twist as much as we
like, but under Herr Dühring's guidance we always come back again to —
the finger of God.

From astronomy our philosopher of reality passes on to mechanics and
physics, and voices the lament that the mechanical theory of heat has
not, in the generation since its discovery, been materially advanced
beyond the point to which Robert Mayer had himself developed it, bit by
bit. Apart from this, the whole business is still very obscure;

we must “always remember that in the states of motion of matter, static
relations are also present, and that these latter are not measurable by
the mechanical work ... if previously we described nature as a great
worker, and if we now construe this expression strictly, we must
furthermore add that the self-equal states and static relations do not
represent mechanical work. So once again we miss the bridge from the
static to the dynamic, and if so-called latent heat has up to now
remained a stumbling-block for the theory, we must recognise a defect in
this too, which can least be denied in its cosmic applications” {D. Ph.
90}.

This whole oracular discourse is once again nothing but the outpouring
of a bad conscience, which is very well aware that with its creation of
motion out of absolute immobility it got irretrievably stuck in the mud,
but is nevertheless ashamed to appeal to the only possible saviour,
namely, the creator of heaven and earth. If the bridge from the static
to the dynamic, from equilibrium to motion, cannot be found even in
mechanics, including the mechanics of heat, under what obligations is
Herr Dühring to find the bridge from his motionless state to motion?
That would be a fortunate way for him to get out of his plight.

In ordinary mechanics the bridge from the static to the dynamic is — the
external impulse. If a stone weighing a hundredweight is raised from the
ground ten yards into the air and is freely suspended in such a way that
it remains hanging there in a self-equal state and in a condition of
rest, it would be necessary to have an audience of sucklings to be able
to maintain that the present position of this body does not represent
any mechanical work, or that its distance from its previous position is
not measurable by mechanical work. Any passer-by will easily explain to
Herr Dühring that the stone did not rise of itself to the rope and any
manual of mechanics will tell him that if he lets the stone fall again
it performs in falling just as much mechanical work as was necessary to
raise it the ten yards in the air. Even the simple fact that the stone
is hanging up there represents mechanical work, for if it remains
hanging long enough the rope breaks, as soon as chemical decomposition
makes it no longer strong enough to bear the weight of the stone. But it
is to such simple basic forms, to use Herr Dühring's language, that all
mechanical processes can be reduced, and the engineer is still to be
born who cannot find the bridge from the static to the dynamic, so long
as he has at his disposal a sufficient external impulse.

To be sure, it is a hard nut and a bitter pill for our metaphysician
that motion should find its measure in its opposite, in rest. That is
indeed a crying contradiction, and every _contradiction_, according to
Herr Dühring, is _nonsense_ {D. Ph. 30}. It is none the less a fact that
a suspended stone represents a definite quantity of mechanical motion,
which is measurable exactly by the stone's weight and its distance from
the ground, and may be used in various ways at will, for example, by its
direct fall, by sliding down an inclined plane, or by turning a shaft.
The same is true of a loaded gun. From the dialectical standpoint, the
possibility of expressing motion in its opposite, in rest, presents
absolutely no difficulty. From the dialectical standpoint the whole
antithesis, as we have seen, is only relative; there is no such thing as
absolute rest, unconditional equilibrium. Each separate movement strives
towards equilibrium, and the motion as a whole puts an end again to the
equilibrium. When therefore rest and equilibrium occur they are the
result of limited motion, and it is self-evident that this motion is
measurable by its result, can be expressed in it, and can be restored
out of it again in one form or another. But Herr Dühring cannot allow
himself to be satisfied with such a simple presentation of the matter.
As a good metaphysician he first tears open, between motion and
equilibrium, a yawning gulf which does not exist in reality and is then
surprised that he cannot find any bridge across this self-fabricated
gulf. He might just as well mount his metaphysical Rosinante [Don
Quixote’s horse] and chase the Kantian “thing-in-itself”; for it is that
and nothing else which in the last analysis is hiding behind this
undiscoverable bridge.

But what about the mechanical theory of heat and the tied-up or latent
heat which “has remained a stumbling-block” for this theory?

If, under normal atmospheric pressure, a pound of ice at the temperature
of the freezing point is transformed by heat into a pound of water of
the same temperature, a quantity of heat disappears which would be
sufficient to warm the same pound of water from 0° to 79.4° C, or to
raise the temperature of 79.4 pounds of water by one degree. If this
pound of water is heated to boiling point, that is, to 100° C, and is
then transformed into steam of 100° C, the amount of heat that
disappears, by the time the last of the water has changed into steam, is
almost seven times greater, sufficient to raise the temperature of 537.2
pounds of water by one degree. The heat that disappears is called
_tied-up._ If, by cooling, the steam is again transformed into water,
and the water, in its turn, into ice, the same quantity of heat as was
previously tied up is now again set _free_, i.e., can be felt and
measured as heat. This setting free of heat on the condensation of steam
and the freezing of water is the reason why steam, when cooled to 100°,
is only gradually transformed into water, and why a mass of water of
freezing point temperature is only very gradually transformed into ice.
These are the facts. The question is, what happens to the heat while it
is tied up?

The mechanical theory of heat, according to which heat consists in a
greater or lesser vibration, depending on the temperature and state of
aggregation, of the smallest physically active particles (molecules) of
a body — a vibration which under certain conditions can change into any
other form of motion — explains that the heat that has disappeared has
done work, has been transformed into work. When ice melts, the close and
firm connection between the individual molecules is broken, and
transformed into a loose juxtaposition; when water at boiling point
becomes steam a state is reached in which the individual molecules no
longer have any noticeable influence on one another, and under the
influence of heat even fly apart in all directions. It is clear that the
single molecules of a body are endowed with far greater energy in the
gaseous state than they are in the fluid state, and in the fluid state
again more than in the solid state. The tied-up heat, therefore, has not
disappeared; it has merely been transformed, and has assumed the form of
molecular tension. As soon as the condition under which the separate
molecules are able to maintain their absolute or relative freedom in
regard to one another ceases to exist — that is, as soon as the
temperature falls below the minimum of 100° or 0°, as the case may be,
this tension relaxes, the molecules again press towards each other with
the same force with which they had previously flown apart; and this
force disappears, but only to reappear as heat, and as precisely the
same quantity of heat as had previously been tied up. This explanation
is of course a hypothesis, as is the whole mechanical theory of heat,
inasmuch as no one has up to now ever seen a molecule, not to mention
one in vibration. Just for this reason it is certain to be full of
defects as this still very young theory is as a whole, but it can at
least explain what happens without in any way coming into conflict with
the indestructibility and uncreatability of motion, and it is even able
to account for the whereabouts of heat during its transformations.
Latent, or tied-up, heat is therefore in no way a stumbling-block for
the mechanical theory of heat. On the contrary, this theory provides the
first rational explanation of what takes place, and it involves no
stumbling-block except in so far as physicists continue to describe heat
which has been transformed into another form of molecular energy by
means of the term “tied-up”, which has become obsolete and unsuitable.

The self-equal states and conditions of rest in the solid, in the liquid
and in the gaseous state of aggregation therefore represent, to be sure,
mechanical work, in so far as mechanical work is the measure of heat.
Both the solid crust of the earth and the water of the ocean, in their
present aggregate states, represent a definite quantity of heat set
free, to which of course corresponds an equally definite quantity of
mechanical force. In the transition of the gaseous ball, from which the
earth has developed, into the liquid and subsequently into the largely
solid aggregate state, a definite quantity of molecular energy was
radiated as heat into space. The difficulty about which Herr Dühring
mumbles in his mysterious manner therefore does not exist, and though
even in applying the theory cosmically we may come up against defects
and gaps — which must be attributed to our imperfect means of knowledge
— we nowhere come up against theoretically insuperable obstacles. The
bridge from the static to the dynamic is here, too, the external impulse
— the cooling or heating brought about by other bodies acting on an
object which is in a state of equilibrium. The further we explore this
natural philosophy of Dühring's, the more impossible appear all attempts
to explain motion out of immobility or to find the bridge over which the
purely static, the resting, can by _itself_ pass to the dynamic, to
motion.

With this we have fortunately rid ourselves for a time of the self-equal
primordial state. Herr Dühring passes on to chemistry, and takes the
opportunity to reveal to us three laws of nature's inertness which have
so far been discovered by his philosophy of reality, viz.:

(1) the quantity of all matter in general, (2) that of the simple
(chemical) elements, and (3) that of mechanical force are constant {D.
Ph. 97}

Hence: the uncreatability and indestructibility of matter, and also of
its simple component parts, in so far as it is made up of such, as well
as the uncreatability and indestructibility of motion — these old facts
known the world over and expressed most inadequately — is the only
positive thing which Herr Dühring can provide us with as a result of his
natural philosophy of the inorganic world. We knew all this long ago.
But what we did not know was that they were “laws of inertness” and as
such “schematic properties of the system of things”. We are witnessing a
repetition of what happened above to Kant: Herr Dühring picks up some
old familiar quip, sticks a Dühring label on it, and calls the result:

“from the ground up original conclusions and views ... system-creating
ideas {525} deep-rooted science” {200, 219; D. C. 555-56}.

But the need not by any means despair on this account. Whatever defects
even the most deep-rooted science and the best-ordered society may have,
Herr Dühring can at any rate assert one thing with confidence:

“The amount of gold existing in the universe must at all times have been
the same, and it can have increased or diminished just as little as can
matter in general” {D. Ph. 96}.

Unfortunately Herr Dühring does not tell us what we can buy with this
“existing gold”.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------



VII. PHILOSOPHY OF NATURE. THE ORGANIC WORLD


“A single and uniform ladder of intermediate steps leads from the
mechanics of pressure and impact to the linking together of sensations
and ideas” {D. Ph. 104}.

With this assurance Herr Dühring saves himself the trouble of saying
anything further about the origin of life, although it might reasonably
have been expected that a thinker who had traced the evolution of the
world back to its self-equal state, and is so much at home on other
celestial bodies, would have known exactly what’s what also on this
point. For the rest, however, the assurance he gives us is only half
right unless it is completed by the Hegelian nodal line of measure
relations which has already been mentioned. In spite of all gradualness,
the transition from one form of motion to another always remains a leap,
a decisive change. This is true of the transition from the mechanics of
celestial bodies to that of smaller masses on a particular celestial
body; it is equally true of the transition from the mechanics of masses
to the mechanics of molecules — including the forms of motion
investigated in physics proper: heat, light, electricity, magnetism. In
the same way, the transition from the physics of molecules to the
physics of atoms — chemistry — in turn involves a decided leap; and this
is even more clearly the case in the transition from ordinary chemical
action to the chemism of albumen which we call life. ^([39]) Then within
the sphere of life the leaps become ever more infrequent and
imperceptible. — Once again, therefore, it is Hegel who has to correct
Herr Dühring.

The concept of purpose provides Herr Dühring with a conceptual
transition to the organic world. Once again, this is borrowed from
Hegel, who in his _Logic_ — the Doctrine of the Notion — makes the
transition from chemism to life by means of teleology, or the science of
purpose. Wherever we look in Herr Dühring we run into a Hegelian
“crudity”, which he quite unblushingly dishes out to us as his own
deep-rooted science. It would take us too far afield to investigate here
the extent to which it is legitimate and appropriate to apply the ideas
of means and end to the organic world. In any case, even the application
of the Hegelian “inner purpose” — i.e., a purpose which is not imported
into nature by some third party acting purposively, such as the wisdom
of providence, but lies in the necessity of the thing itself —
constantly leads people who are not well versed in philosophy to
thoughtlessly ascribing to nature conscious and purposive activity. That
same Herr Dühring who is filled with boundless moral indignation at the
slightest "spiritistic" tendency in other people assures us

“with certainty that the instinctive sensations were primarily created
for the sake of the satisfaction involved in their activity” {D. Ph.
158}.

He tells us that poor nature

“is obliged incessantly to maintain order in the world of objects” {159}
and in doing so she has to settle more than one business “which requires
more subtlety on the part of nature than is usually credited to her”
{165}. But nature not only _knows_ why she does one thing or another;
she has not only to perform the duties of a housemaid, she not only
possesses subtlety, in itself a pretty good accomplishment in subjective
conscious thought; she has also a will. For what the instincts do in
addition, incidentally fulfilling real natural functions such as
nutrition propagation, etc., “we should not regard as directly but only
indirectly _willed_” {169}.

So we have arrived at a consciously thinking and acting nature, and are
thus already standing on the “bridge” — not indeed from the static to
the dynamic, but from pantheism to deism. Or is Herr Dühring perhaps
just for once indulging a little in “natural-philosophical semi-poetry”?

Impossible! All that our philosopher of reality can tell us of organic
nature is restricted to the fight against this natural-philosophical
semi-poetry, against “charlatanism with its frivolous superficialities
and pseudo-scientific mystifications”, against the “poetising features”
{109} of _Darwinism_.

The main reproach levelled against Darwin is that he transferred the
Malthusian population theory from political economy to natural science,
that he was held captive by the ideas of an animal breeder, that in his
theory of the struggle for existence he pursued unscientific
semi-poetry, and that the whole of Darwinism, after deducting what had
been borrowed from Lamarck, is a piece of brutality directed against
humanity.

Darwin brought back from his scientific travels the view that plant and
animal species are not constant but subject to variation. In order to
follow up this idea after his return home there was no better field
available than that of the breeding of animals and plants. It is
precisely in this field that England is the classical country; the
achievements of other countries, for example Germany, fall far short of
what England has achieved in this connection. Moreover, most of these
successes have been won during the last hundred years, so that there is
very little difficulty in establishing the facts. Darwin found that this
breeding produced artificially, among animals and plants of the same
species, differences greater than those found in what are generally
recognised as different species. Thus was established on the one hand
the variability of species up to a certain point, and on the other the
possibility of a common ancestry for organisms with different specific
characteristics. Darwin then investigated whether there were not
possibly causes in nature which — without the conscious intention of the
breeder — would nevertheless in the long run produce in living organisms
changes similar to those produced by artificial selection. He discovered
these causes in the disproportion between the immense number of germs
[in the original _Keime_, ‘shoots’,‘embryos’] created by nature and the
insignificant number of organisms which actually attain maturity. But as
each germ strives to develop, there necessarily arises a struggle for
existence which manifests itself not merely as direct bodily combat or
devouring, but also as a struggle for space and light, even in the case
of plants. And it is evident that in this struggle those individuals
which have some individual peculiarity, however insignificant, that
gives them an advantage in the struggle for existence will have the best
prospect of reaching maturity and propagating themselves. These
individual peculiarities have thus the tendency to descend by heredity,
and when they occur among many individuals of the same species, to
become more pronounced through accumulated heredity in the direction
once taken; while those individuals which do not possess these
peculiarities succumb more easily in the struggle for existence and
gradually disappear. In this way a species is altered through natural
selection, through the survival of the fittest.

Against this Darwinian theory Herr Dühring now says that the origin of
the idea of the struggle for existence, as, he claims, Darwin himself
admitted, has to be sought in a generalisation of the views of the
economist and theoretician of population, Malthus, and that the idea
therefore suffers from all the defects inherent in the priestly
Malthusian ideas of over-population {D. Ph. 101}. — Now Darwin would not
dream of saying that the _origin_ of the idea of the struggle for
existence is to be found in Malthus. He only says that his theory of the
struggle for existence is the theory of Malthus applied to the animal
and plant world as a whole. However great the blunder made by Darwin in
accepting the Malthusian theory so naively and uncritically,
nevertheless anyone can see at the first glance that no Malthusian
spectacles are required to perceive the struggle for existence in nature
— the contradiction between the countless host of germs which nature so
lavishly produces and the small number of those which ever reach
maturity, a contradiction which in fact for the most part finds its
solution in a struggle for existence — often of extreme cruelty. And
just as the law of wages has maintained its validity even after the
Malthusian arguments on which Ricardo based it have long been consigned
to oblivion, so likewise the struggle for existence can take place in
nature, even without any Malthusian interpretation. For that matter, the
organisms of nature also have their laws of population, which have been
left practically uninvestigated, although their establishment would be
of decisive importance for the theory of the evolution of species. But
who was it that lent decisive impetus to work in this direction too? No
other than Darwin.

Herr Dühring carefully avoids an examination of this positive side of
the question. Instead, the struggle for existence is arraigned again and
again. It is obvious, according to him, that there can be no talk of a
struggle for existence among unconscious plants and good-natured
plant-eaters:

“in the precise and definite sense the struggle for existence is found
in the realm of brutality to the extent that animals live on prey and
its devourment” {118}.

And after he has reduced the idea of the struggle for existence to these
narrow limits he can give full vent to his indignation at the brutality
of this idea, which he himself has restricted to brutality. But this
moral indignation only rebounds upon Herr Dühring himself, who is indeed
the only author of the struggle for existence in this limited conception
and is therefore solely responsible for it. It is consequently not
Darwin who

“sought the laws and understanding of all nature's actions in the
kingdom of the brutes” {117}, —

Darwin had in fact expressly included the whole of organic nature in the
struggle — but an imaginary bugbear dressed up by Herr Dühring himself.
The _name:_ the struggle for existence, can for that matter be willingly
sacrificed to Herr Dühring's highly moral indignation. That the _fact_
exists also among plants can be demonstrated to him by every meadow,
every cornfield, every wood; and the question at issue is not what it is
to be called, whether “struggle for existence” or “lack of conditions of
life and mechanical effects” {118}, but how this fact influences the
preservation or variation of species. On this point Herr Dühring
maintains an obstinate and self-equal silence. Therefore for the time
being everything may remain as it was in natural selection.

But Darwinism “produces its transformations and differences out of
nothing” {114}.

It is true that Darwin, when considering natural selection, leaves out
of account the _causes_ which have produced the alterations in separate
individuals, and deals in the first place with the way in which such
individual deviations gradually become the characteristics of a race,
variety or species. To Darwin it was of less immediate importance to
discover these causes — which up to the present are in part absolutely
unknown, and in part can only be stated in quite general terms — than to
find a rational form in which their effects become fixed, acquire
permanent significance. It is true that in doing this Darwin attributed
to his discovery too wide a field of action, made it the sole agent in
the alteration of species and neglected the causes of the repeated
individual variations, concentrating rather on the form in which these
variations become general; but this is a mistake which he shares with
most other people who make any real advance. Moreover, if Darwin
produces his individual transformations out of nothing, and in so doing
applies exclusively “the wisdom of the breeder” {125}, the breeder, too,
must produce _out of nothing_ his transformations in animal and plant
forms which are not merely imaginary but real. But once again, the man
who gave the impetus to investigate how exactly these transformations
and differences arise is no other than Darwin.

In recent times the idea of natural selection was extended, particularly
by Haeckel, and the variation of species conceived as a result of the
mutual interaction of adaptation and heredity, in which process
adaptation is taken as the factor which produces variations, and
heredity as the preserving factor. This is also not regarded as
satisfactory by Herr Dühring.

“Real adaptation to conditions of life which are offered or withheld by
nature presupposes impulses and actions determined by ideas. Otherwise
the adaptation is only apparent, and the causality operative thereupon
does not rise above the low grades of the physical, chemical and
plant-physiological” {D. Ph. 115}.

Once again it is the name which makes Herr Dühring angry. But whatever
name he may give to the process, the question here is whether variations
in the species of organisms are produced through such processes or not.
And again Herr Dühring gives no answer.

“If, in growing, a plant takes the path along which it will receive most
light, this effect of the stimulus is nothing but a combination of
physical forces and chemical agents, and any attempt to describe it as
adaptation — not metaphorically, but in the strict sense of the word —
must introduce a _spiritistic_ confusion into the concepts” {115}.

Such is the severity meted out to others by the very man who knows
exactly by whose _will_ nature does one thing or another, who speaks of
nature's _subtlety_ and even of her _will!_ Spiritistic confusion, yes —
but where, in Haeckel or in Herr Dühring?

And not only spiritistic, but also logical confusion. We saw that Herr
Dühring insists with might and main on establishing the validity in
nature of the concept of purpose:

“The relation between means and end does not in the least presuppose a
conscious intention” {102}.

What, then, is adaptation without conscious intention, without the
mediation of ideas, which he so zealously opposes, if not such
unconscious purposive activity?

If therefore tree-frogs and leaf-eating insects are green, desert
animals sandy-yellow, and animals of the polar regions mainly snow-white
in colour, they have certainly not adopted these colours on purpose or
in conformity with any ideas; on the contrary, the colours can only be
explained on the basis of physical forces and chemical agents. And yet
it cannot be denied that these animals, because of those colours, are
purposively _adapted_ to the environment in which they live, in that
they have become far less visible to their enemies. In just the same way
the organs with which certain plants seize and devour insects alighting
on them are adapted to this action, and even purposively adapted.
Consequently, if Herr Dühring insists that this adaptation must be
effected through ideas, he as much as says, only in other words, that
purposive activity must also be brought about through ideas, must be
conscious and intentional. And this brings us, as is usually the case in
his philosophy of reality, to a purposive creator, to God.

“An explanation of this kind used to be called deism, and was not
thought much of” — Herr Dühring tells us — “but on this matter, too,
views now seem to have been reversed” {111}.

From adaptation we now pass on to heredity. Here likewise, according to
Herr Dühring, Darwinism is completely on the wrong track. The whole
organic world, Darwin is said to have asserted, descended from one
primordial being, is so to speak the progeny of one single being.
Dühring states that, in Darwin's view, there is no such thing as the
independent parallel lines of homogeneous products of nature unless
mediated by common descent; and that therefore Darwin and his
retrospectively directed views had perforce to come to an end at the
point where the thread of begetting, or other form of propagation,
breaks off {111}.

The assertion that Darwin traced all existing organisms back to _one_
primordial being is, to put it politely, a product of Herr Dühring's
“own free creation and imagination” {43}. Darwin expressly says on the
last page but one of his _Origin of species_, sixth edition, that he
regards

“all beings not as special creations, but as the lineal descendants _of
some few beings_”.

And Haeckel even goes considerably further, assuming

“a quite independent stock for the vegetable kingdom, and a second for
the animal kingdom”, and between the two “a number of independent stocks
of Protista, each of which, quite independently of the former, has
developed out of one special archegone of the moneron type” ^([40])
(_Schöpfungsgeschichte_, p. 397)

This primordial being was only invented by Dühring in order to bring it
into as great disrepute as possible by drawing a parallel with the
primordial Jew {D. Ph. 110} Adam, and in this he — that is to say, Herr
Dühring — suffers the misfortune of not having the faintest idea that
this primordial Jew had been shown by Smith's Assyrian discoveries
^([41]) to have been a primordial Semite, and that the whole biblical
history of creation and the flood turns out to be a part of the old
heathen religious myths which the Jew have in common with the
Babylonians, Chaldeans and Assyrians.

It is certainly a bitter reproach against Darwin, and one for which he
has no defence, that he comes to an end at once at the point where the
thread of descent breaks off. Unfortunately it is a reproach which has
been earned by the whole of our natural science. Where the thread of
descent breaks off for it, it “ends”. It has not yet succeeded in
producing organic beings without descent from others; indeed, it has not
yet succeeded even in producing simple protoplasm or other albuminous
bodies out of chemical elements. With regard to the origin of life,
therefore, up to the present, natural science is only able to say with
certainty that it must have been the result of chemical action. However,
perhaps the philosophy of reality is in a position to give some help on
this point as it has at its disposal independent parallel lines of
products of nature not mediated by common descent. How can these have
come into existence? By spontaneous generation? But up to now even the
most audacious advocates of spontaneous generation have not claimed that
this produced anything but bacteria, embryonic fungi and other very
primitive organisms — no insects, fishes, birds or mammals. But if these
homogeneous products of nature — organic, of course, as here we are only
dealing with these — are not connected by descent, they or each of their
ancestors must, at the point “where the thread of descent breaks off”,
have been put into the world by a separate act of creation. So we arrive
once again at a creator and at what is called deism.

Herr Dühring further declares that it was very superficial on Darwin's
part

“to make the mere act of the sexual composition of properties the
fundamental principle of the origin of these properties” {116}.

This is another free creation and imagination of our deep-rooted
philosopher. Darwin definitely states the opposite: the expression
natural selection only implies the _preservation_ of variations, not
their origin (p. 63). This new imputation to Darwin of things he never
said nevertheless helps us to grasp the following depth of Dühringian
mentality:

“If some principle of independent variation had been found in the inner
schematism of generation, this idea would have been quite rational; for
it is a natural idea to combine the principle of universal genesis with
that of sexual propagation into a unity, and to regard so-called
spontaneous generation, from a higher standpoint, not as the absolute
antithesis of reproduction but just as a production” {116}.

And the man who can write such rubbish is not ashamed to reproach Hegel
for his “jargon” {D. K. G. 491}!

But enough of the peevish, contradictory grumbling and nagging through
which Herr Dühring gives vent to his anger at the colossal impetus which
natural science owes to the driving force of the Darwinian theory.
Neither Darwin nor his followers among naturalists ever think of
belittling in any way the great services rendered by Lamarck; in fact,
they are the very people who first put him up again on his pedestal. But
we must not overlook the fact that in Lamarck’s time science was as yet
far from being in possession of sufficient material to have enabled it
to answer the question of the origin of species except in an
anticipatory way, prophetically, as it were. In addition to the enormous
mass of material, both of descriptive and anatomical botany and zoology,
which has accumulated in the intervening period, two completely new
sciences have arisen since Lamarck’s time, and these are of decisive
importance on this question: research into the development of plant and
animal germs (embryology) and research into the organic remains
preserved in the various strata of the earth’s surface (palaeontology).
There is in fact a peculiar correspondence between the gradual
development of organic germs into mature organisms and the succession of
plants and animals following each other in the history of the earth. And
it is precisely this correspondence which has given the theory of
evolution its most secure basis. The theory of evolution itself is
however still in a very early stage, and it therefore cannot be doubted
that further research will greatly modify our present conceptions,
including strictly Darwinian ones, of the process of the evolution of
species.

What, of a positive character, has the philosophy of reality to tell us
concerning the evolution of organic life?

“The ... variability of species is a presupposition which can be
accepted” {D. Ph. 115}. But alongside it there hold also “the
independent parallel lines of homogeneous products of nature, not
mediated by common descent” {111}.

From this we are apparently to infer that the heterogeneous products of
nature, i.e., the species which show variations, descend from each other
but not so the homogeneous products. But this is not altogether correct
either; for even with species which show variations,

“mediation by common descent is on the contrary quite a secondary act of
nature” {114}.

So we get common descent after all, but only “second class”. We must
rejoice that after Herr Dühring has attributed so much to it that is
evil and obscure, we nevertheless find it in the end readmitted by the
backdoor. It is the same with natural selection, for after all his moral
indignation over the struggle for existence through which natural
selection operates we suddenly read:

“The deeper basis of the constitution of organisms is thus to be sought
in the conditions of life and cosmic relations, while the natural
selection emphasised by Darwin can only come in as a secondary factor”
{115}.

So we get natural selection after all, though only second class; and
along with natural selection also the struggle for existence, and with
that also the priestly Malthusian overpopulation! That is all, and for
the rest Herr Dühring refers us to Lamarck.

In conclusion he warns us against the misuse of the terms: metamorphosis
and development. Metamorphosis, he maintains, is an unclear concept
{112}, and the concept of development is permissible only in so far as
laws of development can be really established {126}. In place of both
these terms we should use the term “composition” {114}, and then
everything would be all right. It is the same old story over again:
things remain as they were, and Herr Dühring is quite satisfied as soon
as we just alter the names. When we speak of the development of the
chicken in the egg we are creating confusion, for we are able to prove
the laws of; development only in an incomplete way. But if we speak of
its’ “composition” everything becomes clear. We shall therefore no
longer say: This child is developing finely but: It is composing itself
magnificently. We can congratulate Herr Dühring on being a worthy peer
of the author of the _Nibelungenring_ not only in his noble self-esteem
but also in his capacity of composer of the future. ^([42])

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Anti-Dühring by Frederick Engels 1877
Part I: Philosophy

VIII. Philosophy of Nature. The Organic World, Conclusion

“Ponder ... what positive knowledge is required to equip our section on
natural philosophy with all its scientific premises. Its basis is
provided firstly by all the fundamental achievements of mathematics, and
then the principal propositions established by exact science in
mechanics, physics and chemistry, as well as the general conclusions of
natural science in physiology, zoology and similar branches of inquiry“
{D. Ph. 517}.

Such is the confidence and assurance with which Herr Dühring speaks of
the mathematical and naturalistic erudition of Herr Dühring. It is
impossible to detect from the meagre section concerned, and still less
from its even more paltry conclusions, what deep-rooted positive
knowledge lies behind them. In any case, in order to create the Dühring
oracle on physics and chemistry, it is not necessary to know any more of
physics than the equation which expresses the mechanical equivalent of
heat, or any more of chemistry than that all bodies can be divided into
elements and combinations of elements. Moreover, a person who can talk
of “gravitating atoms” {81}, as Herr Dühring does (p. 131) {D. Ph.},
only proves that he is completely “in the dark” as to the difference
between atoms and molecules. As is well known, it is only chemical
action, and not gravitation or other mechanical or physical forms of
motion, that is explained by atoms. And if anyone should read as far as
the chapter on organic nature, with its vacuous, self-contradictory and,
at the decisive point, oracularly senseless meandering verbiage, and its
absolutely futile final conclusion, he will not be able to avoid forming
the opinion, from the very start, that Herr Dühring is here speaking of
things of which he knows remarkably little. This opinion becomes
absolute certainty when the reader reaches his suggestion that in the
science of organic beings (biology) the term composition should be used
instead of development {114}. The person who can put forward such a
suggestion shows that he has not the faintest suspicion of the formation
of organic bodies.

All organic bodies, except the very lowest, consist of cells, small
granules of albumen which are only visible when considerably magnified,
with a nucleus inside. As a rule the cells also develop an outer
membrane and the contents are then more or less fluid. The lowest
cellular bodies consist of a single cell; the immense majority of
organic beings are multi-cellular, congruous complexes of many cells
which in lower organisms remain of a homogeneous type, but in higher
organisms develop more and more varied forms, groupings and functions.
In the human body, for example, bones, muscles, nerves, tendons,
ligaments, cartilages, skin, in a word, all tissues are either composed
of cells or originated from them. But in all organic cellular structure,
from the amoeba, which is a simple and most of the time skinless
albuminous particle with a nucleus inside, up to man, and from the
tiniest unicellular desmids up to the most highly developed plant, the
manner in which the cells multiply is the same: by fission. The cell
nucleus first becomes constricted in the middle, the constriction
separating the two halves of the nucleus gets more and more pronounced,
and at last they separate from each other and form two cell nuclei. The
same process takes place in the cell itself; each of the two nuclei
becomes the centre of an accumulation of cellular substance, linked to
the other by a strip which is steadily growing narrower, until at last
the two separate from each other and continue to exist as independent
cells. Through such repeated cell fission the whole animal is gradually
developed in full out of the embryonal vesicle of the animal egg, after
it has been fertilised, and the replacement of used-up tissues is
effected in the same way in the adult animal. To call such a process
composition, and to say that to describe it as development is “pure
imagination” {D. Ph. 126}, certainly indicates a person who — however
difficult this may be to believe at the present day — knows absolutely
nothing of this process; here it is precisely and _exclusively_
development that is going on, and indeed development in the most literal
sense, and composition has absolutely nothing to do with it!

Later on we shall have something more to say about what Herr Dühring
understands in general by life. In particular his conception of life is
as follows:

“The inorganic world too is a system of self-executing impulses; but it
is only at the point where there begins real differentiation, with the
circulation of substances through special channels from one internal
point and according to a germ-scheme transmissible to a smaller
structure,that we may venture to speak of real life in the narrower and
stricter sense” {141}.

This sentence is, in the narrower and stricter sense, a system of
self-executing impulses (whatever they may be) of nonsense, even apart
from its hopelessly confused grammar. If life first begins where real
differentiation commences, we must declare that the whole Haeckelian
kingdom of Protista and perhaps much else are dead, depending on the
meaning we attach to the idea of differentiation. If life first begins
when this differentiation can be transmitted through a smaller
germ-scheme, then at least all organisms up to and including unicellular
ones cannot be regarded as living. If the circulation of substances
through special channels is the hallmark of life, then, in addition to
the foregoing, we must also strike from the ranks of the living the
whole of the higher class of the Coelenterata (excepting however the
Medusae), that is, all polyps and other zoophytes. ^([43]) If the
circulation of substances through special channels from one internal
point is the essential hallmark of life, then we must declare that all
those animals which have no heart and those which have more than one
heart are dead. Under this heading would fall, in addition to those
already enumerated, all worms, starfish and rotifers (Annuloida and
Annulosa, Huxley's classification ^([44])), a section of the Crustacea
(lobsters), and finally even a vertebrate animal, the lancelet (the
Amphioxus). And moreover all plants.

In undertaking, therefore, to define real life in the narrower and
stricter sense, Herr Dühring gives us four characteristics of life which
totally contradict one another, one of which condemns to eternal death
not only the whole vegetable kingdom but also about half the animal
kingdom. Really no one can say that he misled us when he promised us
“from the ground up original conclusions and views” {525}!

Another passage runs:

“In nature, too, one simple type is the basis of all organisms, from the
lowest to the highest”, and this type is “fully and completely present
in its general essence even in the most subordinate impulse of the most
undeveloped plant” {305}.

This statement is again “full and complete” nonsense. The most simple
type found in the whole of organic nature is the cell, and it certainly
is the basis of the higher organisms. On the other hand, among the
lowest organisms there are many which are far below the cell — the
protamoeba, a simple albuminous particle without any differentiation
whatever, and a whole series of other monera and all bladder seaweeds
(Siphoneae). All of these are linked with the higher organisms only by
the fact that their essential component is albumen and that they
consequently perform functions of albumen, i.e., live and die.

Herr Dühring further tells us:

“Physiologically, sensation is bound up with the presence of some kind
of nerve apparatus, however simple. It is therefore characteristic of
all animal structures that they are capable of sensation, i.e., of a
subjectively conscious awareness of their states. The sharp boundary
line between plant and animal lies at the point where the leap to
sensation takes place. Far from being obliterated by the known
transitional structures, that line becomes a logical necessity precisely
through these externally undecided or undecidable forms” {D. Ph.
141-42}.

And again:

“On the other hand, plants are completely and for all time devoid of the
slightest trace of sensation, and even lack any capacity for it” {140}.

In the first place, Hegel says _(Naturphilosophie_, _§_ 351, Addendum)
that

“sensation is the _differentia specifica_ [“specific difference”], the
absolute distinguishing characteristic of the animal”.

So once again we find a Hegelian “crudity” {D. K. G. 235}, which through
the simple process of appropriation by Herr Dühring is raised to the
honourable position of a final and ultimate truth.

In the second place, we hear for the first time here of transitional
structures, externally undecided or undecidable forms (fine gibberish!)
between plant and animal. That these intermediate forms exist; that
there are organisms of which we cannot say flatly whether they are
plants or animals; that therefore we are wholly unable to draw a sharp
dividing line between plant and animal — precisely this fact makes it a
logical necessity for Herr Dühring to establish a criterion of
differentiation which in the same breath he admits will not hold water!
But we have absolutely no need to go back to the doubtful territory
between plants and animals; are the sensitive plants which at the
slightest touch fold their leaves or close their flowers, are the
insect-eating plants devoid of the slightest trace of sensation and do
they even lack any capacity for it? This cannot be maintained even by
Herr Dühring without “unscientific semi-poetry” {D. Ph. 56, 142}.

In the third place, it is once again a free creation and imagination on
Herr Dühring's part when he asserts that sensation is physiologically
bound up with the presence of some kind of nerve apparatus, however
simple. Not only all primitive animals, but also the zoophytes, or at
any rate the great majority of them, show no trace of a nerve apparatus.
It is only from the worms on that such an apparatus is regularly found,
and Herr Dühring is the first person to make the assertion that those
animals have no sensation because they have no nerves. Sensation is not
necessarily associated with nerves, but undoubtedly with certain
albuminous bodies which up to now have not been more precisely
determined.

At any rate, Herr Dühring's biological knowledge is sufficiently
characterised by the question which he does not hesitate to put to
Darwin:

“Is it to be supposed that animals have developed out of plants?” {110}.

Such a question could only be put by a person who has not the slightest
knowledge of either animals or plants.

Of life in general Herr Dühring is only able to tell us:

“The metabolism which is carried out through a plastically creating
schematisation” (what in the world can that be?) “remains always a
distinguishing characteristic of the real life process” {141}.

That is all we learn about life, while in the “plastically creating
schematisation” we are left knee-deep in the meaningless gibberish of
the purest Dühring jargon. If therefore we want to know what life is, we
shall evidently have to look a little more closely at it ourselves.

That organic exchange of matter is the most general and most
characteristic phenomenon of life has been said times out of number
during the last thirty years by physiological chemists and chemical
physiologists, and it is here merely translated by Herr Dühring into his
own elegant and clear language. But to define life as organic metabolism
is to define life as — life; for organic exchange of matter or
metabolism with plastically creating schematisation is in fact a phrase
which itself needs explanation through life, explanation through the
distinction between the organic and the inorganic, that is, that which
lives and that which does not live. This explanation therefore does not
get us any further.

Exchange of matter as such takes place even without life. There is a
whole series of processes in chemistry which, given an adequate supply
of raw material, constantly reproduce their own conditions, and do so in
such a way that a definite body is the carrier of the process. This is
the case in the manufacture of sulphuric acid by the burning of sulphur.
In this process sulphur dioxide, SO₂, is produced, and when steam and
nitric acid are added, the sulphur dioxide absorbs hydrogen and oxygen
and is converted into sulphuric acid, H₂SO₄. The nitric acid gives off
oxygen and is reduced to nitric oxide; this nitric oxide immediately
absorbs new oxygen from the air and is transformed into the higher
oxides of nitrogen, but only to transfer this oxygen immediately to
sulphur dioxide and to go through the same process again; so that
theoretically an infinitely small quantity of nitric acid should suffice
to change an unlimited quantity of sulphur dioxide, oxygen and water
into sulphuric acid. — Exchange of matter also takes place in the
passage of fluids through dead organic and even inorganic membranes, as
in Traube's artificial cells. ^([45]) Here too it is clear that we
cannot get any further by means of exchange of matter; for the peculiar
exchange of matter which is to explain life needs itself to be explained
through life. We must therefore try some other way.

_Life is the mode of existence of albuminous bodies_, and this mode of
existence essentially consists in the constant self-renewal of the
chemical constituents of these bodies.

The term albuminous body is used here in the sense in which it is
employed in modern chemistry, which includes under this name all bodies
constituted similarly to ordinary white of egg, otherwise also known as
protein substances. The name is an unhappy one, because ordinary white
of egg plays the most lifeless and passive role of all the substances
related to it, since, together with the yolk, it is merely food for the
developing embryo. But while so little is yet known of the chemical
composition of albuminous bodies, this name is better than any other
because it is more general.

Wherever we find life we find it associated with an albuminous body, and
wherever we find an albuminous body not in process of dissolution, there
also without exception we find phenomena of life. Undoubtedly, the
presence of other chemical combinations is also necessary in a living
body in order to induce particular differentiations of these phenomena
of life; but they are not requisite for naked life, except in so far as
they enter the body as food and are transformed into albumen. The lowest
living beings known to us are in fact nothing but simple particles of
albumen, and they already exhibit all the essential phenomena of life.

But what are these universal phenomena of life which are equally present
among all living organisms? Above all the fact that an albuminous body
absorbs other appropriate substances from its environment and
assimilates them, while other, older parts of the body disintegrate and
are excreted. Other non-living, bodies also change, disintegrate or
enter into combinations in the natural course of events; but in doing
this they cease to be what they were. A weather-worn rock is no longer a
rock, metal which oxidises turns into rust. But what with non-living
bodies is the cause of destruction, with albumen is _the fundamental
condition of existence._ From the moment when this uninterrupted
metamorphosis of its constituents, this constant alternation of
nutrition and excretion, no longer takes place in an albuminous body,
the albuminous body itself comes to an end, it decomposes, that is,
_dies_. Life, the mode of existence of an albuminous body, therefore
consists primarily in the fact that every moment it is itself and at the
same time something else; and this does not take place as the result of
a process to which it is subjected from without, as is the way in which
this can occur also in the case of inanimate bodies. On the contrary,
life, the metabolism which takes place through nutrition and excretion,
is a self-implementing process which is inherent in, native to, its
bearer, albumen, without which the latter cannot exist. And hence it
follows that if chemistry ever succeeds in producing albumen
artificially, this albumen must show the phenomena of life, however weak
these may be. It is certainly open to question whether chemistry will at
the same time also discover the right food for this albumen.

From the metabolism which takes place through nutrition and excretion,
as the essential function of albumen, and from its peculiar plasticity
proceed also all the other most simple factors of life: irritability,
which is already included in the mutual interaction between the albumen
and its food; contractibility, which is shown, even at a very low stage,
in the consumption of food; the possibility of growth, which in the
lowest forms includes propagation by fission; internal movement, without
which neither the consumption nor the assimilation of food is possible.

Our definition of life is naturally very inadequate, inasmuch as, far
from including _all_ the phenomena of life, it has to be limited to
those which are the most common and the simplest. From a scientific
standpoint all definitions are of little value. In order to gain an
exhaustive knowledge of what life is, we should have to go through all
the forms in which it appears, from the lowest to the highest. But for
ordinary usage such definitions are very convenient and in places cannot
well be dispensed with; moreover, they can do no harm, provided their
inevitable deficiencies are not forgotten.

But back to Herr Dühring. When things are faring badly with him in the
sphere of earthly biology, he knows where to find consolation; he takes
refuge in his starry heaven.

“It is not merely the special apparatus of an organ of sensation, but
the whole objective world, which is adapted to the production of
pleasure and pain. For this reason we take it for granted that the
antithesis between pleasure and pain, and moreover _exactly_, in the
form with which we are familiar, is a universal antithesis, and must be
represented _in the various worlds of the universe_ by essentially
homogeneous feelings.... This conformity, however, is of no _little_
significance, for it is the key to the _universe of sensations..._.
Hence the subjective cosmic world is to us not much more unfamiliar than
the objective. The constitution of both spheres must be conceived
according to one concordant type, and in this we have the beginnings of
a science of consciousness whose range is wider than merely terrestrial”
{D. Ph. 139-40}.

What do a few gross blunders in terrestrial natural science matter to
the man who carries in his pocket the key to the universe of sensations?
_Allons donc!_ [“Well, really!”]

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------



IX. MORALITY AND LAW. ETERNAL TRUTHS


We refrain from giving samples of the mish-mash of platitudes and
oracular sayings, in a word, of the simple _balderdash_ with which Herr
Dühring regales his readers for fifty full pages as the deep-rooted
science of the elements of consciousness. We will cite only this:

“He who can think only by means of language has never yet learnt what is
meant by _abstract_ and _pure_ thought” {D. Ph. 189}.

On this basis animals are the most abstract and purest thinkers, because
their thought is never obscured by the officious intrusion of language.
In any case one can see from the Dühringian thoughts and the language in
which they are couched how little suited these thoughts are to any
language, and how little suited the German language is to these
thoughts.

At last the fourth section brings us deliverance; apart from the
liquefying pap of rhetoric, it does at least offer us, here and there,
something tangible on the subject of _morality_ and _law._ Right at the
outset, on this occasion, we are invited to take a trip to the other
celestial bodies:

the elements of morals “must occur in concordant fashion among all
extra-human beings whose active reason has to deal with the conscious
ordering of life impulses in the form of instincts... And yet our
interest in such deductions will be small... Nevertheless it is an idea
which _beneficently extends_ our range of vision, when we think that on
other celestial bodies individual and communal life must be based on a
scheme which ... is unable to abrogate or escape from the general
fundamental constitution of a rationally acting being” {192-93}.

In this case, by way of exception, the validity of the Dühringian truths
also for all other possible worlds is put at the beginning instead of
the end of the chapter concerned; and for a sufficient reason. If the
validity of the Dühringian conceptions of morality and justice is first
established for all _worlds_, it is all the more easy beneficently to
extend their validity to all _times._ But once again what is involved is
nothing less than final and ultimate truth {2}.

The world of morals, “just as much as the world of general knowledge”,
has “its permanent principles and simple elements”. The moral principles
stand “above history and also above the present differences in national
characteristics... The special truths out of which, in the course of
evolution, a more complete moral consciousness and, so to speak,
conscience are built up, may, in so far as their ultimate basis is
understood, claim a validity and range similar to the insights and
applications of mathematics, _Genuine truths are absolutely immutable_
... so that it is altogether stupid to think that the correctness of
knowledge is something that can be affected by time and changes in
reality” {196}. Hence the certitude of strict knowledge and the adequacy
of common cognition leave no room, when we are in possession of our
senses, for doubting the absolute validity of the principles of
knowledge. “Even persistent doubt is itself a diseased condition of
weakness and only the expression of _hopeless confusion_, which
sometimes seeks to contrive the appearance of something stable in the
systematic consciousness of its _nothingness._ In the sphere of ethics,
the denial of general principles clutches at the geographical and
historical variety of customs and principles, and once the inevitable
necessity of moral wickedness and evil is conceded, it believes itself
so much the more to be above the recognition of the great importance and
actual efficacy of concordant moral impulses. This _mordant scepticism_,
which is not directed against particular false doctrines but against
mankind’s very capacity to develop conscious morality, resolves itself
ultimately into a real Nothing, in fact into something that is worse
than pure nihilism {194} ... It flatters itself that it can easily
dominate within its _utter chaos_ of disintegrated ethical ideas and
open the gates to unprincipled arbitrariness. But it is greatly
mistaken: for mere reference to the inevitable fate of reason in error
and truth suffices to show by this analogy alone that natural
fallibility does not necessarily exclude the attainment of accuracy”
{195}.

Up to now we have calmly put up with all these pompous phrases of Herr
Dühring's about final and ultimate truths, the sovereignty of thought,
absolute certainty of knowledge, and so forth, because it is only at the
point which we have now reached that the matter can be settled. Up to
this point it has been enough to enquire how far the separate assertions
of the philosophy of reality had “sovereign validity” and “an
unconditional claim to truth” {2}; now we come to the question whether
any, and if so which, products of human knowledge ever can have
sovereign validity and an unconditional claim to truth. When I say “of
_human_ knowledge” I do not use the phrase with the intention of
insulting the inhabitants of other celestial bodies, whom I have not had
the honour of knowing, but only for the reason that animals also have
knowledge, though it is in no way sovereign. A dog acknowledges his
master to be his God, though this master may be the biggest scoundrel on
earth.

Is human thought sovereign? Before we can answer yes or no we must first
enquire: what is human thought? Is it the thought of the individual man?
No. But it exists only as the individual thought of many milliards of
past, present and future men. If, then, I say that the total thought of
all these human beings, including the future ones, which is embraced in
my idea, is _sovereign_, able to know the world as it exists, if only
mankind lasts long enough and in so far as no limits are imposed on its
knowledge by its perceptive organs or the objects to be known, then I am
saying something which is pretty banal and, in addition, pretty barren.
For the most valuable result from it would be that it should make us
extremely distrustful of our present knowledge, inasmuch as in all
probability we are just about at the beginning of human history, and the
generations which will put us right are likely to be far more numerous
than those whose knowledge we — often enough with a considerable degree
of contempt — have the opportunity to correct.

Herr Dühring himself proclaims it to be a necessity that consciousness,
and therefore also thought and knowledge, can become manifest only in a
series of individual beings. We can only ascribe sovereignty to the
thought of each of these individuals in so far as we are not aware of
any power which would be able to impose any idea forcibly on him, when
he is of sound mind and wide awake. But as for the sovereign validity of
the knowledge obtained by each individual thought, we all know that
there can be no talk of such a thing, and that all previous experience
shows that without exception such knowledge always contains much more
that is capable of being improved upon than that which cannot be
improved upon, or is correct.

In other words, the sovereignty of thought is realised in a series of
extremely unsovereignly-thinking human beings; the knowledge which has
an unconditional claim to truth is realised in a series of relative
errors; neither the one nor the other can be fully realised except
through an unending duration of human existence.

Here once again we find the same contradiction as we found above,
between the character of human thought, necessarily conceived as
absolute, and its reality in individual human beings all of whom think
only limitedly. This is a contradiction which can be resolved only in
the course of infinite progress, in what is — at least practically for
us — an endless succession of generations of mankind. In this sense
human thought is just as much sovereign as not sovereign, and its
capacity for knowledge just as much unlimited as limited. It is
sovereign and unlimited in its disposition, its vocation, its
possibilities and its historical ultimate goal; it is not sovereign and
it is limited in its individual realisation and in reality at any
particular moment.

It is just the same with eternal truths. If mankind ever reached the
stage at which it should work only with eternal truths, with results of
thought which possess sovereign validity and an unconditional claim to
truth, it would then have reached the point where the infinity of the
intellectual world both in its actuality and in its potentiality had
been exhausted, and thus the famous miracle of the counted uncountable
would have been performed.

But are there any truths which are so securely based that any doubt of
them seems to us to be tantamount to insanity? That twice two makes
four, that the three angles of a triangle are equal to two right angles,
that Paris is in France, that a man who gets no food dies of hunger, and
so forth? Are there then nevertheless _eternal_ truths, final and
ultimate truths {D. Ph. 2}?

Certainly there are. We can divide the whole realm of knowledge in the
traditional way into three great departments. The first includes all
sciences that deal with inanimate nature and are to a greater or lesser
degree susceptible of mathematical treatment: mathematics, astronomy,
mechanics, physics, chemistry. If it gives anyone any pleasure to use
mighty words for very simple things, it can be asserted that _certain_
results obtained by these sciences are eternal truths, final and
ultimate truths; for which reason these sciences are known as the
_exact_ sciences. But very far from all their results have this
validity. With the introduction of variable magnitudes and the extension
of their variability to the infinitely small and infinitely large,
mathematics, usually so strictly ethical, fell from grace; it ate of the
tree of knowledge, which opened up to it a career of most colossal
achievements, but at the same time a path of error. The virgin state of
absolute validity and irrefutable proof of everything mathematical was
gone for ever; the realm of controversy was inaugurated, and we have
reached the point where most people differentiate and integrate not
because they understand what they are doing but from pure faith, because
up to now it has always come out right. Things are even worse with
astronomy and mechanics, and in physics and chemistry we are swamped by
hypotheses as if attacked by a swarm of bees. And it must of necessity
be so. In physics we are dealing with the motion of molecules, in
chemistry with the formation of molecules out of atoms, and if the
interference of light waves is not a myth, we have absolutely no
prospect of ever seeing these interesting objects with our own eyes. As
time goes on, final and ultimate truths become remarkably rare in this
field.

We are even worse off in geology which, by its nature, has to deal
chiefly with processes which took place not only in our absence but in
the absence of any human being whatever. The gleaning here of final and
ultimate truths is therefore a very troublesome business, and the crop
is extremely scanty.

The second department of science is the one which covers the
investigation of living organisms. In this field there is such a
multiplicity of interrelationships and causalities that not only does
the solution of each question give rise to a host of other questions,
but each separate problem can in most cases only be solved piecemeal,
through a series of investigations which often require centuries; and
besides, the need for a systematic presentation of interconnections
makes it necessary again and again to surround the final and ultimate
truths with a luxuriant growth of hypotheses. What a long series of
intermediaries from Galen to Malpighi was necessary for correctly
establishing such a simple matter as the circulation of the blood in
mammals, how slight is our knowledge of the origin of blood corpuscles,
and how numerous are the missing links even today, for example, to be
able to bring the symptoms of a disease into some rational relationship
with its cause! And often enough discoveries, such as that of the cell,
are made which compel us to revise completely all formerly established
final and ultimate truths in the realm of biology, and to put whole
piles of them on the scrap-heap once and for all. Anyone who wants to
establish really genuine and immutable truths here will therefore have
to be content with such platitudes as: all men are mortal, all female
mammals have lacteal glands, and the like; he will not even be able to
assert that the higher animals digest with their stomachs and intestines
and not with their heads, for the nervous activity, which is centralised
in the head, is indispensable to digestion.

But eternal truths are in an even worse plight in the third, the
historical, group of sciences, which study in their historical sequence
and in their present resultant state the conditions of human life,
social relationships, forms of law and government, with their ideal
superstructure in the shape of philosophy, religion, art, etc. In
organic nature we are at least dealing with a succession of processes
which, so far as our immediate observation is concerned, recur with fair
regularity within very wide limits. Organic species have on the whole
remained unchanged since the time of Aristotle. In social history,
however, the repetition of conditions is the exception and not the rule,
once we pass beyond the primitive state of man, the so-called Stone Age;
and when such repetitions occur, they never arise under exactly similar
circumstances. Such, for example, is the existence of an original common
ownership of the land among all civilised peoples, or the way it was
dissolved. In the sphere of human history our knowledge is therefore
even more backward than in the realm of biology. Furthermore, when by
way of exception the inner connection between the social and political
forms of existence in any epoch comes to be known, this as a rule occurs
only when these forms have already by half outlived themselves and are
nearing extinction. Therefore, knowledge is here essentially relative,
inasmuch as it is limited to the investigation of interconnections and
consequences of certain social and state forms which exist only in a
particular epoch and among particular peoples and are by their very
nature transitory. Anyone therefore who here sets out to hunt down final
and ultimate truths, genuine, absolutely immutable truths, will bring
home but little, apart from platitudes and commonplaces of the sorriest
kind — for example, that, generally speaking, men cannot live except by
labour; that up to the present they for the most part have been divided
into rulers and ruled; that Napoleon died on May 5, 1821, and so on.

Now it is a remarkable thing that it is precisely in this sphere that we
most frequently encounter truths which claim to be eternal, final and
ultimate and all the rest of it. That twice two makes four, that birds
have beaks, and similar statements, are proclaimed as eternal truths
only by those who aim at deducing, from the existence of eternal truths
in general, the conclusion that there are also eternal truths in the
sphere of human history — eternal morality, eternal justice, and so on —
which claim a validity and scope similar to those of the insights and
applications of mathematics. And then we can confidently rely on this
same friend of humanity taking the first opportunity to assure us that
all previous fabricators of eternal truths have been to a greater or
lesser extent asses and charlatans, that they all fell into error and
made mistakes; but that _their_ error and _their_ fallibility are in
accordance with nature’s laws, and prove the existence of truth and
accuracy precisely in _his_ case; and that he, the prophet who has now
arisen, has in his bag, all ready-made, final and ultimate truth,
eternal morality and eternal justice. This has all happened so many
hundreds and thousands of times that we can only feel astonished that
there should still be people credulous enough to believe this, not of
others, oh no! but of themselves. Nevertheless we have here before us at
least one more such prophet, who also, quite in the accustomed way,
flies into highly moral indignation when other people deny that any
individual whatsoever is in a position to deliver the final and ultimate
truth. Such a denial, or indeed mere doubt of it, is weakness, hopeless
confusion, nothingness, mordant scepticism, worse than pure nihilism,
utter chaos and other such pleasantries. As with all prophets, instead
of critical and scientific examination and judgment one encounters moral
condemnation out of hand.

We might have made mention above also of the sciences which investigate
the laws of human thought, i.e., logic and dialectics. In these,
however, eternal truths do not fare any better. Herr Dühring declares
that dialectics proper is pure nonsense; and the many books which have
been and are still being written on logic provide abundant proof that
here, too, final and ultimate truths are much more sparsely sown than
some people believe.

For that matter, there is absolutely no need to be alarmed at the fact
that the stage of knowledge which we have now reached is as little final
as all that have preceded it. It already embraces a vast mass of
judgments and requires very great specialisation of study on the part of
anyone who wants to become conversant with any particular science. But a
man who applies the measure of genuine, immutable, final and ultimate
truth to knowledge which, by its very nature, must either remain
relative for many generations and be completed only step by step, or
which, as in cosmogony, geology and the history of mankind, must always
contain gaps and be incomplete because of the inadequacy of the
historical material — such a man only proves thereby his own ignorance
and perversity, even if the real thing behind it all is not, as in this
case, the claim to personal infallibility. Truth and error, like all
thought-concepts which move in polar opposites, have absolute validity
only in an extremely limited field, as we have just seen, and as even
Herr Dühring would realise if he had any acquaintance with the first
elements of dialectics, which deal precisely with the inadequacy of all
polar opposites. As soon as we apply the antithesis between truth and
error outside of that narrow field which has been referred to above it
becomes relative and therefore unserviceable for exact scientific modes
of expression, and if we attempt to apply it as absolutely valid outside
that field we really find ourselves altogether beaten: both poles of the
antithesis become transformed into their opposites, truth becomes error
and error truth. Let us take as an example the well-known Boyle’s law.
According to it, if the temperature remains constant, the volume of a
gas varies inversely with the pressure to which it is subjected.
Regnault found that this law does not hold good in certain cases. Had he
been a philosopher of reality he would have had to say: Boyle’s law is
mutable, and is hence not a genuine truth, hence it is not a truth at
all, hence it is an error. But had he done this he would have committed
an error far greater than the one that was contained in Boyle’s law; his
grain of truth would have been lost sight of in a sand-hill of error; he
would have distorted his originally correct conclusion into an error
compared with which Boyle’s law, along with the little particle of error
that clings to it would have seemed like truth. But Regnault, being a
man of science, did not indulge in such childishness, but continued his
investigations and discovered that in general Boyle’s law is only
approximately true, and in particular loses its validity in the case of
gases which can be liquefied by pressure, namely, as soon as the
pressure approaches the point at which liquefaction begins. Boyle’s law
therefore was proved to be true only within definite limits. But is it
absolutely and finally true within those limits? No physicist would
assert that. He would maintain that it holds good within certain limits
of pressure and temperature and for certain gases; and even within these
more restricted limits he would not exclude the possibility of a still
narrower limitation or altered formulation as the result of future
investigations. ^(*2) This is how things stand with final and ultimate
truths in physics, for example. Really scientific works therefore, as a
rule, avoid such dogmatically moral expressions as error and truth,
while these expressions meet us everywhere in works such as the
philosophy of reality, in which empty phrasemongering attempts to impose
itself on us as the most sovereign result of sovereign thought.

But, a naive reader may ask, where has Herr Dühring expressly stated
that the content of his philosophy of reality is final and even ultimate
truth {D. Ph. 2}? Where? Well, for example, in the dithyramb on his
system (page 13), a part of which we cited in Chapter II. Or when he
says, in the passage quoted above: Moral truths, in so far as their
ultimate bases are understood, claim the same validity as mathematical
insights. And does not Herr Dühring assert that, working from his really
critical standpoint {D. Ph. 404} and by means of those researches of his
which go to the root of things {200}, he has forced his way through to
these ultimate foundations, the basic schemata, and has thus bestowed
final and ultimate validity on moral truths? Or, if Herr Dühring does
not advance this claim either for himself or for his age, if he only
meant to say that perhaps some day in the dark and nebulous future final
and ultimate truths may be ascertained, if therefore he meant to say
much the same, only in a more confused way, as is said by “mordant
scepticism” and “hopeless confusion” {194} — then, in that case, what is
all the noise about, what can we do for you, Herr Dühring? [Goethe,
_Faust_, Act I, Scene III (“Faust's Study”) — _Ed_.]

If, then, we have not made much progress with truth and error, we can
make even less with good and evil. This opposition manifests itself
exclusively in the domain of morals, that is, a domain belonging to the
history of mankind, and it is precisely in this field that final and
ultimate truths are most sparsely sown. The conceptions of good and evil
have varied so much from nation to nation and from age to age that they
have often been in direct contradiction to each other. — But all the
same, someone may object, good is not evil and evil is not good, if good
is confused with evil there is an end to all morality, and everyone can
do as he pleases. — This is also, stripped of all oracular phrases, Herr
Dühring's opinion. But the matter cannot be so simply disposed of. If it
were such an easy business there would certainly be no dispute at all
over good and evil; everyone would know what was good and what was bad.
But how do things stand today? What morality is preached to us today?
There is first Christian-feudal morality, inherited from earlier
religious times; and this is divided, essentially, into a Catholic and a
Protestant morality, each of which has no lack of subdivisions, from the
Jesuit-Catholic and Orthodox-Protestant to loose “enlightened”
moralities. Alongside these we find the modern-bourgeois morality and
beside it also the proletarian morality of the future, so that in the
most advanced European countries alone the past, present and future
provide three great groups of moral theories which are in force
simultaneously and alongside each other. Which, then, is the true one?
Not one of them, in the sense of absolute finality; but certainly that
morality contains the maximum elements promising permanence which, in
the present, represents the overthrow of the present, represents the
future, and that is proletarian morality.

But when we see that the three classes of modern society, the feudal
aristocracy, the bourgeoisie and the proletariat, each have a morality
of their own, we can only draw the one conclusion: that men, consciously
or unconsciously, derive their ethical ideas in the last resort from the
practical relations on which their class position is based — from the
economic relations in which they carry on production and exchange

But nevertheless there is great deal which the three moral theories
mentioned above have in common — is this not at least a portion of a
morality which is fixed once and for all? — These moral theories
represent three different stages of the same historical development,
have therefore a common historical background, and for that reason alone
they necessarily have much in common. Even more. At similar or
approximately similar stages of economic development moral theories must
of necessity be more or less in agreement. From the moment when private
ownership of movable property developed, all societies in which this
private ownership existed had to have this moral injunction in common:
Thou shalt not steal. [Exodus 20:15; Deuteronomy 5:19. — _Ed_.] Does
this injunction thereby become an eternal moral injunction? By no means.
In a society in which all motives for stealing have been done away with,
in which therefore at the very most only lunatics would ever steal, how
the preacher of morals would be laughed at who tried solemnly to
proclaim the eternal truth: Thou shalt not steal!

We therefore reject every attempt to impose on us any moral dogma
whatsoever as an eternal, ultimate and for ever immutable ethical law on
the pretext that the moral world, too, has its permanent principles
which stand above history and the differences between nations. We
maintain on the contrary that all moral theories have been hitherto the
product, in the last analysis, of the economic conditions of society
obtaining at the time. And as society has hitherto moved in class
antagonisms, morality has always been class morality; it has either
justified the domination and the interests of the ruling class, or ever
since the oppressed class became powerful enough, it has represented its
indignation against this domination and the future interests of the
oppressed. That in this process there has on the whole been progress in
morality, as in all other branches of human knowledge, no one will
doubt. But we have not yet passed beyond class morality. A really human
morality which stands above class antagonisms and above any recollection
of them becomes possible only at a stage of society which has not only
overcome class antagonisms but has even forgotten them in practical
life. And now one can gauge Herr Dühring’s presumption in advancing his
claim, from the midst of the old class society and on the eve of a
social revolution, to impose on the future classless society an eternal
morality independent of time and changes in reality. Even assuming —
what we do not know up to now — that he understands the structure of the
society of the future at least in its main outlines.

Finally, one more revelation which is “from the ground up original” {D.
Ph. 525} but for that reason no less “going to the root of things”
{200}: With regard to the origin of evil,

“the fact that the _type of the cat_ with the guile associated with it
is found in animal form, stands on an even plane with the circumstance
that a similar type of character is found also in human beings... There
is therefore nothing mysterious about evil, unless someone wants to
scent out something mysterious in the existence of a _cat_ or of any
animal of prey” {210-11}.

Evil is — the cat. The devil therefore has no horns or cloven hoof, but
claws and green eyes. And Goethe committed an unpardonable error in
presenting Mephistopheles as a black dog instead of a black cat. Evil is
the cat! That is morality, not only for all worlds, but also — for cats.

[This is, in German, a play on words: _für die Katze_ (for the cat)
denotes something utterly useless or wasted effort. — _Ed_.]

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------



X. MORALITY AND LAW. EQUALITY


We have already had more than one occasion to make ourselves acquainted
with Herr Dühring’s method. It consists in dissecting each group of
objects of knowledge to what is claimed to be their simplest elements,
applying to these elements similarly simple and what are claimed to be
self-evident axioms, and then continuing to operate with the aid of the
results so obtained. Even a problem in the sphere of social life

“is to be decided axiomatically, in accordance with particular, simple
basic forms, just as if we were dealing with the simple ... basic forms
of mathematics” {D. Ph. 224}.

And thus the application of the mathematical method to history, morals
and law is to give us also in these fields mathematical certainty of the
truth of the results obtained, to characterise them as genuine,
immutable truths.

This is only giving a new twist to the old favourite ideological method,
also known as the a _priori_ method, which consists in ascertaining the
properties of an object, by logical deduction from the concept of the
object, instead of from the object itself. First the concept of the
object is fabricated from the object; then the spit is turned round, and
the object is measured by its reflexion, the concept. The object is then
to conform to the concept, not the concept to the object. With Herr
Dühring the simplest elements, the ultimate abstractions he can reach,
do service for the concept, which does not alter matters; these simplest
elements are at best of a purely conceptual nature. The philosophy of
reality, therefore, proves here again to be pure ideology, the deduction
of reality not from itself but from a concept.

And when such an ideologist constructs morality and law from the
concept, or the so-called simplest elements of “society”, instead of
from the real social relations of the people round him, what material is
then available for this construction? Material clearly of two kinds:
first, the meagre residue of real content which may possibly survive in
the abstractions from which he starts and, secondly, the content which
our ideologist once more introduces from his own consciousness. And what
does he find in his consciousness? For the most part, moral and
juridical notions which are a more or less accurate expression (positive
or negative, corroborative or antagonistic) of the social and political
relations amidst which he lives; perhaps also ideas drawn from the
literature on the subject; and, as a final possibility, some personal
idiosyncrasies. Our ideologist may turn and twist as he likes, but the
historical reality which he cast out at the door comes in again at the
window, and while he thinks he is framing a doctrine of morals and law
for all times and for all worlds, he is in fact only fashioning an image
of the conservative or revolutionary tendencies of his day — an image
which is distorted because it has been torn from its real basis and,
like a reflection in a concave mirror, is standing on its head.

Herr Dühring thus dissects society into its simplest elements, and
discovers in doing so that the simplest society consists of at least two
people. With these two people he then proceeds to operate axiomatically.
And so the basic moral axiom naturally presents itself:

“Two human wills are as such _entirely equal_ to each other, and in the
first place the one can demand nothing positive of the other” {D. Ph.
200}. This “characterises the basic form of moral justice” {201}, and
also that of legal justice, for “we need only the wholly simple and
elementary relation of _two persons_ for the development of the
fundamental concepts of law” {228}.

That two people or two human wills are as such _entirely_ equal to each
other is not only not an axiom but is even a great exaggeration. In the
first place, two people, even as such, may be unequal in sex, and this
simple fact leads us on at once to the idea that the simplest elements
of society — if we accept this childishness for a moment — are not two
men, but a man and a woman, who found a _family_, the simplest and first
form of association for the purpose of production. But this cannot in
any way suit Herr Dühring. For on the one hand the two founders of
society must be made as equal as possible; and secondly even Herr
Dühring could not succeed in constructing from the primitive family the
moral and legal equality of man and woman. One thing or the other:
either the Dühringian social molecule, by the multiplication of which
the whole of society is to be built up, is doomed beforehand to
disaster, because two men can never by themselves bring a child into the
world; or we must conceive them as two heads of families. And in that
case the whole simple basic scheme is turned into its opposite: instead
of the equality of people it proves at most the equality of heads of
families, and as women are not considered, it further proves that they
are subordinate.

We have now to make an unpleasant announcement to the reader: that from
this point on for some considerable time he will not get rid of these
famous two men. In the sphere of social relations they play a similar
role to that hitherto played by the inhabitants of other celestial
bodies, with whom it is to be hoped we have now finished. Whenever a
question of economics, politics etc., is to be solved, the two men
instantly march up and settle the matter in the twinkling of an eye
“axiomatically” {224}. An excellent, creative and system-creating
discovery on the part of our philosopher of reality. But unfortunately,
if we want to pay due regard to truth, the two men are not his
discovery. They are the common property of the whole eighteenth century.
They are already to be found in Rousseau's discourse on inequality
(1754), ^([47]) where, by the way, they prove axiomatically the opposite
of Herr Dühring's contentions. They play a leading part with the
economists, from Adam Smith to Ricardo; but in these they are at least
unequal in that each of the two carries on a different trade — as a rule
one is a hunter and the other a fisherman — and that they mutually
exchange their products. Besides, throughout the eighteenth century,
they serve in the main as a purely illustrative example, and Herr
Dühring’s originality consists only in that he elevates this method of
illustration into a basic method for all social science and a measure of
all historical forms. Certainly it would be impossible to simplify
further the “strictly scientific conception of things and men” {387}.

In order to establish the fundamental axiom that two people and their
wills are absolutely equal to each other and that neither lords it over
the other, we cannot use any couple of men at random. They must be two
people who are so thoroughly free from all reality, from all national,
economic, political and religious relations which are found in the
world, from all sexual and personal peculiarities, that nothing is left
of either of them beyond the mere concept: human being, and then they
are of course “entirely equal”. They are therefore two complete phantoms
conjured up by that very Herr Dühring who is everywhere scenting and
denouncing “spiritistic” tendencies. These two phantoms are of course
obliged to do everything which the man who conjured them into existence
wants them to do, and for that very reason all their artifices are of no
interest whatever to the rest of the world.

But let us pursue Herr Dühring’s axiomatics a little further. The two
wills can demand nothing positive of each other. If nevertheless one of
them does so, and has its way by force, this gives rise to a state of
injustice; and this fundamental scheme serves Herr Dühring to explain
injustice, tyranny, servitude — in short, the whole reprehensible
history of the past. Now Rousseau, in the essay referred to above, had
already made use of two men to prove, likewise axiomatically, the very
opposite: that is, given two men, A cannot enslave B by force, but only
by putting B into a position in which the latter cannot do without A, a
conception which, however, is much too materialistic for Herr Dühring.
Let us put the same thing in a slightly different way. Two shipwrecked
people are alone on an island, and form a society. Their wills are,
formally, entirely equal, and this is acknowledged by both. But from a
material standpoint there is great inequality. A has determination and
energy, B is irresolute, lazy and flabby. A is quick-witted, B stupid.
How long will it be before A regularly imposes his will on B, first by
persuasion, subsequently by dint of habit, but always in form
voluntarily? Servitude remains servitude, whether the voluntary form is
retained or is trampled underfoot. Voluntary entry into servitude was
known throughout the Middle Ages, in Germany until after the Thirty
Years' War. ^([48]) When serfdom was abolished in Prussia after the
defeats of 1806 and 1807, and with it the obligation of the gracious
lords to provide for their subjects in need, illness and old age, the
peasants petitioned the king asking to be left in servitude — for
otherwise who would look after them when in distress? The two-men scheme
is therefore just as “appropriate” to inequality and servitude as to
equality and mutual help; and inasmuch as we are forced, on pain of
extinction of society, to assume that they are heads of families,
hereditary servitude is also provided for in the idea from the start.

But let this entire matter rest for the moment. Let us assume that Herr
Dühring’s axiomatics have convinced us and that we are enthusiastic
supporters of the entire equality of rights as between the two wills, of
“general human sovereignty” {D. Ph. 229}, of the “sovereignty of the
individual” {268} — veritable verbal colossi, compared with whom
Stirner's “Ego” together with his Own ^([49]) is a mere dwarf, although
he also could claim a modest part in them. Well, then, we are now all
_entirely equal_ {200} and independent. All? No, not quite all.

There are also cases of “permissible dependence”, but these can be
explained “on grounds which are to be sought not in the activity of the
two wills as such, but in a third sphere, as for example in regard to
children, in their inadequate self-determination” {200}.

Indeed! The grounds of dependence are not to be sought in the activity
of the two wills as such! Naturally not, for the activity of one of the
wills is actually restricted. But in a third sphere! And what is this
third sphere? The concrete determination of one, the subjected, will as
inadequate! Our philosopher of reality has so far departed from reality
that, as against the abstract term “will”, which is devoid of content,
he regards the real content, the characteristic determination of this
will, as a “third sphere”. Be that as it may, we are obliged to state
that the equality of rights has an exception. It does not hold good for
a will afflicted with inadequate self-determination. _Retreat No. 1_.

To proceed.

“Where beast and man are blended in one person the question may be
asked, on behalf of a second, entirely human, person, whether his mode
of action should be the same as if persons who, so to speak, are only
human were confronting each other {201} ... our hypothesis of two
morally unequal persons, one of whom in some sense or other has
something of the real beast in his character, is therefore the typical
basic form for all relations which, in accordance with this difference,
may come about ... within and between groups of people” {202}.

And now let the reader see for himself the pitiful diatribe that follows
these clumsy subterfuges, in which Herr Dühring turns and twists like a
Jesuit priest in order to determine casuistically how far the human man
can go against the bestial man, how far he may show distrust and employ
stratagems and harsh, even terrorist means, as well as deception against
him, without himself deviating in any way from immutable morality.

So, when two persons are “morally unequal” {202}, there again is no
longer equality. But then it was surely not worth while to conjure up
two entirely equal people, for there are no two persons who are morally
entirely equal. — But the inequality is supposed to consist in this:
that one person is human and the other has a streak of the beast in him.
It is, however, inherent in the descent of man from the animal world
that he can never entirely rid himself of the beast, so that it can
always be only a question of more or less, of a difference in the degree
of bestiality or of humanity. A division of mankind into two sharply
differentiated groups, into human men and beast men, into good and bad,
sheep and goats, is only found — apart from the philosophy of reality —
in Christianity, which quite logically also has its judge of the
universe to make the separation. But who is to be the judge of the
universe in the philosophy of reality? Presumably the procedure will
have to be the same as in Christian practice, in which the pious lambs
themselves assume the office of judge of the universe in relation to
their mundane goat-neighbours, and discharge this duty with notorious
success. The sect of philosophers of reality, if it ever comes into
being, will assuredly not yield precedence in this respect to the pious
of the land. This, however, is of no concern to us; what interests us is
the admission that, as a result of the moral inequality between men,
equality has vanished once more. _Retreat No. 2._

But, again, let us proceed.

“If one acts in accordance with truth and science, and the other in
accordance with some superstition or prejudice, then ... as a rule
mutual interference must occur {216}... At a certain degree of
incompetence, brutality or perversity of character, conflict is always
inevitable... It is not only children and madmen in relation to whom the
ultimate resource is _force_. The character of whole natural groups and
cultured classes in mankind may make the _subjection_ of their will,
which is hostile because of its perversity, an inevitable necessity, in
order to guide it back to the ties held in common. Even in such cases
the alien will is still recognised as _having equal rights;_ but the
perversity of its injurious and hostile activity has provoked an
_equalisation_, and if it is subjected to force, it is only reaping the
reaction to its own unrighteousness” {D. Ph. 217}.

So not only moral but also mental inequality is enough to remove the
“entire equality” of the two wills and to call into being a morality by
which all the infamous deeds of civilised robber states against backward
peoples, down to the Russian atrocities in Turkestan, can be justified.
When in the summer of 1873, General Kaufmann ordered the Tatar tribe of
the Yomuds to be attacked, their tents to be burnt and their wives and
children butchered — &ldquo;in the good old Caucasian way&rdquo;, as the
order was worded — he, too, declared that the subjection of the hostile,
because perverted, will of the Yomuds, with the object of guiding it
back to the ties held in common, had become an inevitable necessity,
that the means employed by him were best suited to the purpose, ^([50])
and that whoever willed the end must also will the means. Only he was
not so cruel as to insult the Yomuds on top of it all and to say that it
was just by massacring them for purposes of equalisation that he was
recognising their will as having equal rights. And once again in this
conflict it is the elect, those who claim to be acting in accordance
with truth and science and therefore in the last resort the philosophers
of reality, who have to decide what are superstition, prejudice,
brutality and perversity of character and when force and subjection are
necessary for purposes of equalisation. Equality, therefore, is now —
equalisation by force; and the second will is recognised by the first to
have equal rights through subjection. _Retreat No. 3_, here already
degenerating into ignominious flight.

Incidentally, the phrase that the alien will is recognised as having
equal right precisely through equalisation by means of force is only a
distortion of the Hegelian theory, according to which punishment is the
right of the criminal;

“punishment is regarded as containing the criminal’s right and hence by
being punished he is honoured as a rational being” (_Rechtsphilosophie_,
§ 100, Note).

With that we can break off. It would be superfluous to follow Herr
Dühring further in his piecemeal destruction of the equality which he
set up so axiomatically {224}, of his general human sovereignty {229}
and so on; to observe how he manages to set up society with his two men,
but in order to create the state he requires a third because — to put
the matter briefly — without a third no majority decisions can be
arrived at, and without these, and so also without the rule of the
majority over the minority, no state can exist; and then how he
gradually steers into calmer waters where he constructs his
socialitarian state of the future where one fine morning we shall have
the honour to look him up. We have sufficiently observed that the entire
equality of the two wills exists only so long as these two wills _will
nothing;_ that as soon as they cease to be human wills as such, and are
transformed into real, individual wills, into the wills of two real
people, equality comes to an end; that childhood, madness, so-called
bestiality, supposed superstition, alleged prejudice and assumed
incapacity on the one hand, and fancied humanity and knowledge of truth
and science on the other hand — that therefore every difference in the
quality of the two wills and in that of the intelligence associated with
them — justifies an inequality of treatment which may go as far as
subjection. What more can we ask, when Herr Dühring has so
deep-rootedly, from the ground up, demolished his own edifice of
equality?

But even though we have finished with Herr Dühring’s shallow, botched
treatment of the idea of equality, this does not mean that we have
finished with the idea itself, which especially thanks to Rousseau
played a theoretical, and during and since the great revolution a
practical political role, and even today still plays an important
agitational role in the socialist movement of almost every country. The
establishment of its scientific content will also determine its value
for proletarian agitation.

The idea that all men, as men, have something in common, and that to
that extent they are equal, is of course primeval. But the modern demand
for equality is something entirely different from that; this consists
rather in deducing from that common quality of being human, from that
equality of men as men, a claim to equal political resp. social status
for all human beings, or at least for all citizens of a state or all
members of a society. Before that original conception of relative
equality could lead to the conclusion that men should have equal rights
in the state and in society, before that conclusion could even appear to
be something natural and self-evident, thousands of years had to pass
and did pass. In the most ancient, primitive communities, equality of
rights could apply at most to members of the community; women, slaves
and foreigners were excluded from this equality as a matter of course.
Among the Greeks and Romans the inequalities of men were of much greater
importance than their equality in any respect. It would necessarily have
seemed insanity to the ancients that Greeks and barbarians, freemen and
slaves, citizens and peregrines, Roman citizens and Roman subjects (to
use a comprehensive term) should have a claim to equal political status.
Under the Roman Empire all these distinctions gradually disappeared,
except the distinction between freemen and slaves, and in this way there
arose, for the freemen at least, that equality as between private
individuals on the basis of which Roman law developed — the completest
elaboration of law based on private property which we know. But so long
as the antithesis between freemen and slaves existed, there could be no
talk of drawing legal conclusions from general equality of _men;_ we saw
this even recently, in the slave-owning states of the North American
Union.

Christianity knew only _one_ point in which all men were equal: that all
were equally born in original sin — which corresponded perfectly to its
character as the religion of the slaves and the oppressed. Apart from
this it recognised, at most, the equality of the elect, which however
was only stressed at the very beginning. The traces of community of
goods which are also found in the early stages of the new religion can
be ascribed to solidarity among the proscribed rather than to real
equalitarian ideas. Within a very short time the establishment of the
distinction between priests and laymen put an end even to this incipient
Christian equality. — The overrunning of Western Europe by the Germans
abolished for centuries all ideas of equality, through the gradual
building up of such a complicated social and political hierarchy as had
never existed before. But at the same time the invasion drew Western and
Central Europe into the course of historical development, created for
the first time a compact cultural area, and within this area also for
the first time a system of predominantly national states exerting mutual
influence on each other and mutually holding each other in check.
Thereby it prepared the ground on which alone the question of the equal
status of men, of the rights of man, could at a later period be raised.

The feudal Middle Ages also developed in their womb the class which was
destined, in the course of its further development, to become the
standard-bearer of the modern demand for equality: the bourgeoisie.
Originally itself a feudal estate, the bourgeoisie developed the
predominantly handicraft industry and the exchange of products within
feudal society to a relatively high level, when at the end of the
fifteenth century the great maritime discoveries opened to it a new
career of wider scope. Trade beyond the confines of Europe, which had
previously been carried on only between Italy and the Levant, was now
extended to America and India, and soon surpassed in importance both the
mutual exchange between the various European countries and the internal
trade within each individual country. American gold and silver flooded
Europe and forced its way like a disintegrating element into every
fissure, rent and pore of feudal society. Handicraft industry could no
longer satisfy the rising demand, in the leading industries of the most
advanced countries it was replaced by manufacture.

But this mighty revolution in the conditions of the economic life of
society was, however, not followed by any immediate corresponding change
in its political structure. The political order remained feudal, while
society became more and more bourgeois. Trade on a large scale, that is
to say, particularly international and, even more so, world trade,
requires free owners of commodities who are unrestricted in their
movements and as such enjoy equal rights; who may exchange their
commodities on the basis of laws that are equal for them all, at least
in each particular place. The transition from handicraft to manufacture
presupposes the existence of a number of free workers — free on the one
hand from the fetters of the guild and on the other from the means
whereby they could themselves utilise their labour-power — workers who
can contract with the manufacturer for the hire of their labour-power,
and hence, as parties to the contract, have rights equal to his. And
finally the equality and equal status of all human labour, because and
in so far as it is _human_ labour, found its unconscious but clearest
expression in the law of value of modern bourgeois political economy,
according to which the value of a commodity is measured by the socially
necessary labour embodied in it. ^(*3) — However, where economic
relations required freedom and equality of rights, the political system
opposed them at every step with guild restrictions and special
privileges. Local privileges, differential duties, exceptional laws of
all kinds affected in trade not only foreigners and people living in the
colonies, but often enough also whole categories of the nationals of the
country concerned; everywhere and ever anew the privileges of the guilds
barred the development of manufacture. Nowhere was the road clear and
the chances equal for the bourgeois competitors — and yet that this be
so was the prime and ever more pressing demand.

The demand for liberation from feudal fetters and the establishment of
equality of rights by the abolition of feudal inequalities was bound
soon to assume wider dimensions, once the economic advance of society
had placed it on the order of the day. If it was raised in the interests
of industry and trade, it was also necessary to demand the same equality
of rights for the great mass of the peasantry who, in every degree of
bondage, from total serfdom onwards, were compelled to give the greater
part of their labour-time to their gracious feudal lord without
compensation and in addition to render innumerable other dues to him and
to the state. On the other hand, it was inevitable that a demand should
also be made for the abolition of the feudal privileges, of the freedom
from taxation of the nobility, of the political privileges of the
separate estates. And as people were no longer living in a world empire
such as the Roman Empire had been, but in a system of independent states
dealing with each other on an equal footing and at approximately the
same level of bourgeois development, it was a matter of course that the
demand for equality should assume a general character reaching out
beyond the individual state, that freedom and equality should be
proclaimed _human rights_ And it is significant of the specifically
bourgeois character of these human rights that the American
constitution, ^([51]) the first to recognise the rights of man, in the
same breath confirms the slavery of the coloured races existing in
America: class privileges are proscribed, race privileges sanctified.

As is well known, however, from the moment when the bourgeoisie emerged
from feudal burgherdom, when this estate of the Middle Ages developed
into a modern class, it was always and inevitably accompanied by its
shadow, the proletariat. And in the same way bourgeois demands for
equality were accompanied by proletarian demands for equality. From the
moment when the bourgeois demand for the abolition of class _privileges_
was put forward, alongside it appeared the proletarian demand for the
abolition of the _classes themselves_ — at first in religious form,
leaning towards primitive Christianity, and later drawing support from
the bourgeois equalitarian theories themselves. The proletarians took
the bourgeoisie at its word: equality must not be merely apparent, must
not apply merely to the sphere of the state, but must also be real, must
also be extended to the social, economic sphere. And especially since
the French bourgeoisie, from the great revolution on, brought civil
equality to the forefront, the French proletariat has answered blow for
blow with the demand for social, economic equality, and equality has
become the battle-cry particularly of the French proletariat.

The demand for equality in the mouth of the proletariat has therefore a
double meaning. It is either — as was the case especially at the very
start, for example in the Peasant War [see Engels’ work _Peasant War in
Germany_]— the spontaneous reaction against the crying social
inequalities, against the contrast between rich and poor, the feudal
lords and their serfs, the surfeiters and the starving; as such it is
simply an expression of the revolutionary instinct, and finds its
justification in that, and in that only. Or, on the other hand, this
demand has arisen as a reaction against the bourgeois demand for
equality, drawing more or less correct and more far-reaching demands
from this bourgeois demand, and serving as an agitational means in order
to stir up the workers against the capitalists with the aid of the
capitalists’ own assertions; and in this case it stands or falls with
bourgeois equality itself. In both cases the real content of the
proletarian demand for equality is the demand for the _abolition of
classes_. Any demand for equality which goes beyond that, of necessity
passes into absurdity. We have given examples of this, and shall find
enough additional ones when we come to Herr Dühring’s fantasies of the
future.

The idea of equality, both in its bourgeois and in its proletarian form,
is therefore itself a historical product, the creation of which required
definite historical conditions that in turn themselves presuppose a long
previous history. It is therefore anything but an eternal truth. And if
today it is taken for granted by the general public — in one sense or
another — if, as Marx says, it “already possesses the fixity of a
popular prejudice”, ^([52]) this is not the effect of its axiomatic
truth, but the effect of the general diffusion and the continued
appropriateness of the ideas of the eighteenth century. If therefore
Herr Dühring is able without more ado to let his famous two men conduct
their economic relations on the basis of equality, this is so because it
seems quite natural to popular prejudice. And in fact Herr Dühring calls
his philosophy _natural_ because it is derived solely from things which
seem to him quite natural. But why they seem natural to him is a
question which of course he does not ask.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Anti-Dühring by Frederick Engels 1877
Part I: Philosophy

XI. Morality and Law. Freedom and Necessity

“In the sphere of politics and law the principles expounded in this
course are based on the _most exhaustive specialised studies._ It is
therefore ... necessary to proceed from the fact that what we have here
... is a consistent exposition of the _conclusions_ reached in the
sphere of legal and political science. Jurisprudence was my original
special subject and I not only devoted to it the customary three years
of theoretical university preparation, but also, during a further three
years of court practice continued to study it particularly with a view
to the _deepening_ of its scientific content... And _certainly_ the
critique of private law relationships and the corresponding legal
inadequacies could not have been put forward with _such confidence_ but
the consciousness that all the weaknesses of the subject _were known_ to
it as well as its stronger sides” {D. Ph. 537}.

A man who is justified in saying this of himself must from the outset
inspire confidence, especially in contrast with the

“one-time, admittedly neglected, legal studies of Herr Marx” {D. K. G.
503}.

And for that reason it must surprise us to find that the critique of
private law relationships which steps on to the stage with such
confidence is restricted to telling us that

“the scientific character of jurisprudence has not developed far” {D.
Ph. 222-23}, that positive civil law is injustice in that it sanctions
property based on force {219} and that the “natural basis” of criminal
law is _revenge_ {224}, —

an assertion of which in any case the only thing new is its mystical
wrapping of “natural basis”. The conclusions in political science are
limited to the transactions of the famous three men, one of whom has
hitherto held down the others by force, with Herr Dühring in all
seriousness conducting an investigation into whether it was the second
or the third who first introduced violence and subjection {265-66}.

However, let us go a little more deeply into our confident jurist’s most
exhaustive specialised studies and his erudition deepened by three years
of court practice.

Herr Dühring tells us of Lassalle that

he was prosecuted for “_inciting_ to an attempt to steal a cash-box” but
that “no sentence by the court could be recorded, as the so-called
_acquittal for lack of evidence_, which was _then still possible_,
supervened ... this _half_ acquittal” {D. K. G. 510}.

The Lassalle case referred to here came up in the summer of 1848, before
the assizes at Cologne, ^([53]) where, as in almost the whole of the
Rhine Province, French criminal law was in force. Prussian law had been
introduced by way of exception only for political offences and crimes,
but already in April 1848 this exceptional application had been
abrogated by Camphausen. French law has no knowledge whatever of the
loose Prussian legal category of “inciting” to a crime, let alone
inciting to an attempt to commit a crime. It knows only _instigation_ to
crime, and this, to be punishable, must have been committed “by means of
gifts, promises, threats, abuse of authority or of power, culpable
incitements or artifices” (_Code penal_, art. 60). ^([54]) The Ministry
of State, steeped in Prussian law, overlooked, just as Herr Dühring did,
the essential difference between the sharply defined French code and the
vague indefiniteness of Prussian law and, subjecting Lassalle to a
tendentiously conducted trial, egregiously failed in the case. Only a
person who is completely ignorant of modern French law can venture to
assert that French criminal procedure permitted the Prussian legal form
of an acquittal for lack of evidence, this _half_ acquittal; criminal
procedure under French law provides only for conviction or acquittal,
nothing between.

And so we are forced to say that Herr Dühring would certainly not have
been able to perpetrate this “historical depiction in the grand style”
{556} against Lassalle if he had ever had the _Code Napoléon_ ^([55]) in
his hands. We must therefore state as a fact that modern French law, the
_only_ modern civil code, which rests on the social achievements of the
great French Revolution and translates them into legal form, is
_completely unknown_ to Herr Dühring.

In another place, in the criticism of trial by jury with majority
decision which was adopted throughout the Continent in accordance with
the French model, we are taught:

“Yes, it will _even_ be possible to familiarise oneself with the idea,
which for that matter is not without precedent in history, that a
conviction _where opinion is divided_ should be one of the impossible
institutions in a perfect community {D. Ph. 402} ... This _important_
and _profoundly intelligent_ mode of thought, however, as already
indicated above, must seem unsuitable for the traditional forms, because
it is _too good_ for them” {D. Ph. 403}.

Once again, Herr Dühring is ignorant of the fact that under English
common law, i.e., the unwritten law of custom which has been in force
since time immemorial, certainly at least since the fourteenth century,
unanimity of the jury is absolutely essential, not only for convictions
in criminal cases but also for judgments in civil suits. Thus the
important and profoundly intelligent mode of thought, which according to
Herr Dühring is _too good_ for the present-day world, had had legal
validity in England as far back as the darkest Middle Ages, and from
England it was brought to Ireland, the United States of America and all
the English colonies. And yet the most exhaustive specialised studies
failed to reveal to Herr Dühring even the faintest whisper of all this!
The area in which a unanimous verdict by the jury is required is
therefore not only infinitely greater than the tiny area where Prussian
law is in force, but is also more extensive than all the areas taken
together in which juries decide by majority vote. Not only is French
law, the only modern law, totally unknown to Herr Dühring; he is equally
ignorant of the only Germanic law which has developed independently of
Roman authority up to the present day and spread to all parts of the
world — English law. And why does Herr Dühring know nothing of it?
Because the English brand of the juridical mode of thought

“would anyhow not be able to stand up against the schooling in the pure
concepts of the classical Roman jurists given on German soil” {D. K. G.
456},

says Herr Dühring; and he says further:

“what is the English-speaking world with its childish hodgepodge
language as compared with our natural language structure?” {D. Ph. 315.}

To which we might answer with Spinoza: _Ignorantia non est argumentum._
Ignorance is no argument. ^([56])

We can accordingly come to no other final conclusion than that Herr
Dühring's most exhaustive specialised studies consisted in his
absorption for three years in the theoretical study of the _Corpus
juris_, ^([57]) and for a further three years in the practical study of
the noble Prussian law. That is certainly quite meritorious, and would
be ample for a really respectable district judge or lawyer in old
Prussia. But when a person undertakes to compose a legal philosophy for
all worlds and all ages, he should at least have some degree of
acquaintance with legal systems like those of the French, English and
Americans, nations which have played quite a different role in history
from that played by the little corner of Germany in which Prussian law
flourishes. But let us follow him further.

“The variegated medley of local, provincial and national laws, which run
counter to one another in the most various directions, in very arbitrary
fashion, sometimes as common law, sometimes as written law, often
cloaking the most important issues in a purely statutory form — this
pattern-book of disorder and contradiction, in which particular points
override general principles, and then at times general principles
override particular points — is really not calculated to enable anyone
to form a clear conception of jurisprudence” {278}.

But where does this confusion exist? Once again, within the area where
Prussian law holds sway, where alongside, over or under this law there
are provincial laws and local statutes, here and there also common law
and other trash, ranging through the most diverse degrees of relative
validity and eliciting from all practicing jurists that scream for help
which Herr Dühring here so sympathetically echoes. He need not even go
outside his beloved Prussia — he need only come as far as the Rhine to
convince himself that all this ceased to be an issue there for the last
seventy years — not to speak of other civilised countries, where these
antiquated conditions have long since been abolished.

Further:

“In a less blunt form the natural responsibility of individuals is
screened by means of secret and therefore anonymous collective decisions
and actions on the part of _collegia_ or other institutions of public
authority, which mask the personal share of each separate member” {218}.

And in another passage:

“In our present situation it will be regarded as an _astonishing_ and
extremely stern demand if one opposes the glossing over and covering up
of individual responsibility through the medium of collective bodies”
{402}.

Perhaps Herr Dühring will regard it as an astonishing piece of
information when we tell him that in the sphere of English law each
member of a judicial bench has to give his decision separately and in
open court, stating the grounds on which it is based; that
administrative collective bodies which are not elected and do not
transact business or vote publicly are essentially a _Prussian_
institution and are unknown in most other countries, and that therefore
his demand can be regarded as astonishing and extremely stern only — in
_Prussia._

Similarly, his complaints about the compulsory introduction of religious
practices in birth, marriage, death and burial {407} apply to Prussia
alone of all the greater civilised countries, and since the adoption of
civil registration they no longer apply even there. ^([58]) What Herr
Dühring can accomplish only by means of a future “socialitarian” state
of things, even Bismarck has meanwhile managed by means of a simple law.
— It is just the same with his “plaint over the inadequate preparation
of jurists for their profession” {501}, a plaint which could be extended
to cover the “administrative officials” {503} — it is a specifically
Prussian jeremiad; and even his hatred of the Jews, which he carries to
ridiculous extremes and exhibits on every possible occasion, is a
feature which if not specifically Prussian is yet specific to the region
east of the Elbe. That same philosopher of reality who has a sovereign
contempt for all prejudices and superstitions is himself so deeply
immersed in personal crotchets that he calls the popular prejudice
against the Jews, inherited from the bigotry of the Middle Ages, a
“natural judgment” based on “natural grounds”, and he rises to the
pyramidal heights of the assertion that

“socialism is the only power which can oppose population conditions with
a rather strong Jewish admixture” {D. Ph. 393}. (Conditions with a
Jewish admixture! What “natural” German!)

Enough of this. The grandiloquent boasts of legal erudition have as
their basis — at best — only the most commonplace professional knowledge
of quite an ordinary jurist of old Prussia. The sphere of legal and
political science, the attainments in which Herr Dühring consistently
expounds, “coincides” with the area where Prussian law holds sway. Apart
from the Roman law, with which every jurist is fairly familiar, now even
in England, his knowledge of law is confined wholly and entirely to
Prussian law — that legal code of an enlightened patriarchal despotism
which is written in a German such as Herr Dühring appears to have been
trained in, and which, with its moral glosses, its juristic vagueness
and inconsistency, its caning as a means of torture and punishment,
belongs entirely to the pre-revolutionary epoch. Whatever exists beyond
this Herr Dühring regards as evil [Matthew 5:37 — _Ed_.] — both modern
civil French law, and English law with its quite peculiar development
and its safeguarding of personal liberty, unknown anywhere on the
Continent. The philosophy which “does not allow the validity of any
merely _apparent_ horizon, but in its powerfully revolutionising
movement unfolds all earths and heavens of outer and inner nature” {430}
— has as its _real_ horizon — the boundaries of the six eastern
provinces of old Prussia, ^([59]) and in addition perhaps the few other
patches of land where the noble Prussian law holds sway; and beyond this
horizon it unfolds neither earths nor heavens, neither outer nor inner
nature, but only a picture of the crassest ignorance of what is
happening in the rest of the world.

It is hard to deal with morality and law without coming up against the
question of so-called free will, of man's mental responsibility, of the
relation between necessity and freedom. And the philosophy of reality
also has not only one but even two solutions of this problem.

“All false theories of freedom must be replaced by, what we know from
experience is the nature of the relation between rational judgment on
the one hand and instinctive impulses on the other, a relation which _so
to speak_ unites them into a resultant force. The fundamental facts of
this form of dynamics must be drawn from observation, and for the
calculation in advance of events which have not yet occurred must also
be estimated, _as closely as possible_, in general both as to their
nature and magnitude. In this manner the silly delusions of inner
freedom, which people have chewed on and fed on for thousands of years,
are not only cleared away in thoroughgoing fashion, but are replaced by
something positive, which can be made use of for the practical
regulation of life” {187}.

Viewed thus freedom consists in rational judgment pulling a man to the
right while irrational impulses pull him to the left, and in this
parallelogram of forces the actual movement proceeds in the direction of
the diagonal. Freedom is therefore the mean between judgment and
impulse, reason and unreason, and its degree in each individual case can
be determined on the basis of experience by a “personal equation”, to
use an astronomical expression. ^([60]) But a few pages later on we
find:

“We base moral responsibility on freedom, which however means nothing
more to us than susceptibility to conscious motives in accordance with
our natural and acquired intelligence. All such motives operate with the
inevitability of natural law, notwithstanding an awareness of possible
contrary actions; but it is precisely on this unavoidable compulsion
that we rely when we apply the moral levers” {218}.

This second definition of freedom, which quite unceremoniously gives a
knock-out blow to the first one, is again nothing but an extreme
vulgarisation of the Hegelian conception. Hegel was the first to state
correctly the relation between freedom and necessity. To him, freedom is
the insight into necessity (_die Einsicht in die Notwendigheit_).

"Necessity is _blind_ only _in so far as it is not understood_
[begriffen]."

Freedom does not consist in any dreamt-of independence from natural
laws, but in the knowledge of these laws, and in the possibility this
gives of systematically making them work towards definite ends. This
holds good in relation both to the laws of external nature and to those
which govern the bodily and mental existence of men themselves — two
classes of laws which we can separate from each other at most only in
thought but not in reality. Freedom of the will therefore means nothing
but the capacity to make decisions with knowledge of the subject.
Therefore the _freer_ a man’s judgment is in relation to a definite
question, the greater is the _necessity_ with which the content of this
judgment will be determined; while the uncertainty, founded on
ignorance, which seems to make an arbitrary choice among many different
and conflicting possible decisions, shows precisely by this that it is
not free, that it is controlled by the very object it should itself
control. Freedom therefore consists in the control over ourselves and
over external nature, a control founded on knowledge of natural
necessity; it is therefore necessarily a product of historical
development. The first men who separated themselves from the animal
kingdom were in all essentials as unfree as the animals themselves, but
each step forward in the field of culture was a step towards freedom. On
the threshold of human history stands the discovery that mechanical
motion can be transformed into heat: the production of fire by friction;
at the close of the development so far gone through stands the discovery
that heat can be transformed into mechanical motion: the steam-engine. —
And, in spite of the gigantic liberating revolution in the social world
which the steam-engine is carrying through, and which is not yet half
completed, it is beyond all doubt that the generation of fire by
friction has had an even greater effect on the liberation of mankind.
For the generation of fire by friction gave man for the first time
control over one of the forces of nature, and thereby separated him for
ever from the animal kingdom. The steam-engine will never bring about
such a mighty leap forward in human development, however important it
may seem in our eyes as representing all those immense productive forces
dependent on it — forces which alone make possible a state of society in
which there are no longer class distinctions or anxiety over the means
of subsistence for the individual, and in which for the first time there
can be talk of real human freedom, of an existence in harmony with the
laws of nature that have become known. But how young the whole of human
history still is, and how ridiculous it would be to attempt to ascribe
any absolute validity to our present views, is evident from the simple
fact that all past history can be characterised as the history of the
epoch from the practical discovery of the transformation of mechanical
motion into heat up to that of the transformation of heat into
mechanical motion.

True, Herr Dühring's treatment of history is different. In general,
being a record of error, ignorance and barbarity, of violence and
subjugation, history is a repulsive object to the philosophy of reality;
but considered in detail it is divided into two great periods, namely
(1) from the self-equal state of matter up to the French Revolution, (2)
from the French Revolution up to Herr Dühring; the nineteenth century
remains

“still in essence reactionary, indeed from the intellectual standpoint
even more so” (!) “than the eighteenth”. Nevertheless, it bears
socialism in its womb, and therewith “the germ of a mightier
regeneration than was fancied” (!) “by the forerunners and the heroes of
the French Revolution” {D. Ph. 301}.

The philosophy of reality’s contempt for all past history is justified
as follows:

“The few thousand years, the historical retrospection of which has been
facilitated by original documents, are, together with the constitution
of mankind so far, _of little significance_ when one thinks of the
succession of thousands of years which are still to come... The human
race as a whole is still very young, and when in time to come scientific
retrospection has tens of thousands instead of thousands of years to
reckon with, the intellectually immature childhood of our institutions
becomes a self-evident premise undisputed in relation to our epoch,
which will then be revered as hoary antiquity” {302}.

Without dwelling on the really “natural language structure” of the last
sentence, we shall note only two points. Firstly, that this “hoary
antiquity” will in any case remain a historical epoch of the greatest
interest for all future generations, because it forms the basis of all
subsequent higher development, because it has for its starting-point the
moulding of man from the animal kingdom, and for its content the
overcoming of obstacles such as will never again confront associated
mankind of the future. And secondly, that the close of this hoary
antiquity — in contrast to which the future periods of history, which
will no longer be kept back by these difficulties and obstacles, hold
the promise of quite other scientific, technical and social achievements
— is in any case a very strange moment to choose to lay down the law for
these thousands of years that are to come, in the form of final and
ultimate truths, immutable truths and deep-rooted conceptions discovered
on the basis of the intellectually immature childhood of our so
extremely “backward” and “retrogressive” century. Only a Richard Wagner
in philosophy — but without Wagner’s talents — could fail to see that
all the depreciatory epithets slung at previous historical development
remain sticking also on what is claimed to be its final outcome — the
so-called philosophy of reality.

One of the most significant morsels of the new deep-rooted science {219}
is the section on individualisation and increasing the value of life. In
this section oracular commonplaces bubble up and gush forth in an
irresistible torrent for three full chapters. Unfortunately we must
limit ourselves to a few short samples.

“The deeper essence of all sensation and therefore of all subjective
forms of life rests on the _difference_ between states... But for a
_full_” (!) “life it can be shown without much trouble” (!) “that its
appreciation is heightened and the decisive stimuli are developed, not
by persistence in a particular state, but by a transition from one
situation in life to another... The approximately self-equal state which
is _so to speak_ in permanent inertia and _as it were_ continues in the
same position of equilibrium, whatever its nature may be, has but little
significance for the testing of existence... Habituation and _so to
speak_ inurement makes it something of absolute indifference and
unconcern, something which is not very distinct from deadness. At most
the torment of boredom also enters into it as a kind of negative life
impulse... A life of stagnation extinguishes all passion and all
interest in existence, both for individuals and for peoples. _But it is
our law of difference through which all these phenomena become
explicable_” {D. Ph. 362-63}.

The rapidity with which Herr Dühring establishes his from the ground up
original conclusions passes all belief. The commonplace that the
continued stimulation of the same nerve or the continuation of the same
stimulus fatigues each nerve or each nervous system, and that therefore
in a normal condition nerve stimuli must be interrupted and varied —
which for years has been stated in every textbook of physiology and is
known to every philistine from his own experience — is first translated
into the language of the philosophy of reality. No sooner has this
platitude which is as old as the hills, been translated into the
mysterious formula that the deeper essence of all sensation rests on the
difference between states, than it is further transformed into “_our_
law of difference”. And this law of difference makes “absolutely
explicable” a whole series of phenomena which in turn are nothing more
than illustrations and examples of the pleasantness of variety and which
require no explanation whatever even for the most common philistine
understanding and gain not the breadth of an atom in clarity by
reference to this alleged law of difference.

But this far from exhausts the deep-rootedness of “_our_ law of
difference” {219}.

“The sequence of ages in life, and the emergence of different conditions
of life bound up with it, furnish a very obvious example with which to
illustrate _our_ principle of difference... Child, boy, youth and man
experience the intensity of their appreciation of life at each stage not
so much when the state in which they find themselves has already become
fixed, as in the periods of transition from one to another” {363}.

Even this is not enough.

“_Our_ law of difference can be given an even more extended application
if we take into consideration the fact that a repetition of what has
already been tried or done has no attraction” {365}.

And now the reader can himself imagine the oracular twaddle for which
sentences of the depth and deep-rootedness of those cited form the
starting-point. Herr Dühring may well shout triumphantly at the end of
his book:

“The law of difference has become decisive both in theory and in
practice for the appraisement and heightening of the value of life!”
{558}

This is likewise true of Herr Dühring’s appraisement of the intellectual
value of his public: he must believe that it is composed of sheer asses
or philistines.

We are further given the following extremely practical rules of life:

“The method whereby total interest in life can be kept active” (a
fitting task for philistines and those who want to become such!)
“consists in allowing the particular and _so to speak_ elementary
interests, of which the total interest is composed, to develop or
succeed each other in accordance with natural periods of time.
Simultaneously, for the same state the succession of stages may be made
use of by replacing the lower and more easily satisfied stimuli by
higher and more permanently effective excitations in order to avoid the
occurrence of any gaps that are entirely devoid of interest. However, it
will be necessary to ensure that the natural tensions or those arising
in the normal course of social existence are not arbitrarily accumulated
or forced or — the opposite perversion — satisfied by the lightest
stimulation, and thus prevented from developing a want which is capable
of gratification. In this as in other cases the maintenance of the
natural rhythm is the precondition of all harmonious and agreeable
movement. Nor should anyone set before himself the insoluble problem of
trying to prolong the stimuli of any situation beyond the period
allotted them by nature or by the circumstances” {375} — and so on.

The simpleton who takes as his rule for the “testing of life” these
solemn oracles of philistine pedantry subtilising over the shallowest
platitudes will certainly not have to complain of “gaps entirely devoid
of interest”. It will take him all his time to prepare his pleasures and
get them in the right order, so that he will not have a moment left to
enjoy them.

We should try out life, full life. There are only two things which Herr
Dühring prohibits us:

first “the uncleanliness of indulging in tobacco”, and secondly drinks
and foods which “have properties that rouse disgust or are in general
obnoxious to the more refined feelings” {261}.

In his course of political economy, however, Herr Dühring writes such a
dithyramb on the distilling of spirits that it is impossible that he
should include spirituous liquor in this category; we are therefore
forced to conclude that his prohibition covers only wine and beer. He
has only to prohibit meat, too, and then he will have raised the
philosophy of reality to the same height as that on which the late
Gustav Struve moved with such great success — the height of pure
childishness.

For the rest, Herr Dühring might be slightly more liberal in regard to
spirituous liquors. A man who, by his own admission still cannot find
the bridge from the static to the dynamic {D. Ph. 80} has surely every
reason to be indulgent in judging some poor devil who has for once
dipped too deep in his glass and as a result also seeks in vain the
bridge from the dynamic to the static.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------



XII. DIALECTICS. QUANTITY AND QUALITY


“The first and most important principle of the basic logical properties
of being refers to the _exclusion of contradiction._ Contradiction is a
category which can only appertain to a combination of thoughts, but not
to reality. There are no contradictions in things, or, to put it another
way, contradiction accepted as reality is itself the apex of absurdity
{D. Ph. 30} ... The antagonism of forces measured against each other and
moving in opposite directions is in fact the basic form of all actions m
the life of the world and its creatures. But this opposition of the
directions taken by the forces of elements and individuals does not in
the slightest degree coincide with the idea of absurd contradictions
{31} ... We can be content here with having cleared the fogs which
generally rise from the supposed mysteries of logic by presenting a
clear picture of the actual absurdity of contradictions in reality and
with having shown the uselessness of the incense which has been burnt
here and there in honour of the dialectics of contradiction — the very
clumsily carved wooden doll which is substituted for the antagonistic
world schematism” {32}

This is practically all we are told about dialectics in the _Cursus der
Philosophie._ In his _Kritische Geschichte_, on the other hand, the
dialectics of contradiction, and with it particularly Hegel, is treated
quite differently.

“Contradiction, according to the Hegelian logic, or rather Logos
doctrine, is objectively present not in thought, which by its nature can
only be conceived as subjective and conscious, but in things and
processes themselves and can be met with in so to speak corporeal form,
so that absurdity does not remain an impossible combination of thought
but becomes an actual force. The reality of the absurd is the first
article of faith in the Hegelian unity of the logical and the
illogical.... The more contradictory a thing the truer it is, or in
other words, the more absurd the more credible it is. This maxim, which
is not even newly invented but is borrowed from the theology of the
Revelation and from mysticism, is the naked expression of the so-called
dialectical principle” {D. K. G. 479-80}.

The thought-content of the two passages cited can be summed up in the
statement that contradiction=absurdity, and therefore cannot occur in
the real world. People who in other respects show a fair degree of
common sense may regard this statement as having the same self-evident
validity as the statement that a straight line cannot be a curve and a
curve cannot be straight. But, regardless of all protests made by common
sense, the differential calculus under certain circumstances
nevertheless equates straight lines and curves, and thus obtains results
which common sense, insisting on the absurdity of straight lines being
identical with curves, can never attain. And in view of the important
role which the so-called dialectics of contradiction has played in
philosophy from the time of the ancient Greeks up to the present, even a
stronger opponent than Herr Dühring should have felt obliged to attack
it with other arguments besides one assertion and a good many abusive
epithets.

True, so long as we consider things as at rest and lifeless, each one by
itself, alongside and after each other, we do not run up against any
contradictions in them. We find certain qualities which are partly
common to, partly different from, and even contradictory to each other,
but which in the last-mentioned case are distributed among different
objects and therefore contain no contradiction within. Inside the limits
of this sphere of observation we can get along on the basis of the
usual, metaphysical mode of thought. But the position is quite different
as soon as we consider things in their motion, their change, their life,
their reciprocal influence on one another. Then we immediately become
involved in contradictions. Motion itself is a contradiction: even
simple mechanical change of position can only come about through a body
being at one and the same moment of time both in one place and in
another place, being in one and the same place and also not in it. And
the continuous origination and simultaneous solution of this
contradiction is precisely what motion is.

Here, therefore, we have a contradiction which “is objectively present
in things and processes themselves and can be met with in so to speak
corporeal form”. And what has Herr Dühring to say about it? He asserts
that

up to the present there is “no bridge” whatever “in rational mechanics
from the strictly static to the dynamic” {D. Ph. 80}.

The reader can now at last see what is hidden behind this favourite
phrase of Herr Dühring’s — it is nothing but this: the mind which thinks
metaphysically is absolutely unable to pass from the idea of rest to the
idea of motion, because the contradiction pointed out above blocks its
path. To it, motion is simply incomprehensible because it is a
contradiction. And in asserting the incomprehensibility of motion, it
admits against its will the existence of this contradiction, and thus
admits the objective presence in things and processes themselves of a
contradiction which is moreover an actual force.

If simple mechanical change of position contains a contradiction this is
even more true of the higher forms of motion of matter, and especially
of organic life and its development. We saw above that life consists
precisely and primarily in this — that a being is at each moment itself
and yet something else. Life is therefore also a contradiction which is
present in things and processes themselves, and which constantly
originates and resolves itself; and as soon as the contradiction ceases,
life, too, comes to an end, and death steps in. We likewise saw that
also in the sphere of thought we could not escape contradictions, and
that for example the contradiction between man's inherently unlimited
capacity for knowledge and its actual presence only in men who are
externally limited and possess limited cognition finds its solution in
what is — at least practically, for us — an endless succession of
generations, in infinite progress.

We have already noted that one of the basic principles of higher
mathematics is the contradiction that in certain circumstances straight
lines and curves may be the same. It also gets up this other
contradiction: that lines which intersect each other before our eyes
nevertheless, only five or six centimetres from their point of
intersection, can be shown to be parallel, that is, that they will never
meet even if extended to infinity. And yet, working with these and with
even far greater contradictions, it attains results which are not only
correct but also quite unattainable for lower mathematics.

But even lower mathematics teems with contradictions. It is for example
a contradiction that a root of A should be a power of A, and yet A^(1/2)
= [square root of A]. It is a contradiction that a negative quantity
should be the square of anything, for every negative quantity multiplied
by itself gives a positive square. The square root of minus one is
therefore not only a contradiction, but even an absurd contradiction, a
real absurdity. And yet [square root of minus one] is in many cases a
necessary result of correct mathematical operations. Furthermore, where
would mathematics — lower or higher — be, if it were prohibited from
operation with [square root of minus one]?

In its operations with variable quantities mathematics itself enters the
field of dialectics, and it is significant that it was a dialectical
philosopher, Descartes, who introduced this advance. The relation
between the mathematics of variable and the mathematics of constant
quantities is in general the same as the relation of dialectical to
metaphysical thought. But this does not prevent the great mass of
mathematicians from recognising dialectics only in the sphere of
mathematics, and a good many of them from continuing to work in the old,
limited, metaphysical way with methods that were obtained dialectically.

It would be possible to go more closely into Herr Dühring’s antagonism
of forces and his antagonistic world schematism only if he had given us
something more on this theme than the mere _phrase_. After accomplishing
this feat this antagonism is not even once shown to us at work, either
in his world schematism or in his natural philosophy — the most
convincing admission that Herr Dühring can do absolutely nothing of a
positive character with his “basic form of all actions in the life of
the world and its creatures”. When someone has in fact lowered Hegel’s
“Doctrine of Essence” to the platitude of forces moving in opposite
directions but not in contradictions, certainly the best thing he can do
is to avoid any application of this commonplace.

Marx's _Capital_ furnishes Herr Dühring with another occasion for
venting his anti-dialectical spleen.

“The absence of natural and intelligible logic which characterises these
dialectical frills and mazes and conceptual arabesques... Even to the
part that has already appeared we must apply the principle that in a
certain respect and also in general” (!), “according to a well-known
philosophical preconception, all is to be sought in each and each in
all, and that therefore, according to this mixed and misconceived idea,
it all amounts to one and the same thing in the end” {D. K. G. 496}.

This insight into the well-known philosophical preconception also
enables Herr Dühring to prophesy with assurance what will be the “end”
of Marx's economic philosophising, that is, what the following volumes
of _Capital_ will contain, and this he does exactly seven lines after he
has declared that

“speaking in plain human language it is really impossible to divine what
is still to come in the two” (final) “volumes” ^([61]) {496}.

This, however, is not the first time that Herr Dühring’s writings are
revealed to us as belonging to the “things” in which “contradiction is
objectively present and can be met with in so to speak corporeal form”
{479-80}. But this does not prevent him from going on victoriously as
follows:

“Yet sound logic will in all probability triumph over its caricature...
This presence of superiority and this mysterious dialectical rubbish
will tempt no one who has even a modicum of sound judgment left to have
anything to do ... with these deformities of thought and style. With the
demise of the last relics of the dialectical follies this means of
duping ... will lose its deceptive influence, and no one will any longer
believe that he has to torture himself in order to get behind some
profound piece of wisdom where the husked kernel of the abstruse things
reveals at best the features of ordinary theories if not of absolute
commonplaces... It is quite impossible to reproduce the” (Marxian) “maze
in accordance with the Logos doctrine without prostituting sound logic”
{D. K. C. 497}. Marx's method, according to Herr Dühring, consists in
“performing dialectical miracles for his faithful followers” {498}, and
so on.

We are not in any way concerned here as yet with the correctness or
incorrectness of the economic results of Marx's researches, but only
with the dialectical method used by Marx. But this much is certain: most
readers of _Capital_ will have learnt for the first time from Herr
Dühring what it is in fact that they have read. And among them will also
be Herr Dühring himself, who in the year 1867 _(Ergänzungsblätter_ III,
No. 3) was still able to provide what for a thinker of his calibre was a
relatively rational review of the book; and he did this without first
being obliged as he now declares is indispensable, to translate the
Marxian argument into Dühringian language. And though even then he
committed the blunder of identifying Marxian dialectics with the
Hegelian, he had not quite lost the capacity to distinguish between the
method and the results obtained by using it, and to understand that the
latter are not refuted in detail by lampooning the former in general.

At any rate, the most astonishing piece of information given by Herr
Dühring is the statement that from the Marxian standpoint “it all
amounts to one and the same thing in the end” {496}, that therefore to
Marx, for example, capitalists and wage-workers, feudal, capitalist and
socialist modes of production are also “one and the same thing” — no
doubt in the end even Marx and Herr Dühring are “one and the same
thing”. Such utter nonsense can only be explained if we suppose that the
mere mention of the word dialectics throws Herr Dühring into such a
state of mental irresponsibility that, as a result of a certain mixed
and misconceived idea, what he says and does is “one and the same thing”
in the end.

We have here a sample of what Herr Dühring calls

“my historical depiction in the grand style” {556}, or “the summary
treatment which settles with genus and type, and does not condescend to
honour what a Hume called the learned mob with an exposure in
micrological detail; this treatment in a higher and nobler style is the
only one compatible with the interests of complete truth and with one's
duty to the public which is free from the bonds of the guilds” {507}.

Historical depiction in the grand style and the summary settlement with
genus and type is indeed very convenient for Herr Dühring, inasmuch as
this method enables him to neglect all known facts as micrological and
equate them to zero, so that instead of proving anything he need only
use general phrases, make assertions and thunder his denunciations. The
method has the further advantage that it offers no real foothold to an
opponent, who is consequently left with almost no other possibility of
reply than to make similar summary assertions in the grand style, to
resort to general phrases and finally thunder back denunciations at Herr
Dühring — in a word, as they say, engage in a clanging match, which is
not to everyone“s taste. We must therefore be grateful to Herr Dühring
for occasionally, by way of exception, dropping the higher and nobler
style, and giving us at least two examples of the unsound Marxian Logos
doctrine.

“How comical is the reference to the confused, hazy Hegelian notion that
quantity changes into quality, and that therefore an advance, when it
reaches a certain size, becomes capital by this quantitative increase
alone” {498}.

In this “expurgated” presentation by Herr Dühring that statement
certainly seems curious enough. Let us see how it looks in the original,
in Marx. On page 313 (2nd edition of _Capital_), Marx, on the basis of
his previous examination of constant and variable capital and
surplus-value, draws the conclusion that “not every sum of money, or of
value, is at pleasure transformable into capital. To effect this
transformation, in fact, a certain minimum of money or of exchange-value
must be presupposed in the hands of the individual possessor of money or
commodities.” He takes as an example the case of a labourer in any
branch of industry, who works daily eight hours for himself — that is,
in producing the value of his wages — and the following four hours for
the capitalist, in producing surplus-value, which immediately flows into
the pocket of the capitalist. In this case, one would have to have at
his disposal a sum of values sufficient to enable one to provide two
labourers with raw materials, instruments of labour and wages, in order
to pocket enough surplus-value every day to live on as well as one of
his labourers. And as the aim of capitalist production is not mere
subsistence but the increase of wealth, our man with his two labourers
would still not be a capitalist. Now in order that he may live twice as
well as an ordinary labourer, and turn half of the surplus-value
produced again into capital, he would have to be able to employ eight
labourers, that is, he would have to possess four times the sum of
values assumed above. And it is only after this, and in the course of
still further explanations elucidating and substantiating the fact that
not every petty sum of values is enough to be transformable into
capital, but that in this respect each period of development and each
branch of industry has its definite minimum sum, that Marx observes:
“Here, as in natural science, _is shown_ the correctness of the law
discovered by Hegel in his _Logic_, that merely quantitative changes
beyond a certain point pass into qualitative differences.”

And now let the reader admire the higher and nobler style, by virtue of
which Herr Dühring attributes to Marx the opposite of what he really
said. Marx says: The fact that a sum of values can be transformed into
capital only when it has reached a certain size, varying according to
the circumstances, but in each case definite minimum size — this fact is
a _proof of the correctness_ of the Hegelian law. Herr Dühring makes him
say: _Because_, according to the Hegelian law, quantity changes into
quality, “_therefore_ an advance, when it reaches a certain size,
becomes capital” {D. K. G. 498}. That is to say, the very opposite.

In connection with Herr Dühring’s examination of the Darwin case, we
have already got to know his habit, “in the interests of complete truth”
and because of his “duty to the public which is free from the bonds of
the guilds” {507}, of quoting incorrectly. It becomes more and more
evident that this habit is an inner necessity of the philosophy of
reality, and it is certainly a very “summary treatment” {507}. Not to
mention the fact that Herr Dühring further makes Marx speak of any kind
of “advance” whatsoever, whereas Marx only refers to an advance made in
the form of raw materials, instruments of labour, and wages; and that in
doing this Herr Dühring succeeds in making Marx speak pure nonsense. And
then he has the cheek to describe as _comic_ the nonsense which he
himself has fabricated. Just as he built up a Darwin of his own fantasy
in order to try out his strength against him, so here he builds up a
fantastic Marx. “Historical depiction in the grand style” {556}, indeed!

We have already seen earlier, when discussing world schematism, that in
connection with this Hegelian nodal line of measure relations — in which
quantitative change suddenly passes at certain points into qualitative
transformation — Herr Dühring had a little accident: in a weak moment he
himself recognised and made use of this line. We gave there one of the
best-known examples — that of the change of the aggregate states of
water, which under normal atmospheric pressure changes at 0° C from the
liquid into the solid state, and at 100°C from the liquid into the
gaseous state, so that at both these turning-points the merely
quantitative change of temperature brings about a qualitative change in
the condition of the water.

In proof of this law we might have cited hundreds of other similar facts
from nature as well as from human society. Thus, for example, the whole
of Part IV of Marx's _Capital_ — production of relative surplus-value —
deals, in the field of co-operation, division of labour and manufacture,
machinery and modern industry, with innumerable cases in which
quantitative change alters the quality, and also qualitative change
alters the quantity, of the things under consideration; in which
therefore, to use the expression so hated by Herr Dühring, quantity is
transformed into quality and vice versa. As for example the fact that
the co-operation of a number of people, the fusion of many forces into
one single force, creates, to use Marx's phrase, a “new power”, which is
essentially different from the sum of its separate forces.

Over and above this, in the passage which, in the interests of complete
truth, Herr Dühring perverted into its opposite, Marx had added a
footnote: “The molecular theory of modern chemistry first scientifically
worked out by Laurent and Gerhardt rests on no other law.” But what did
that matter to Herr Dühring? He knew that:

“the eminently modern educative elements provided by the
natural-scientific mode of thought are lacking precisely among those
who, like Marx and his rival Lassalle, make half-science and a little
philosophistics the meagre equipment with which to vamp up their
learning” {D. K. G. 504} —

while with Herr Dühring

“the main achievements of exact knowledge in mechanics, physics and
chemistry” {D. Ph. 517} and so forth serve as the basis —

we have seen how. However, in order to enable third persons, too, to
reach a decision in the matter, we shall look a little more closely into
the example cited in Marx's footnote.

What is referred to here is the homologous series of carbon compounds,
of which a great many are already known and each of which has its own
algebraic formula of composition. If, for example, as is done in
chemistry, we denote an atom of carbon by C, an atom of hydrogen by H,
an atom of oxygen by O, and the number of atoms of carbon contained in
each compound by n, the molecular formulas for some of these series can
be expressed as follows:

C_(n)H_(2n+2) — the series of normal paraffins
C_(n)H_(2n+2)O — the series of primary alcohols
C_(n)H_(2n)O₂ — the series of the monobasic fatty acids.

Let us take as an example the last of these series, and let us assume
successively that n=l, n=2, n=3, etc. We then obtain the following
results (omitting the isomers):

CH₂O₂ — formic acid: boiling point 100° melting point 1°
C₂H₄O₂ — acetic acid: 118° melting point 17°
C₃H₆O₂ — propionic acid: 140° " "
C₈H₈O₂ — butyric acid: 162°
C₅H₁₀O₂ — valerianic acid: 175°

and so on to C₅₀H₆₀O₂, melissic acid, which melts only at 80° and has no
boiling point at all, because it cannot evaporate without
disintegrating.

Here therefore we have a whole series of qualitatively different bodies,
formed by the simple quantitative addition of elements, and in fact
always in the same proportion. This is most clearly evident in cases
where the quantity of all the elements of the compound changes in the
same proportion. Thus, in the normal paraffins C_(n)H_(2n+2), the lowest
is methane, CH4, a gas; the highest known, hexadecane, C₁₆H₃₄, is a
solid body forming colourless crystals which melts at 21° and boils only
at 278°. Each new member of both series comes into existence through the
addition of CH2, one atom of carbon and two atoms of hydrogen, to the
molecular formula of the preceding member, and this quantitative change
in the molecular formula produces each time a qualitatively different
body.

These series, however, are only one particularly obvious example;
throughout practically the whole of chemistry, even in the various
nitrogen oxides and oxygen acids of phosphorus or sulphur, one can see
how “quantity changes into quality”, and this allegedly confused, hazy
Hegelian notion appears in so to speak corporeal form in things and
processes — and no one but Herr Dühring is confused and befogged by it.
And if Marx was the first to call attention to it, and if Herr Dühring
read the reference without even understanding it (otherwise he would
certainly not have allowed this unparalleled outrage to pass
unchallenged), this is enough — even without looking back at the famous
Dühringian philosophy of nature — to make it clear which of the two,
Marx or Herr Dühring, is lacking in “the eminently modern educative
elements provided by the natural-scientific mode of thought” {D. K. G.
504} and in acquaintance with the “main achievements of ... chemistry”
{D. Ph. 517}.

In conclusion we shall call one more witness for the transformation of
quantity into quality, namely — Napoleon. He describes the combat
between the French cavalry, who were bad riders but disciplined, and the
Mamelukes, who were undoubtedly the best horsemen of their time for
single combat, but lacked discipline, as follows:

“Two Mamelukes were undoubtedly more than a match for three Frenchmen;
100 Mamelukes were equal to 100 Frenchmen; 300 Frenchmen could generally
beat 300 Mamelukes, and 1,000 Frenchmen invariably defeated 1,500
Mamelukes.”

Just as with Marx a definite, though varying, minimum sum of
exchange-values was necessary to make possible its transformation into
capital, so with Napoleon a detachment of cavalry had to be of a
definite minimum number in order to make it possible for the force of
discipline, embodied in closed order and planned utilisation, to
manifest itself and rise superior even to greater numbers of irregular
cavalry, in spite of the latter being better mounted, more dexterous
horsemen and fighters, and at least as brave as the former. But what
does this prove as against Herr Dühring? Was not Napoleon miserably
vanquished in his conflict with Europe? Did he not suffer defeat after
defeat? And why? Solely in consequence of having introduced the
confused, hazy Hegelian notion into cavalry tactics!

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Anti-Dühring by Frederick Engels 1877
Part I: Philosophy

XIII. Dialectics. Negation of the Negation

“This historical sketch” (of the genesis of the so-called primitive
accumulation of capital in England) “is relatively the best part of
Marx's book, and would be even better if it had not relied on the
dialectical crutch to help out its scholarly crutch. The Hegelian
negation of the negation, in default of anything better and clearer, has
in fact to serve here as the midwife to deliver the future from the womb
of the past. The abolition of ‘individual property’, which since the
sixteenth century has been effected in the way indicated above, is the
first negation. It will be followed by a second, which bears the
character of a negation of the negation and hence of a restoration of
‘individual property’, but in a higher form, based on the common
ownership of land and of the instruments of labour. Herr Marx calls this
new ‘individual property’ also ‘social property’, and in this there
appears the Hegelian higher unity, in which the contradiction is
supposed to be sublated, that is to say, in the Hegelian verbal
jugglery, both overcome and preserved... According to this, the
expropriation of the expropriators is, as it were, the automatic result
of historical reality in its materially external relations... It would
be difficult to convince a sensible man of the necessity of the common
ownership of land and capital, on the basis of credence in Hegelian
wordjuggling such as the negation of the negation {D. K. G. 502-03}...
The nebulous hybrids of Marx’s conceptions will not however appear
strange to anyone who realises what nonsense can be concocted with
Hegelian dialectics as the scientific basis, or rather what nonsense
must necessarily spring from it. For the benefit of the reader who is
not familiar with these artifices, it must be pointed out expressly that
Hegel’s first negation is the catechismal idea of the fall from grace
and his second is that of a higher unity leading to redemption. The
logic of facts can hardly be based on this nonsensical analogy borrowed
from the religious sphere {504} ... Herr Marx remains cheerfully in the
nebulous world of his property which is at once both individual and
social and leaves it to his adepts to solve for themselves this profound
dialectical enigma” {505}

Thus far Herr Dühring.

So Marx has no other way of proving the necessity of the social
revolution, of establishing the common ownership of land and of the
means of production produced by labour, except by citing the Hegelian
negation of the negation; and because he bases his socialist theory on
these nonsensical analogies borrowed from religion, he arrives at the
result that in the society of the future there will be dominant an
ownership at once both individual and social, as Hegelian higher unity
of the sublated contradiction.

But let the negation of the negation rest for the moment and let us have
a look at the “ownership” which is “at once both individual and social”.
Herr Dühring characterises this as a “nebulous world”, and curiously
enough he is really right on this point. Unfortunately, however, it is
not Marx but again Herr Dühring himself who is in this nebulous world.
Just as his dexterity in handling the Hegelian method of “delirious
raving” {D. Ph. 227, 449} enabled him without any difficulty to
determine what the still unfinished volumes of _Capital_ are sure to
contain, so here, too, without any great effort he can put Marx right _à
la_ Hegel, by imputing to him the higher unity of a property, of which
there is not a word in Marx.

Marx says: “It is the negation of negation. This re-establishes
individual property, but on the basis of the acquisitions of the
capitalist era, i.e., on co-operation of free workers and their
possession in common of the land and of the means of production produced
by labour. The transformation of scattered private property, arising
from individual labour, into capitalist private property is, naturally,
a process, incomparably more protracted, arduous, and difficult, than
the transformation of capitalistic private property, already practically
resting on socialised production, into socialised property.” [K. Marx,
_Das Kapital_, p. 793.] [Capital, volume I, Chapter 33, page 384 in the
MIA pdf file.] That is all. The state of things brought about by the
expropriation of the expropriators is therefore characterised as the
re-establishment of individual property, but _on the basis_ of the
social ownership of the land and of the means of production produced by
labour itself. To anyone who understands plain talk this means that
social ownership extends to the land and the other means of production,
and individual ownership to the products, that is, the articles of
consumption. And in order to make the matter comprehensible even to
children of six, Marx assumes on page 56 [Chapter 1, page 48 in the MIA
pdf] “a community of free individuals, carrying on their work with the
means of production in common, in which the labour-power of all the
different individuals is consciously applied as the combined
labour-power of the community”, that is, a society organised on a
socialist basis; and he continues: “The total product of our community
is a social product. One portion serves as fresh means of production and
_remains social._ But another portion is consumed by the members as
means of subsistence. A _distribution of this portion amongst them is
consequently necessary_.” And surely that is clear enough even for Herr
Dühring, in spite of his having Hegel on his brain.

The property which is at once both individual and social, this confusing
hybrid, this nonsense which necessarily springs from Hegelian
dialectics, this nebulous world, this profound dialectical enigma, which
Marx leaves his adepts to solve for themselves — is yet another free
creation and imagination on the part of Herr Dühring. Marx, as an
alleged Hegelian, is obliged to produce a real higher unity, as the
outcome of the negation of the negation, and as Marx does not do this to
Herr Dühring's taste, the latter has to fall again into his higher and
nobler style, and in the interests of complete truth impute to Marx
things which are the products of Herr Dühring's own manufacture. A man
who is totally incapable of quoting correctly, even by way of exception,
may well become morally indignant at the “Chinese erudition” {D. K. G.
506} of other people, who always quote correctly, but precisely by doing
this “inadequately conceal their lack of insight into the totality of
ideas of the various writers from whom they quote”. Herr Dühring is
right. Long live historical depiction in the grand style {556}!

Up to this point we have proceeded from the assumption that Herr
Dühring's persistent habit of misquoting is done at least in good faith,
and arises either from his total incapacity to understand things or from
a habit of quoting from memory — a habit which seems to be peculiar to
historical depiction in the grand style, but is usually described as
slovenly. But we seem to have reached the point at which, even with Herr
Dühring, quantity is transformed into quality. For we must take into
consideration in the first place that the passage in Marx is in itself
perfectly clear and is moreover amplified in the same book by a further
passage which leaves no room whatever for misunderstanding; secondly,
that Herr Dühring had discovered the monstrosity of “property which is
at once both individual and social” {505} neither in the critique of
_Capital_, in the _Ergänzungsblätter_ which was referred to above, nor
even in the critique contained in the first edition of his _Kritische
Geschichte_, but only in the second edition — that is, on the _third_
reading of _Capital;_ further, that in this second edition, which was
rewritten in a socialist sense, it was deemed necessary by Herr Dühring
to make Marx say the utmost possible nonsense about the future
organisation of society, in order to enable him, in contrast, to bring
forward all the more triumphantly — as he in fact does — “the economic
commune as described by _me_ in economic and juridical outline in my
_Cursus”_ {504} — when we take all this into consideration, we are
almost forced to the conclusion that Herr Dühring has here deliberately
made a “beneficent extension” of Marx's idea — beneficent for Herr
Dühring.

But what role does the negation of the negation play in Marx? On page
791 and the following pages he sets out the final conclusions which he
draws from the preceding fifty pages of economic and historical
investigation into the so-called primitive accumulation of capital.
^([62]) Before the capitalist era, petty industry existed, at least in
England, on the basis of the private property of the labourer in his
means of production. The so-called primitive accumulation of capital
consisted there in the expropriation of these immediate producers, that
is, in the dissolution of private property based on the labour of its
owner. This became possible because the petty industry referred to above
is compatible only with narrow and primitive bounds of production and
society and at a certain stage brings forth the material agencies for
its own annihilation. This annihilation, the transformation of the
individual and scattered means of production into socially concentrated
ones, forms the prehistory of capital. As soon as the labourers are
turned into proletarians, their conditions of labour into capital, as
soon as the capitalist mode of production stands on its own feet, the
further socialisation of labour and further transformation of the land
and other means of production, and therefore the further expropriation
of private proprietors, takes a new form.

“That which is now to be expropriated is no longer the labourer working
for himself, but the capitalist exploiting many labourers. This
expropriation is accomplished by the action of the immanent laws of
capitalistic production itself, by the concentration of capitals. One
capitalist always kills many. Hand in hand with this concentration, or
this expropriation of many capitalists by few, develop, on an ever
extending scale, the co-operative form of the labour-process, the
conscious technical application of science, the methodical collective
cultivation of the soil, the transformation of the instruments of labour
into instruments of labour only usable in common, the economising of all
means of production by their use as the jointly owned means of
production of combined, socialised labour. Along with the constantly
diminishing number of the magnates of capital, who usurp and monopolise
all advantages of this process of transformation, grows the mass of
misery, oppression, slavery, degradation, exploitation; but with this
too grows the revolt of the working class, a class always increasing in
numbers, and disciplined, united, organised by the very mechanism of the
process of capitalist production itself. Capital becomes a fetter upon
the mode of production, which has sprung up and flourished along with,
and under it. Concentration of the means of production and socialisation
of labour at last reach a point where they become incompatible with
their capitalist integument. This integument is burst asunder. The knell
of capitalist private property sounds. The expropriators are
expropriated.”

And now I ask the reader: where are the dialectical frills and mazes and
conceptual arabesques; where the mixed and misconceived ideas according
to which everything is all one and the same thing in the end; where the
dialectical miracles for his faithful followers; where the mysterious
dialectical rubbish and the maze in accordance with the Hegelian Logos
doctrine, without which Marx, according to Herr Dühring, is unable to
put his exposition into shape? Marx merely shows from history, and here
states in a summarised form, that just as formerly petty industry by its
very development necessarily created the conditions of its own
annihilation, i.e., of the expropriation of the small proprietors, so
now the capitalist mode of production has likewise itself created the
material conditions from which it must perish. The process is a
historical one, and if it is at the same time a dialectical process,
this is not Marx's fault, however annoying it may be to Herr Dühring.

It is only at this point, after Marx has completed his proof on the
basis of historical and economic facts, that he proceeds:

“The capitalist mode of production and appropriation, hence the
capitalist private property, is the first negation of individual private
property founded on the labour of the proprietor. Capitalist production
begets, with the inexorability of a process of nature, its own negation.
It is the negation of the negation” — and so on (as quoted above).

Thus, by characterising the process as the negation of the negation,
Marx does not intend to prove that the process was historically
necessary. On the contrary: only after he has proved from history that
in fact the process has partially already occurred, and partially must
occur in the future, he in addition characterises it as a process which
develops in accordance with a definite dialectical law. That is all. It
is therefore once again a pure distortion of the facts by Herr Dühring
when he declares that the negation of the negation has to serve here as
the midwife to deliver the future from the womb of the past {D. K. G.
502-03}, or that Marx wants anyone to be convinced of the necessity of
the common ownership of land and capital {503} (which is itself a
Dühringian contradiction in corporeal form) on the basis of credence in
the negation of the negation {479-80}.

Herr Dühring's total lack of understanding of the nature of dialectics
is shown by the very fact that he regards it as a mere proof-producing
instrument, as a limited mind might look upon formal logic or elementary
mathematics. Even formal logic is primarily a method of arriving at new
results, of advancing from the known to the unknown — and dialectics is
the same, only much more eminently so; moreover, since it forces its way
beyond the narrow horizon of formal logic, it contains the germ of a
more comprehensive view of the world. The same correlation exists in
mathematics. Elementary mathematics, the mathematics of constant
quantities, moves within the confines of formal logic, at any rate on
the whole; the mathematics of variables, whose most important part is
the infinitesimal calculus, is in essence nothing other than the
application of dialectics to mathematical relations. In it, the simple
question of proof is definitely pushed into the background, as compared
with the manifold application of the method to new spheres of research.
But almost all the proofs of higher mathematics, from the first proofs
of the differential calculus on, are from the standpoint of elementary
mathematics strictly speaking, wrong. And this is necessarily so, when,
as happens in this case, an attempt is made to prove by formal logic
results obtained in the field of dialectics. To attempt to prove
anything by means of dialectics alone to a crass metaphysician like Herr
Dühring would be as much a waste of time as was the attempt made by
Leibniz and his pupils to prove the principles of the infinitesimal
calculus to the mathematicians of their time. The differential gave them
the same cramps as Herr Dühring gets from the negation of the negation,
in which, moreover, as we shall see, the differential also plays a
certain role. Finally these gentlemen — or those of them who had not
died in the interval — grudgingly gave way, not because they were
convinced, but because it always came out right. Herr Dühring, as he
himself tells us, is only in his forties, and if he attains old age, as
we hope he may, perhaps his experience will be the same.

But what then is this fearful negation of the negation, which makes life
so bitter for Herr Dühring and with him plays the same role of the
unpardonable crime as the sin against the Holy Ghost does in
Christianity? — A very simple process which is taking place everywhere
and every day, which any child can understand as soon as it is stripped
of the veil of mystery in which it was enveloped by the old idealist
philosophy and in which it is to the advantage of helpless
metaphysicians of Herr Dühring’s calibre to keep it enveloped. Let us
take a grain of barley. Billions of such grains of barley are milled,
boiled and brewed and then consumed. But if such a grain of barley meets
with conditions which are normal for it, if it falls on suitable soil,
then under the influence of heat and moisture it undergoes a specific
change, it germinates; the grain as such ceases to exist, it is negated,
and in its place appears the plant which has arisen from it, the
negation of the grain. But what is the normal life-process of this
plant? It grows, flowers, is fertilised and finally once more produces
grains of barley, and as soon as these have ripened the stalk dies, is
in its turn negated. As a result of this negation of the negation we
have once again the original grain of barley, but not as a single unit,
but ten-, twenty- or thirtyfold. Species of grain change extremely
slowly, and so the barley of today is almost the same as it was a
century ago. But if we take a plastic ornamental plant, for example a
dahlia or an orchid, and treat the seed and the plant which grows from
it according to the gardener’s art, we get as a result of this negation
of the negation not only more seeds, but also qualitatively improved
seeds, which produce more beautiful flowers, and each repetition of this
process, each fresh negation of the negation, enhances this process of
perfection. — With most insects, this process follows the same lines as
in the case of the grain of barley. Butterflies, for example, spring
from the egg by a negation of the egg, pass through certain
transformations until they reach sexual maturity, pair and are in turn
negated, dying as soon as the pairing process has been completed and the
female has laid its numerous eggs. We are not concerned at the moment
with the fact that with other plants and animals the process does not
take such a simple form, that before they die they produce seeds, eggs
or offspring not once but many times; our purpose here is only to show
that the negation of the negation _really does take place_ in both
kingdoms of the organic world. Furthermore, the whole of geology is a
series of negated negations, a series of successive chatterings of old
and deposits of new rock formations. First the original earth crust
brought into existence by the cooling of the liquid mass was broken up
by oceanic, meteorological and atmospherico-chemical action, and these
fragmented masses were stratified on the ocean bed. Local upheavals of
the ocean bed above the surface of the sea subject portions of these
first strata once more to the action of rain, the changing temperature
of the seasons and the oxygen and carbonic acid of the atmosphere. These
same influences act on the molten masses of rock which issue from the
interior of the earth, break through the strata and subsequently cool
off. In this way, in the course of millions of centuries, ever new
strata are formed and in turn are for the most part destroyed, ever anew
serving as material for the formation of new strata. But the result of
this process has been a very positive one: the creation of a soil
composed of the most varied chemical elements and mechanically
fragmented, which makes possible the most abundant and diversified
vegetation.

It is the same in mathematics. Let us take any algebraic quantity
whatever: for example, a. If this is negated, we get -a (minus _a)._ If
we negate that negation, by multiplying -_a_ by -_a_, we get +a², i.e.,
the original positive quantity, but at a higher degree, raised to its
second power. In this case also it makes no difference that we can
obtain the same a² by multiplying the positive _a_ by itself, thus
likewise getting a². For the negated negation is so securely entrenched
in a² that the latter always has two square roots, namely, _a_ and —
_a._ And the fact that it is impossible to get rid of the negated
negation, the negative root of the square, acquires very obvious
significance as soon as we come to quadratic equations. — The negation
of the negation is even more strikingly obvious in higher analysis, in
those “summations of indefinitely small magnitudes” {D. Ph. 418} which
Herr Dühring himself declares are the highest operations of mathematics,
and in ordinary language are known as the differential and integral
calculus. How are these forms of calculus used? In a given problem, for
example, I have two variables,_x_ and _y_, neither of which can vary
without the other also varying in a ratio determined by the facts of the
case. I differentiate _x_ and _y_, i.e., I take _x_ and _y_ as so
infinitely small that in comparison with any real quantity, however
small, they disappear, that nothing is left of _x_ and _y_ but their
reciprocal relation without any, so to speak, material basis, a
quantitative ratio in which there is no quantity. Therefore, _dy_/_dx_,
the ratio between the differentials of _x_ and _y_, is _dx_ equal to 0/0
but 0/0 taken as the expression of _y_/_x_. I only mention in passing
that this ratio between two quantities which have disappeared, caught at
the moment of their disappearance, is a contradiction; however, it
cannot disturb us any more than it has disturbed the whole of
mathematics for almost two hundred years. And now, what have I done but
negate_x_ and _y_, though not in such a way that I need not bother about
them any more, not in the way that metaphysics negates, but in the way
that corresponds with the facts of the case? In place of_x_ and _y_,
therefore, I have their negation, _dx_ and _dy_, in the formulas or
equations before me. I continue then to operate with these formulas,
treating _dx_ and _dy_ as quantities which are real, though subject to
certain exceptional laws, and at a certain point I _negate the
negation_, i.e., I integrate the differential formula, and in place of
_dx_ and _dy_ again get the real quantities _x_ and _y_, and am then not
where I was at the beginning, but by using this method I have solved the
problem on which ordinary geometry and algebra might perhaps have broken
their jaws in vain.

It is the same in history, as well. All civilised peoples begin with the
common ownership of the land. With all peoples who have passed a certain
primitive stage, this common ownership becomes in the course of the
development of agriculture a fetter on production. It is abolished,
negated, and after a longer or shorter series of intermediate stages is
transformed into private property. But at a higher stage of agricultural
development, brought about by private property in land itself, private
property conversely becomes a fetter on production, as is the case today
both with small and large landownership. The demand that it, too, should
be negated, that it should once again be transformed into common
property, necessarily arises. But this demand does not mean the
restoration of the aboriginal common ownership, but the institution of a
far higher and more developed form of possession in common which, far
from being a hindrance to production, on the contrary for the first time
will free production from all fetters and enable it to make full use of
modern chemical discoveries and mechanical inventions.

Or let us take another example: The philosophy of antiquity was
primitive, spontaneously evolved materialism. As such, it was incapable
of clearing up the relation between mind and matter. But the need to get
clarity on this question led to the doctrine of a soul separable from
the body, then to the assertion of the immortality of this soul, and
finally to monotheism. The old materialism was therefore negated by
idealism. But in the course of the further development of philosophy,
idealism, too, became untenable and was negated by modern materialism.
This modern materialism, the negation of the negation, is not the mere
re-establishment of the old, but adds to the permanent foundations of
this old materialism the whole thought-content of two thousand years of
development of philosophy and natural science, as well as of the history
of these two thousand years. It is no longer a philosophy at all, but
simply a world outlook which has to establish its validity and be
applied not in a science of sciences standing apart, but in the real
sciences. Philosophy is therefore “sublated” here, that is, “both
overcome and preserved” {D. K. G. 503}; overcome as regards its form,
and preserved as regards its real content. Thus, where Herr Dühring sees
only “verbal jugglery”, closer inspection reveals an actual content.

Finally: Even the Rousseau doctrine of equality — of which Dühring's is
only a feeble and distorted echo — could not have seen the light but for
the midwife’s services rendered by the Hegelian negation of the negation
{502-03} — though it was nearly twenty years before Hegel was born.
^([63]) And far from being ashamed of this, the doctrine in its first
presentation bears almost ostentatiously the imprint of its dialectical
origin. In the state of nature and savagery men were equal; and as
Rousseau regards even language as a perversion of the state of nature,
he is fully justified in extending the equality of animals within the
limits of a single species also to the animal-men recently classified by
Haeckel hypothetically as _Alali_: speechless. But these equal
animal-men had one quality which gave them an advantage over the other
animals: perfectibility, the capacity to develop further; and this
became the cause of inequality. So Rousseau regards the rise of
inequality as progress. But this progress contained an antagonism: it
was at the same time retrogression.

“All further progress” (beyond the original state) “meant so many steps
seemingly towards the _perfection of the individual man_, but in reality
towards the _decay of the race..._ Metallurgy and agriculture were the
two arts the discovery of which produced this great revolution” (the
transformation of the primeval forest into cultivated land, but along
with this the introduction of poverty and slavery through property).
“For the poet it is gold and silver, but for the philosopher iron and
corn, which have civilised _men_ and ruined the human race.”

Each new advance of civilisation is at the same time a new advance of
inequality. All institutions set up by the society which has arisen with
civilisation change into the opposite of their original purpose.

“It is an incontestable fact, and the fundamental principle of all
public law, that the peoples set up their chieftains to safeguard their
liberty and not to enslave them.”

And nevertheless the chiefs necessarily become the oppressors of the
peoples, and intensify their oppression up to the point at which
inequality, carried to the utmost extreme, again changes into its
opposite, becomes the cause of equality: before the despot all are equal
— equally ciphers.

“Here we have the extreme measure of inequality, _the final point which
completes the circle and meets the point from which we set out:_ here
all private individuals become equal once more, just because they are
ciphers, and the subjects have no other law but their master's will.”
But the despot is only master so long as he is able to use force and
therefore “when he is driven out”, he cannot “complain of the use of
force... Force alone maintained him in power, and force alone overthrows
him; thus everything takes its natural course”.

And so inequality once more changes into equality; not, however, into
the former naive equality of speechless primitive men, but into the
higher equality of the social contract. The oppressors are oppressed. It
is the negation of the negation.

Already in Rousseau, therefore, we find not only a line of thought which
corresponds exactly to the one developed in Marx’s _Capital_, but also,
in details, a whole series of the same dialectical turns of speech as
Marx used: processes which in their nature are antagonistic, contain a
contradiction; transformation of one extreme into its opposite; and
finally, as the kernel of the whole thing, the negation of the negation.
And though in 1754 Rousseau was not yet able to speak the Hegelian
jargon {D. K. G. 491}, he was certainly, sixteen years before Hegel was
born, deeply bitten with the Hegelian pestilence, dialectics of
contradiction, Logos doctrine, theologies, and so forth. And when Herr
Dühring, in his shallow version of Rousseau’s theory of equality, begins
to operate with his victorious two men, he is himself already on the
inclined plane down which he must slide helplessly into the arms of the
negation of the negation. The state of things in which the equality of
the two men flourished, which was also described as an ideal one, is
characterised on page 271 of his _Philosophie_ as the “primitive state”.
This primitive state, however, according to page 279, was necessarily
sublated by the “robber system” — the first negation. But now, thanks to
the philosophy of reality, we have gone so far as to abolish the robber
system and establish in its stead the economic commune {504} based on
equality which has been discovered by Herr Dühring — negation of the
negation, equality on a higher plane. What a delightful spectacle, and
how beneficently it extends our range of vision: Herr Dühring's eminent
self committing the capital crime of the negation of the negation!

And so, what is the negation of the negation? An extremely general — and
for this reason extremely far-reaching and important — law of
development of nature, history, and thought; a law which, as we have
seen, holds good in the animal and plant kingdoms, in geology, in
mathematics, in history and in philosophy — a law which even Herr
Dühring, in spite of all his stubborn resistance, has unwittingly and in
his own way to follow. It is obvious that I do not say anything
concerning the _particular_ process of development of, for example, a
grain of barley from germination to the death of the fruit-bearing
plant, if I say it is a negation of the negation. For, as the integral
calculus is also a negation of the negation, if I said anything of the
sort I should only be making the nonsensical statement that the
life-process of a barley plant was integral calculus or for that matter
that it was socialism. That, however, is precisely what the
metaphysicians are constantly imputing to dialectics. When I say that
all these processes are a negation of the negation, I bring them all
together under this one law of motion, and for this very reason I leave
out of account the specific peculiarities of each individual process.
Dialectics, however, is nothing more than the science of the general
laws of motion and development of nature, human society and thought.

But someone may object: the negation that has taken place in this case
is not a real negation: I negate a grain of barley also when I grind it,
an insect when I crush it underfoot, or the positive quantity _a_ when I
cancel it, and so on. Or I negate the sentence: the rose is a rose, when
I say: the rose is not a rose; and what do I get if I then negate this
negation and say: but after all the rose is a rose? — These objections
are in fact the chief arguments put forward by the metaphysicians
against dialectics, and they are wholly worthy of the narrow-mindedness
of this mode of thought. Negation in dialectics does not mean simply
saying no, or declaring that something does not exist, or destroying it
in any way one likes. Long ago Spinoza said: _Omnis determinatio est
negatio_ — every limitation or determination is at the same time a
negation. ^([64]) And further: the kind of negation is here determined,
firstly, by the general and, secondly, by the particular nature of the
process. I must not only negate, but also sublate the negation. I must
therefore so arrange the first negation that the second remains or
becomes possible. How? This depends on the particular nature of each
individual case. If I grind a grain of barley, or crush an insect, I
have carried out the first part of the action, but have made the second
part impossible. Every kind of thing therefore has a peculiar way of
being negated in such manner that it gives rise to a development, and it
is just the same with every kind of conception or idea. The
infinitesimal calculus involves a form of negation which is different
from that used in the formation of positive powers from negative roots.
This has to be learnt, like everything else. The bare knowledge that the
barley plant and the infinitesimal calculus are both governed by
negation of negation does not enable me either to grow barley
successfully or to differentiate and integrate; just as little as the
bare knowledge of the laws of the determination of sound by the
dimensions of the strings enables me to play the violin. — But it is
clear that from a negation of the negation which consists in the
childish pastime of alternately writing and cancelling _a_, or in
alternately declaring that a rose is a rose and that it is not a rose,
nothing eventuates but the silliness of the person who adopts such a
tedious procedure. And yet the metaphysicians try to make us believe
that this is the right way to carry out a negation of the negation, if
we ever should want to do such a thing.

Once again, therefore, it is no one but Herr Dühring who is mystifying
us when he asserts that the negation of the negation is a stupid analogy
invented by Hegel, borrowed from the sphere of religion and based on the
story of the fall of man and his redemption {D. K. G. 504}. Men thought
dialectically long before they knew what dialectics was, just as they
spoke prose long before the term prose existed. [An allusion to
Molière's comedy _Le Bourgeois gentilhomme_, Act II, Scene 6 — _Ed_.]
The law of negation of the negation, which is unconsciously operative in
nature and history and, until it has been recognised, also in our heads,
was only first clearly formulated by Hegel. And if Herr Dühring wants to
operate with it himself on the quiet and it is only that he cannot stand
the name, then let him find a better name. But if his aim is to banish
the process itself from thought, we must ask him to be so good as first
to banish it from nature and history and to invent a mathematical system
in which -_a x -a is_ not +_a_² and in which differentiation and
integration are prohibited under severe penalties.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------



XIV. CONCLUSION


We have now finished with philosophy; such other fantasies of the future
as the _Cursus_ contains will de dealt with when we come to Herr
Dühring’s revolution in socialism. What did Herr Dühring promise us?
Everything. And what promises has he kept? None. “The elements of a
philosophy which is real and accordingly directed to the reality of
nature and of life” {D. Ph. 430}, the “strictly scientific {387}
conception of the world”, the “system-creating ideas” {525}, and all
Herr Dühring's other achievements, trumpeted forth to the world by Herr
Dühring in high-sounding phrases, turned out, wherever we laid hold of
them, to be _pure charlatanism._ The world schematism which, “without
the slightest detraction from the profundity of thought, securely
established the basic forms of being” {556-57}, proved to be an
infinitely vulgarised duplicate of Hegelian logic, and in common with
the latter shares the superstition that these “basic forms” {9} or
logical categories have led a mysterious existence somewhere before and
outside of the world, to which they are “to be applied” {15}. The
philosophy of nature offered us a cosmogony whose starting-point is a
“self-equal state of matter” {87} — a state which can only be conceived
by means of the most hopeless confusion as to the relation between
matter and motion; a state which can, besides, only be conceived on the
assumption of an extramundane personal God who alone can induce motion
in this state of matter. In its treatment of organic nature, the
philosophy of reality first rejected the Darwinian struggle for
existence and natural selection as “a piece of brutality directed
against humanity” {117}, and then had to readmit both by the back-door
as factors operative in nature, though of second rank. Moreover, the
philosophy of reality found occasion to exhibit, in the biological
domain, ignorance such as nowadays, when popular science lectures are no
longer to be escaped, could hardly be found even among the daughters of
the “educated classes”. In the domain of morality and law, the
philosophy of reality was no more successful in its vulgarisation of
Rousseau than it had been in its previous shallow version of Hegel; and,
so far as jurisprudence is concerned, in spite of all its assurances to
the contrary, it likewise displayed a lack of knowledge such as is
rarely found even among the most ordinary jurists of old Prussia. The
philosophy “which cannot allow the validity of any merely apparent
horizon” is content, in juridical matters, with a real horizon which is
coextensive with the territory in which Prussian law exercises
jurisdiction. We are still waiting for the “earths and heavens of outer
and inner nature” {D. Ph. 430} which this philosophy promised to reveal
to us in its mighty revolutionising sweep; just as we are still waiting
for the “final and ultimate truths” {2} and the “absolutely fundamental”
{150} basis. The philosopher whose mode of thought “excludes” any
tendency to a “subjectively limited conception of the world” {13} proves
to be subjectively limited not only by what has been shown to be his
extremely defective knowledge, his narrowly construed metaphysical mode
of thought and his grotesque conceit, but even by his childish personal
crotchets. He cannot produce his philosophy of reality without dragging
in his repugnance to tobacco, cats and Jews as a general law valid for
all the rest of humanity, including the Jews. His “really critical
standpoint” {404} in relation to other people shows itself by his
insistently imputing to them things which they never said and which are
of Herr Dühring’s very own fabrication. His verbose lucubrations on
themes worthy of philistines, such as the value of life and the best way
to enjoy life, are themselves so steeped in philistinism that they
explain his anger at Goethe's _Faust_ {112-13, 423}. It was really
unpardonable of Goethe to make the unmoral Faust and not the serious
philosopher of reality, Wagner, his hero. — In short, the philosophy of
reality proves to be on the whole what Hegel would call “the weakest
residue of the German would-be Enlightenment” — a residue whose tenuity
and transparent commonplace character are made more substantial and
opaque only by the mixing in of crumbs of oracular rhetoric. And now
that we have finished the book we are just as wise as we were at the
start; and we are forced to admit that the “new mode of thought” {543},
the "from the ground up original conclusions and views" and the
“system-creating ideas” {525}, though they have certainly shown us a
great variety of original nonsense, have not provided us with a single
line from which we might have been able to learn something. And this man
who praises his talents and his wares to the noisy accompaniment of
cymbals and trumpets as loudly as any market quack, and behind whose
great words there is nothing, absolutely nothing whatsoever — this man
has the temerity to say of people like Fichte, Schelling and Hegel, the
least of whom is a giant compared with him, that they are charlatans.
Charlatan, indeed! But to whom had it best be applied?

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------



PART II: POLITICAL ECONOMY



I. SUBJECT MATTER AND METHOD


Political economy, in the widest sense, is the science of the laws
governing the production and exchange of the material means of
subsistence in human society. Production and exchange are two different
functions. Production may occur without exchange, but exchange — being
necessarily an exchange of products—cannot occur without production.
Each of these two social functions is subject to the action of external
influences which to a great extent are peculiar to it and for this
reason each has, also to a great extent, its own special laws. But on
the other hand, they constantly determine and influence each other to
such an extent that they might be termed the abscissa and ordinate of
the economic curve.

The conditions under which men produce and exchange vary from country to
country, and within each country again from generation to generation.
Political economy, therefore, cannot be the same for all countries and
for all historical epochs. A tremendous distance separates the bow and
arrow, the stone knife and the acts of exchange among savages occurring
only by way of exception, from the steam-engine of a thousand horse
power, the mechanical loom, the railways and the Bank of England. The
inhabitants of Tierra del Fuego have not got so far as mass production
and world trade, any more than they have experience of bill-jobbing or a
Stock Exchange crash. Anyone who attempted to bring the political
economy of Tierra del Fuego under the same laws as are operative in
present-day England would obviously produce nothing but the most banal
commonplaces. Political economy is therefore essentially a _historical_
science. It deals with material which is historical, that is, constantly
changing; it must first investigate the special laws of each individual
stage in the evolution of production and exchange, and only when it has
completed this investigation will it be able to establish the few quite
general laws which hold good for production and exchange in general. At
the same time it goes without saying that the laws which are valid for
definite modes of production and forms of exchange hold good for all
historical periods in which these modes of production and forms of
exchange prevail. Thus, for example, the introduction of metallic money
brought into operation a series of laws which remain valid for all
countries and historical epochs in which metallic money is a medium of
exchange.

The mode of production and exchange in a definite historical society,
and the historical conditions which have given birth to this society,
determine the mode of distribution of its products. In the tribal or
village community with common ownership of land—with which, or with the
easily recognisable survivals of which, all civilised peoples enter
history—a fairly equal distribution of products is a matter of course;
where considerable inequality of distribution among the members of the
community sets in, this is an indication that the community is already
beginning to break up.—Both large- and small-scale agriculture admit of
very diverse forms of distribution, depending upon the historical
conditions from which they developed. But it is obvious that large-scale
farming always gives rise to a distribution which is quite different
from that of small-scale farming; that large-scale agriculture
presupposes or creates a class antagonism—slave-owners and slaves,
feudal lords and serfs, capitalists and wage-workers—while small-scale
agriculture does not necessarily involve class differences between the
individuals engaged in agricultural production, and that on the contrary
the mere existence of such differences indicates the incipient
dissolution of smallholding economy.—The introduction and extensive use
of metallic money in a country in which hitherto natural economy was
universal or predominant is always associated with a more or less rapid
revolutionisation of the former mode of distribution, and this takes
place in such a way that the inequality of distribution among the
individuals and therefore the opposition between rich and poor becomes
more and more pronounced.—The local guild-controlled handicraft
production of the Middle Ages precluded the existence of big capitalists
and lifelong wage-workers just as these are inevitably brought into
existence by modern large-scale industry, the credit system of the
present day, and the form of exchange corresponding to the development
of both of them—free competition.

But with the differences in distribution, _class differences_ emerge.
Society divides into classes: the privileged and the dispossessed, the
exploiters and the exploited, the rulers and the ruled; and the state,
which the natural groups of communities of the same tribe had at first
arrived at only in order to safeguard their common interests (e.g.,
irrigation in the East) and for protection against external enemies,
from this stage onwards acquires just as much the function of
maintaining by force the conditions of existence and domination of the
ruling class against the subject class.

Distribution, however, is not a merely passive result of production and
exchange; it in its turn reacts upon both of these. Each new mode of
production or form of exchange is at first retarded not only by the old
forms and the political institutions which correspond to them, but also
by the old mode of distribution; it can secure the distribution which is
suitable to it only in the course of a long struggle. But the more
mobile a given mode of production and exchange, the more capable it is
of perfection and development, the more rapidly does distribution reach
the stage at which it outgrows its progenitor, the hitherto prevailing
mode of production and exchange, and comes into conflict with it. The
old primitive communities which have already been mentioned could remain
in existence for thousands of years—as in India and among the Slavs up
to the present day—before intercourse with the outside world gave rise
in their midst to the inequalities of property as a result of which they
began to break up. On the contrary, modern capitalist production, which
is hardly three hundred years old and has become predominant only since
the introduction of modern industry, that is, only in the last hundred
years, has in this short time brought about antitheses in
distribution—concentration of capital in a few hands on the one side and
concentration of the propertyless masses in the big towns on the
other—which must of necessity bring about its downfall.

The connection between distribution and the material conditions of
existence of society at any period lies so much in the nature of things
that it is always reflected in popular instinct. So long as a mode of
production still describes an ascending curve of development, it is
enthusiastically welcomed even by those who come off worst from its
corresponding mode of distribution. This was the case with the English
workers in the beginnings of modern industry. And even while this mode
of production remains normal for society, there is, in general,
contentment with the distribution, and if objections to it begin to be
raised, these come from within the ruling class itself (Saint-Simon,
Fourier, Owen) and find no response whatever among the exploited masses.
Only when the mode of production in question has already described a
good part of its descending curve, when it has half outlived its day,
when the conditions of its existence have to a large extent disappeared,
and its successor is already knocking at the door — it is only at this
stage that the constantly increasing inequality of distribution appears
as unjust, it is only then that appeal is made from the facts which have
had their day to so-called eternal justice. From a scientific
standpoint, this appeal to morality and justice does not help us an inch
further; moral indignation, however justifiable, cannot serve economic
science as an argument, but only as a symptom. The task of economic
science is rather to show that the social abuses which have recently
been developing are necessary consequences of the existing mode of
production, but at the same time also indications of its approaching
dissolution,-and to reveal within the already dissolving economic form
of motion, the elements of the future new organisation of production and
exchange which will put an end to those abuses. The wrath which creates
the poet [Juvenalis, _Satirae_, 1, 79 (si nature negat, facit indignatio
versum).—_Ed_.] is absolutely in place in describing these abuses, and
also in attacking those apostles of harmony in the service of the ruling
class who either deny or palliate them; but how little it _proves_ in
any particular case is evident from the fact that in _every_ epoch of
past history there has been no lack of material for such wrath.

Political economy, however, as the science of the conditions and forms
under which the various human societies have produced and exchanged and
on this basis have distributed their products—political economy in this
wider sense has still to be brought into being. Such economic science as
we possess up to the present is limited almost exclusively to the
genesis and development of the capitalist mode of production: it begins
with a critique of the survivals of the feudal forms of production and
exchange, shows the necessity of their replacement by capitalist forms,
then develops the laws of the capitalist mode of production and its
corresponding forms of exchange in their positive aspects, that is the
aspects in which they further the general aims of society, and ends with
a socialist critique of the capitalist mode of production, that is, with
an exposition of its laws in their negative aspects, with a
demonstration that this mode of production, by virtue of its own
development, drives towards the point at which it makes itself
impossible. This critique proves that the capitalist forms of production
and exchange become more and more an intolerable fetter on production
itself, that the mode of distribution necessarily determined by those
forms has produced a situation among the classes which is daily becoming
more intolerable—the antagonism, sharpening from day to day, between
capitalists, constantly decreasing in number but constantly growing
richer, and propertyless wage-workers, whose number is constantly
increasing and whose conditions, taken as a whole, are steadily
deteriorating; and finally, that the colossal productive forces created
within the capitalist mode of production which the latter can no longer
master, are only waiting to be taken possession of by a society
organised for co-operative work on a planned basis to ensure to all
members of society the means of existence and of the free development of
their capacities, and indeed in constantly increasing measure.

In order to complete this critique of bourgeois economics, an
acquaintance with the capitalist form of production, exchange and
distribution did not suffice. The forms which had preceded it or those
which still exist alongside it in less developed countries, had also, at
least in their main features, to be examined and compared. Such an
investigation and comparison has up to the present been undertaken, in
general outline, only by Marx, and we therefore owe almost exclusively
to his researches ^([65]) all that has so far been established
concerning pre-bourgeois theoretical economics.

Although it first took shape in the minds of a few men of genius towards
the end of the seventeenth century, political economy in the narrower
sense, in its positive formulation by the physiocrats and Adam Smith, is
nevertheless essentially a child of the eighteenth century, and ranks
with the achievements of the contemporary great French philosophers of
the Enlightenment, sharing with them all the merits and demerits of that
period. What we have said of the philosophers a is also true of the
economists of that time. To them, the new science was not the expression
of the conditions and requirements of their epoch, but the expression of
eternal reason; the laws of production and exchange discovered by this
science were not laws of a historically determined form of those
activities, but eternal laws of nature; they were deduced from the
nature of man. But this man, when examined more closely, proved to be
the average burgher of that epoch, on the way to becoming a bourgeois,
and his nature consisted in manufacturing and trading in accordance with
the historically determined conditions of that period.

Now that we have acquired sufficient knowledge of our “layer of critical
foundations”, Herr Dühring, and his method in the philosophical field,
it will not be difficult for us to foretell the way in which he will
handle political economy. In philosophy, in so far as his writings were
not simply drivel (as in his philosophy of nature), his mode of outlook
was a distortion of that of the eighteenth century. It was not a
question of historical laws of development, but of laws of nature,
eternal truths. Social relations such as morality and law were
determined, not by the actual historical conditions of the age, but by
the famous two men, one of whom either oppresses the other or does
not—though the latter alternative, sad to say, has never yet come to
pass. We are therefore hardly likely to go astray if we conclude that
Herr Dühring will trace political economy also back to final and
ultimate truths {D. Ph. 2}, eternal natural laws, and the most empty and
barren tautological axioms; that nevertheless he will smuggle in again
by the backdoor the whole positive content of political economy, so far
as this is known to him; and that he will not evolve distribution, as a
social phenomenon, out of production and exchange, but will hand it over
to his famous two men for final solution. And as all these are tricks
with which we are already familiar, our treatment of this question can
be all the shorter.

In fact, already on page 2, ^([66]) Herr Dühring tells us that

his economics links up with what has been _“established”_ in his
_Philosophie_, and “in certain essential points depends on _truths_ of a
higher order _which have already been consummated [ausgemacht]_ in a
higher field of investigation” {D. C. 2}.

Everywhere the same importunate eulogy of himself; everywhere Herr
Dühring is triumphant over what Herr Dühring has established and put out
[_ausgemacht_]. Put out, yes, we have seen it to surfeit—but put out in
the way that people put out a sputtering candle. [In German an
untranslatable play on words: _ausmachen_ means consummate and also put
out.—_Ed._]

Immediately afterwards we find

“the most general _natural laws_ governing all economy” {4} —

so our forecast was right.

But these natural laws permit of a correct understanding of past history
only if they are “investigated in that more precise determination which
their results have experienced through the political forms of subjection
and grouping. Institutions such as slavery and wage bondage, along with
which is associated their twin-brother, property based on force, must be
regarded as social-economic constitutional forms of a purely political
nature, and have hitherto constituted the frame within which the
consequences of the natural economic laws could alone manifest
themselves” {4-5}.

This sentence is the fanfare which, like a _leitmotif_ in Wagner's
operas, announces the approach of the famous two men. But it is more
than this: it is the basic theme of Herr Dühring's whole book. In the
sphere of law, Herr Dühring could not offer us anything except a bad
translation of Rousseau's theory of equality into the language of
socialism, such as one has long been able to hear much more effectively
rendered in any workers’ tavern in Paris. Now he gives us an equally bad
socialist translation of the economists’ laments over the distortion of
the eternal natural economic laws and of their effects owing to the
intervention of the state, of force. And in this Herr Dühring stands,
deservedly, absolutely alone among socialists. Every socialist worker,
no matter of what nationality, knows quite well that force only protects
exploitation, but does not cause it; that the relation between capital
and wage-labour is the basis of his exploitation, and that this was
brought about by purely economic causes and not at all by means of
force.

Then we are further told that

in all economic questions “two processes, that of production and that of
distribution, can be distinguished”. Also that J. B. Say, notorious for
his superficiality, mentioned in addition a third process, that of
consumption, but that he was unable to say anything sensible about it,
any more than his successors {7-8} and that exchange or circulation is,
however, only a department of production, which comprises all the
operations required for the products to reach the ultimate consumer, the
consumer proper {11-12}.

By confounding the two essentially different, though also mutually
dependent, processes of production and circulation, and unblushingly
asserting that the avoidance of this confusion can only “give rise to
confusion”, Herr Dühring merely shows that he either does not know or
does not understand the colossal development which precisely circulation
has undergone during the last fifty years, as indeed is further borne
out by the rest of his book. But this is not all. After just lumping
together production and exchange into one, as simply production, he puts
distribution _alongside_ production, as a second, wholly external
process, which has nothing whatever to do with the first. Now we have
seen that distribution, in its decisive features, is always the
necessary result of the production and exchange relations of a
particular society, as well as of the historical conditions in which
this society arose; so much so that when we know these relations and
conditions we can confidently infer the mode of distribution which
prevails in this society. But we see also that if Herr Dühring does not
want to be unfaithful to the principles “established” by him in his
conceptions of morality, law and history, he is compelled to deny this
elementary economic fact, especially if he is to smuggle his
indispensable two men into economics. And once distribution has been
happily freed of all connection with production and exchange, this great
event can come to pass.

Let us first recall how Herr Dühring developed his argument in the field
of morality and law. He started originally with _one_ man, and he said:

“One man conceived as being alone, or, what is in effect the same, out
of all connection with other men, can have no _obligations;_ for such a
man there can be no question of what he _ought_, but only of what he
wants, to do” {D. Ph. 199}.

But what is this man, conceived as being alone and without obligations,
but the fateful “primordial Jew Adam” {110} in paradise, where he is
without sin simply because there is no possibility for him to commit
any?—However, even this Adam of the philosophy of reality is destined to
fall into sin. Alongside this Adam there suddenly appears—not, it is
true, an Eve with rippling tresses, but a second Adam. And instantly
Adam acquires obligations and—breaks them. Instead of treating his
brother as having equal rights and clasping him to his breast, he
subjects him to his domination, he makes a slave of him—and it is the
consequences of this first sin, the original sin of the enslavement of
man, from which the world has suffered through the whole course of
history down to the present day—which is precisely what makes Herr
Dühring think world history is not worth a farthing.

Incidentally, Herr Dühring considered that he had brought the “negation
of the negation” sufficiently into contempt by characterising it as a
copy of the old fable of original sin and redemption {see D. K. G.
504}—but what are we to say of his latest version of the same story?
(for, in due time, we shall, to use an expression of the reptile press,
^([67]) “get down to brass tacks” on redemption as well). All we can say
is that we prefer the old Semitic tribal legend, according to which it
was worth while for the man and woman to abandon the state of innocence,
and that to Herr Dühring will be left the uncontested glory of having
constructed his original sin with two men.

Let us now see how he translates this original sin into economic terms:

“We can get an appropriate cogitative scheme for the idea of production
from the conception of a Robinson Crusoe who is facing nature alone with
his own resources and has not to share with anyone else... Equally
appropriate to illustrate what is most essential in the idea of
distribution is the cogitative scheme of two persons, who combine their
economic forces and must evidently come to a mutual understanding in
some form as to their respective shares. In fact nothing more than this
simple dualism is required to enable us accurately to portray some of
the most important relations of distribution and to study their laws
embryonically in their logical necessity... Co-operative working on an
equal footing is here just as conceivable as the combination of forces
through the complete subjection of one party, who is then compelled to
render economic service as a slave or as a mere tool and is maintained
also only as a tool... Between the state of equality and that of nullity
on the one part and of omnipotence and solely-active participation on
the other, there is a range of stages which the events of world history
have filled in in rich variety. A universal survey of the various
institutions of _justice_ and _injustice_ throughout history is here an
essential presupposition” {D. C. 9-10} ....

and in conclusion the whole question of distribution is transformed into
an

“economic right of distribution” {10}.

Now at last Herr Dühring has firm ground under his feet again. Arm in
arm with his two men he can issue his challenge to his age. But behind
this trinity stands yet another, an unnamed man.

“Capital has not invented surplus-labour. Wherever a part of society
possesses the monopoly of the means of production, the labourer, free or
not free, must add to the working-time necessary for his own maintenance
an extra working-time in order to produce the means of subsistence for
the owners of the means of production, whether this proprietor be the
Athenian [aristocrat], Etruscan theocrat, civis Romanus [Roman citizen],
Norman baron, American slave-owner, Wallachian Boyard, modern landlord
or capitalist” (Marx, _Das Kapital_, Vol. I, 2nd edition, p. 227).

When Herr Dühring had thus learned what the basic form of exploitation
common to all forms of production up to the present day is—so far as
these forms move in class antagonisms—all he had to do was to apply his
two men to it, and the deep-rooted foundation of the economics of
reality was completed. He did not hesitate for a moment to carry out
this “system-creating idea” {D. Ph. 525}. Labour without compensation,
beyond the labour-time necessary for the maintenance of the labourer
himself—that is the point. The Adam, who is here called Robinson Crusoe,
makes his second Adam — Man Friday—drudge for all he is worth. But why
does Friday toil more than is necessary for his own maintenance? To this
question, too, Marx step by step provides an answer. But this answer is
far too long-winded for the two men. The matter is settled in a trice:
Crusoe “oppresses” Friday, compels him “to render economic service as a
slave or a tool” and maintains him “also only as a tool”. With these
latest “creative turns” {D. K. G. 462} of his, Herr Dühring kills as it
were two birds with one stone. Firstly, he saves himself the trouble of
explaining the various forms of distribution which have hitherto
existed, their differences and their causes; taken in the lump, they are
simply of no account—they rest on oppression, on force. We shall have to
deal with this before long. Secondly, he thereby transfers the whole
theory of distribution from the sphere of economics to that of morality
and law, that is, from the sphere of established material facts to that
of more or less vacillating opinions and sentiments. He therefore no
longer has any need to investigate or to prove things; he can go on
declaiming to his heart's content and demand that the distribution of
the products of labour should be regulated, not in accordance with its
real causes, but in accordance with what seems ethical and just to him,
Herr Dühring. But what seems just to Herr Dühring is not at all
immutable, and hence very far from being a genuine truth. For genuine
truths {D. Ph. 196}, according to Herr Dühring himself, are “absolutely
immutable”. In 1868 Herr Dühring asserted—_Die Schicksale meiner
sozialen Denkschrift etc._—that

it was “a tendency of all higher civilisation _to put more and more
emphasis on property_, and in this, not in confusion of rights and
spheres of sovereignty, lies the essence and the future of modern
development”.

And furthermore, he was quite unable to see

_“how a transformation of wage-labour into another manner of gaining a
livelihood is ever to be reconciled with the laws of human nature and
the naturally necessary structure of the body social”._

Thus in 1868, private property and wage-labour are naturally necessary
and therefore just; in 1876 both of these are the emanation of force and
“robbery” and therefore unjust. And as we cannot possibly tell what in a
few years’ time may seem ethical and just to such a mighty and impetuous
genius, we should in any case do better, in considering the distribution
of wealth, to stick to the real, objective, economic laws and not to
depend on the momentary, changeable, subjective conceptions of Herr
Dühring as to what is just or unjust.

If for the impending overthrow of the present mode of distribution of
the products of labour, with its crying contrasts of want and luxury,
starvation and surfeit, we had no better guarantee than the
consciousness that this mode of distribution is unjust, and that justice
must eventually triumph, we should be in a pretty bad way, and we might
have a long time to wait. The mystics of the Middle Ages who dreamed of
the coming millennium were already conscious of the injustice of class
antagonisms. On the threshold of modern history, three hundred and fifty
years ago, Thomas Münzer proclaimed it to the world. In the English and
the French bourgeois revolutions the same call resounded—and died away.
And if today the same call for the abolition of class antagonisms and
class distinctions, which up to 1830 ^([68]) had left the working and
suffering classes cold, if today this call is re-echoed a millionfold,
if it takes hold of one country after another in the same order and in
the same degree of intensity that modern industry develops in each
country, if in one generation it has gained a strength that enables it
to defy all the forces combined against it and to be confident of
victory in the near future—what is the reason for this? The reason is
that modern large-scale industry has called into being on the one hand a
proletariat, a class which for the first time in history can demand the
abolition, not of this or that particular class organisation, or of this
or that particular class privilege, but of classes themselves, and which
is in such a position that it must carry through this demand on pain of
sinking to the level of the Chinese coolie. On the other hand this same
large-scale industry has brought into being, in the bourgeoisie, a class
which has the monopoly of all the instruments of production and means of
subsistence, but which in each speculative boom period and in each crash
that follows it proves that it has become incapable of any longer
controlling the productive forces, which have grown beyond its power, a
class under whose leadership society is racing to ruin like a locomotive
whose jammed safety-valve the driver is too weak to open. In other
words, the reason is that both the productive forces created by the
modern capitalist mode of production and the system of distribution of
goods established by it have come into crying contradiction with that
mode of production itself, and in fact to such a degree that, if the
whole of modern society is not to perish, a revolution in the mode of
production and distribution must take place, a revolution which will put
an end to all class distinctions. On this tangible, material fact, which
is impressing itself in a more or less clear form, but with insuperable
necessity, on the minds of the exploited proletarians—on this fact, and
not on the conceptions of justice and injustice held by any armchair
philosopher, is modern socialism's confidence in victory founded.



II. THEORY OF FORCE


“In my system, the relation between general politics and the forms of
economic law is determined in so definite a way and at the same time a
way so _original_ that it would not be superfluous, in order to
facilitate study, to make special reference to this point. The formation
of _political_ relationships is _historically the fundamental thing_,
and instances of _economic_ dependence are only _effects_ or special
cases, and are consequently always _facts of a second order._ Some of
the newer socialist systems take as their guiding principle the
conspicuous semblance of a completely reverse relationship, in that they
assume that political phenomena are subordinate to and, as it were, grow
out of the economic conditions. It is true that these effects of the
second order do exist as such, and are most clearly perceptible at the
present time; but the _primary_ must be sought in _direct political
force_ and not in any indirect economic power” {D. Ph. 538}.

This conception is also expressed in another passage, in which Herr
Dühring

“starts from the principle that the political conditions are the
decisive cause of the economic situation and that the reverse
relationship represents only a reaction of a second order ... so long as
the political grouping is not taken for its own sake, as the
starting-point, but is treated merely as a _stomach-filling agency_, one
must have a portion of reaction stowed away in one's mind, however
radical a socialist and revolutionary one may seem to be” {D. K. G.
230-31}.

That is Herr Dühring's theory. In this and in many other passages it is
simply set up, decreed, so to speak. Nowhere in the three fat tomes is
there even the slightest attempt to prove it or to disprove the opposite
point of view. And even if the arguments for it were as plentiful as
blackberries, Herr Dühring would give us none of them. For the whole
affair has been already proved through the famous original sin, when
Robinson Crusoe made Friday his slave. That was an act of force, hence a
political act. And inasmuch as this enslavement was the starting-point
and the basic fact underlying all past history and inoculated it with
the original sin of injustice, so much so that in the later periods it
was only softened down and “transformed into the more indirect forms of
economic dependence” {D. C. 19}; and inasmuch as “property founded on
force” {D. Ph. 242}, which has asserted itself right up to the present
day, is likewise based on this original act of enslavement, it is clear
that all economic phenomena must be explained by political causes, that
is, by force. And anyone who is not satisfied with that is a reactionary
in disguise.

We must first point out that only one with as much self-esteem as Herr
Dühring could regard this view as so very “original”, which it is not in
the least. The idea that political acts, grand performances of state,
are decisive in history is as old as written history itself, and is the
main reason why so little material has been preserved for us in regard
to the really progressive evolution of the peoples which has taken place
quietly, in the background, behind these noisy scenes on the stage. This
idea dominated all the conceptions of historians in the past, and the
first blow against it was delivered only by the French bourgeois
historians of the Restoration period ^([69]); the only “original” thing
about it is that Herr Dühring once again knows nothing of all this.

Furthermore: even if we assume for a moment that Herr Dühring is right
in saying that all past history can be traced back to the enslavement of
man by man, we are still very far from having got to the bottom of the
matter. For the question then arises: how did Crusoe come to enslave
Friday? Just for the fun of it? By no means. On the contrary, we see
that Friday “is compelled to render _economic_ service as a slave or as
a mere tool and is maintained also only as a tool” {D. C. 9}. Crusoe
enslaved Friday only in order that Friday should work for Crusoe's
benefit. And how can he derive any benefit for himself from Friday's
labour? Only through Friday producing by his labour more of the
necessaries of life than Crusoe has to give him to keep him fit to work.
Crusoe, therefore, in violation of Herr Dühring's express orders, “takes
the political grouping” arising out of Friday’s enslavement “not for its
own sake, as the starting-point, but merely _as a stomach-filling
agency_”; and now let him see to it that he gets along with his lord and
master, Dühring

The childish example specially selected by Herr Dühring in order to
prove that force is “historically the fundamental thing”, therefore,
proves that force is only the means, and that the aim, on the contrary,
is economic advantage. And “the more fundamental” the aim is than the
means used to secure it, the more fundamental in history is the economic
side of the relationship than the political side. The example therefore
proves precisely the opposite of what it was supposed to prove. And as
in the case of Crusoe and Friday, so in all cases of domination and
subjection up to the present day. Subjugation has always been—to use
Herr Dühring's elegant expression—a “stomach-filling agency” (taking
stomach-filling in a very wide sense), but never and nowhere a political
grouping established “for its own sake”. It takes a Herr Dühring to be
able to imagine that state taxes are only “effects of a second order”,
or that the present-day political grouping of the ruling bourgeoisie and
the ruled proletariat has come into existence “for its own sake”, and
not as a “stomach-filling agency” for the ruling bourgeois, that is to
say, for the sake of making profits and accumulating capital.

However, let us get back again to our two men. Crusoe, “sword in hand”
{D. C. 23}, makes Friday his slave. But in order to manage this, Crusoe
needs something else besides his sword. Not everyone can make use of a
slave. In order to be able to make use of a slave, one must possess two
kinds of things: first, the instruments and material for his slave’s
labour; and secondly, the means of bare subsistence for him. Therefore,
before slavery becomes possible, a certain level of production must
already have been reached and a certain inequality of distribution must
already have appeared. And for slave-labour to become the dominant mode
of production in the whole of a society, an even far higher increase in
production, trade and accumulation of wealth was essential. In the
ancient primitive communities with common ownership of the land, slavery
either did not exist at all or played only a very subordinate role. It
was the same in the originally peasant city of Rome; but when Rome
became a “world city” and Italic landownership came more and more into
the hands of a numerically small class of enormously rich proprietors,
the peasant population was supplanted by a population of slaves. If at
the time of the Persian wars the number of slaves in Corinth rose to
460,000 and in Aegina to 470,000 and there were ten slaves to every
freeman, ^([70]) something else besides “force” was required, namely, a
highly developed arts and handicraft industry and an extensive commerce.
Slavery in the United States of America was based far less on force than
on the English cotton industry; in those districts where no cotton was
grown or which, unlike the border states, did not breed slaves for the
cotton-growing states, it died out of itself without any force being
used, simply because it did not pay.

Hence, by calling property as it exists today property founded on force,
and by characterising it as

“that form of domination _at the root of which lies_ not merely the
exclusion of fellow-men from the use of the natural means of
subsistence, but also, what is far more important, the subjugation of
man to make him do servile work” {5},

Herr Dühring is making the whole relationship stand on its head. The
subjugation of a man to make him do servile work, in all its forms,
presupposes that the subjugator has at his disposal the instruments of
labour with the help of which alone he is able to employ the person
placed in bondage, and in the case of slavery, in addition, the means of
subsistence which enable him to keep his slave alive. In all cases,
therefore, it presupposes the possession of a certain amount of
property, in excess of the average. How did this property come into
existence? In any case it is clear that it may in fact have been robbed,
and therefore may be based on _force_, but that this is by no means
necessary. It may have been got by labour, it may have been stolen, or
it may have been obtained by trade or by fraud. In fact, it must have
been obtained by labour before there was any possibility of its being
robbed.

Private property by no means makes its appearance in history as the
result of robbery or force. On the contrary. It already existed, though
limited to certain objects, in the ancient primitive communities of all
civilised peoples. It developed into the form of commodities within
these communities, at first through barter with foreigners. The more the
products of the community assumed the commodity form, that is, the less
they were produced for their producers' own use and the more for the
purpose of exchange, and the more the original spontaneously evolved
division of labour was superseded by exchange also within the community,
the more did inequality develop in the property owned by the individual
members of the community, the more deeply was the ancient common
ownership of the land undermined, and the more rapidly did the commune
develop towards its dissolution and transformation into a village of
smallholding peasants. For thousands of years Oriental despotism and the
changing rule of conquering nomad peoples were unable to injure these
old communities; the gradual destruction of their primitive home
industry by the competition of products of large-scale industry brought
these communities nearer and nearer to dissolution. Force was as little
involved in this process as in the dividing up, still taking place now,
of the land held in common by the village communities
[_Gehöferschaften_] on the Mosel and in the Hochwald; the peasants
simply find it to their advantage that the private ownership of land
should take the place of common ownership. Even the formation of a
primitive aristocracy, as in the case of the Celts, the Germans and the
Indian Punjab, took place on the basis of common ownership of the land,
and at first was not based in any way on force, but on voluntariness and
custom. Wherever private property evolved it was the result of altered
relations of production and exchange, in the interest of increased
production and in furtherance of intercourse—hence as a result of
economic causes. Force plays no part in this at all. Indeed, it is clear
that the institution of private property must already be in existence
for a robber to be able to _appropriate_ another person's property, and
that therefore force may be able to change the possession of, but cannot
create, private property as such.

Nor can we use either force or property founded on force in explanation
of the “subjugation of man to make him do servile work” in its most
modern form—wage-labour. We have already mentioned the role played in
the dissolution of the ancient communities, that is, in the direct or
indirect general spread of private property, by the transformation of
the products of labour into commodities, their production not for
consumption by those who produced them, but for exchange. Now in
_Capital_, Marx proved with absolute clarity—and Herr Dühring carefully
avoids even the slightest reference to this—that at a certain stage of
development, the production of commodities becomes transformed into
capitalist production, and that at this stage “the laws of appropriation
or of private property, laws that are based on the production and
circulation of commodities, become by their own inner and inexorable
dialectic changed into their opposite. The exchange of equivalents, the
original operation with which we started, has now become turned round in
such a way that there is only an apparent exchange. This is owing to the
fact, first, that the capital which is exchanged for labour-power is
itself but a portion of the product of others’ labour appropriated
without an equivalent; and, secondly, that this capital must not only be
replaced by its producer, but replaced together with an added surplus...
At first property seemed to us to be based on a man's own labour... Now,
however” (at the end of Marx's analysis) “property turns out to be the
right, on the part of the capitalist, to appropriate the unpaid labour
of others, and to be the impossibility, on the part of the labourer, of
appropriating his own product. The separation of property from labour
has become the necessary consequence of a law that apparently originated
in their identity.” In other words, even if we exclude all possibility
of robbery, force and fraud, even if we assume that all private property
was originally based on the owner's own labour, and that throughout the
whole subsequent process there was only exchange of equal values for
equal values, the progressive development of production and exchange
nevertheless brings us of necessity to the present capitalist mode of
production, to the monopolisation of the means of production and the
means of subsistence in the hands of the one, numerically small, class,
to the degradation into propertyless proletarians of the other class,
constituting the immense majority, to the periodic alternation of
speculative production booms and commercial crises and to the whole of
the present anarchy of production. The whole process can be explained by
purely economic causes; at no point whatever are robbery, force, the
state or political interference of any kind necessary. “Property founded
on force” {D. C. 4} proves here also to be nothing but the phrase of a
braggart intended to cover up his lack of understanding of the real
course of things.

This course of things, expressed historically, is the history of the
development of the bourgeoisie. If “political conditions are the
decisive cause of the economic situation” {D. K. G. 230-31}, then the
modern bourgeoisie cannot have developed in struggle with feudalism, but
must be the latter's voluntarily begotten pet child. Everyone knows that
what took place was the opposite. Originally an oppressed estate liable
to pay dues to the ruling feudal nobility, recruited from all manner of
serfs and villains, the burghers conquered one position after another in
their continuous struggle with the nobility, and finally, in the most
highly developed countries, took power in its stead; in France, by
directly overthrowing the nobility; in England, by making it more and
more bourgeois and incorporating it as their own ornamental head. And
how did they accomplish this? Simply through a change in the “economic
situation”, which sooner or later, voluntarily or as the outcome of
combat, was followed by a change in the political conditions. The
struggle of the bourgeoisie against the feudal nobility is the struggle
of town against country, industry against landed property, money economy
against natural economy; and the decisive weapon of the bourgeoisie in
this struggle was its means of _economic_ power, constantly increasing
through the development of industry, first handicraft, and then, at a
later stage, progressing to manufacture, and through the expansion of
commerce. During the whole of this struggle political force was on the
side of the nobility, except for a period when the Crown played the
bourgeoisie against the nobility, in order to keep one estate in check
by means of the other ^([71]); but from the moment when the bourgeoisie,
still politically powerless, began to grow dangerous owing to its
increasing economic power, the Crown resumed its alliance with the
nobility, and by so doing called forth the bourgeois revolution, first
in England and then in France. The “political conditions” in France had
remained unaltered, while the “economic situation” had outgrown them.
Judged by his political status the nobleman was everything, the burgher
nothing; but judged by his social position the burgher now formed the
most important class in the state, while the nobleman had been shorn of
all his social functions and was now only drawing payment, in the
revenues that came to him, for these functions which had disappeared.
Nor was that all. Bourgeois production in its entirety was still hemmed
in by the feudal political forms of the Middle Ages, which this
production—not only manufacture, but even handicraft industry—had long
outgrown; it had remained hemmed in by all the thousandfold guild
privileges and local and provincial customs barriers which had become
mere irritants and fetters on production. The bourgeois revolution put
an end to this. Not, however, by adjusting the economic situation to
suit the political conditions, in accordance with Herr Dühring’s
precept—this was precisely what the nobles and the Crown had been vainly
trying to do for years—but by doing the opposite, by casting aside the
old mouldering political rubbish and creating political conditions in
which the new “economic situation” could exist and develop. And in this
political and legal atmosphere which was suited to its needs it
developed brilliantly, so brilliantly that the bourgeoisie has already
come close to occupying the position held by the nobility in 1789: it is
becoming more and more not only socially superfluous, but a social
hindrance; it is more and more becoming separated from productive
activity, and, like the nobility in the past, becoming more and more a
class merely drawing revenues; and it has accomplished this revolution
in its own position and the creation of a new class, the proletariat,
without any hocus-pocus of force whatever, in a purely economic way.
Even more: it did not in any way will this result of its own actions
land activities—on the contrary, this result established itself with
irresistible force, against the will and contrary to the intentions of
the bourgeoisie; its own productive forces have grown beyond its
control, and, as if necessitated by a law of nature, are driving the
whole of bourgeois society towards ruin, or revolution. And if the
bourgeois now make their appeal to force in order to save the collapsing
“economic situation” from the final crash, this only shows that they are
labouring under the same delusion as Herr Dühring: the delusion that
“political conditions are the decisive cause of the economic situation”;
this only shows that they imagine, just as Herr Dühring does, that by
making use of “the primary”, “the direct political force”, they can
remodel those “facts of the second order” {D. Ph. 538}, the economic
situation and its inevitable development; and that therefore the
economic consequences of the steam-engine and the modern machinery
driven by it, of world trade and the banking and credit developments of
the present day, can be blown out of existence by them with Krupp guns
and Mauser rifles. ^([72])



III. THEORY OF FORCE (CONTINUATION)


But let us look a little more closely at this omnipotent “force” of Herr
Dühring's. Crusoe enslaved Friday “sword in hand” {D. C. 23}. Where did
he get the sword? Even on the imaginary islands of the Robinson Crusoe
epic, swords have not, up to now, been known to grow on trees, and Herr
Dühring provides no answer to this question. If Crusoe could procure a
sword for himself, we are equally entitled to assume that one fine
morning Friday might appear with a loaded revolver in his hand, and then
the whole “force” relationship is inverted. Friday commands, and it is
Crusoe who has to drudge. We must apologise to the readers for returning
with such insistence to the Robinson Crusoe and Friday story, which
properly belongs to the nursery and not to the field of science — but
how can we help it? We are obliged to apply Herr Dühring's axiomatic
method conscientiously, and it is not our fault if in doing so we have
to keep all the time within the field of pure childishness. So, then,
the revolver triumphs over the sword; and this will probably make even
the most childish axiomatician comprehend that force is no mere act of
the will, but requires the existence of very real preliminary conditions
before it can come into operation, namely, _instruments_, the more
perfect of which gets the better of the less perfect; moreover, that
these instruments have to be produced, which implies that the producer
of more perfect instruments of force, _vulgo_ arms, gets the better of
the producer of the less perfect instruments, and that, in a word, the
triumph of force is based on the production of arms, and this in turn on
production in general — therefore, on “economic power”, on the “economic
situation”, on the _material_ means which force has at its disposal.

Force, nowadays, is the army and navy, and both, as we all know to our
cost, are “devilishly expensive”. Force, however, cannot make any money;
at most it can take away money that has already been made—and this does
not help much either—as we have seen, also to our cost, in the case of
the French milliards. ^([73]) In the last analysis, therefore, money
must be provided through the medium of economic production; and so once
more force is conditioned by the economic situation, which furnishes the
means for the equipment and maintenance of the instruments of force. But
even that is not all. Nothing is more dependent on economic
prerequisites than precisely army and navy. Armament, composition,
organisation, tactics and strategy depend above all on the stage reached
at the time in production and on communications. It is not the “free
creations of the mind” {D. Ph. 43} of generals of genius that have had a
revolutionising effect here, but the invention of better weapons and the
change in the human material, the soldiers; at the very most the part
played by generals of genius is limited to adapting methods of fighting
to the new weapons and combatants.

At the beginning of the fourteenth century, gunpowder came from the
Arabs to Western Europe, and, as every school child knows, completely
revolutionised the methods of warfare. The introduction of gunpowder and
fire-arms, however, was not at all an act of force, but a step forward
in industry, that is, an economic advance. Industry remains industry,
whether it is applied to the production or the destruction of things.
And the introduction of fire-arms had a revolutionising effect not only
on the conduct of war itself, but also on the political relationships of
domination and subjection. The procurement of powder and fire-arms
required industry and money, and both of these were in the hands of the
burghers of the towns. From the outset therefore, fire-arms were the
weapons of the towns, and of the rising town-supported monarchy against
the feudal nobility. The stone walls of the noblemen's castles, hitherto
unapproachable, fell before the cannon of the burghers, and the bullets
of the burghers’ arquebuses pierced the armour of the knights. With the
defeat of the nobility’s armour-clad cavalry, the nobility's supremacy
was broken; with the development of the bourgeoisie, infantry and
artillery became more and more the decisive types of arms compelled by
the development of artillery, the military profession had to add to its
organisation a new and entirely industrial subsection, engineering.

The improvement of fire-arms was a very slow process. The pieces of
artillery remained clumsy and the musket, in spite of a number of
inventions affecting details, was still a crude weapon. It took over
three hundred years for a weapon to be constructed that was suitable for
the equipment of the whole body of infantry. It was not until the early
eighteenth century that the flint-lock musket with a bayonet finally
displaced the pike in the equipment of the infantry. The foot soldiers
of that period were the mercenaries of princes; they consisted of the
most demoralised elements of society, rigorously drilled but quite
unreliable and only held together by the rod; they were often hostile
prisoners of war who had been pressed into service. The only type of
fighting in which these soldiers could apply the new weapons was the
tactics of the line, which reached its highest perfection under
Frederick II. The whole infantry of an army was drawn up in triple ranks
in the form of a very long, hollow square, and moved in battle order
only as a whole; at the very most, either of the two wings might move
forward or keep back a little. This cumbrous mass could move in
formation only on absolutely level ground, and even then only very
slowly (seventy-five paces a minute); a change of formation during a
battle was impossible, and once the infantry was engaged, victory or
defeat was decided rapidly and at one blow.

In the American War of Independence, ^([74]) these unwieldy lines were
met by bands of rebels, who although not drilled were all the better
able to shoot from their rifled guns; they were fighting for their vital
interests, and therefore did not desert like the mercenaries; nor did
they do the English the favour of encountering them also in line and on
clear, even ground. They came on in open formation, a series of rapidly
moving troops of sharpshooters, under cover of the woods. Here the line
was powerless and succumbed to its invisible and inaccessible opponents.
Skirmishing was reinvented—a new method of warfare which was the result
of a change in the human war material.

What the American Revolution had begun the French Revolution ^([75])
completed, also in the military sphere. It also could oppose to the
well-trained mercenary armies of the Coalition only poorly trained but
great masses of soldiers, the levy of the entire nation. But these
masses had to protect Paris, that is, to hold a definite area, and for
this purpose victory in open mass battle was essential. Mere skirmishes
would not achieve enough; a form had to be found to make use of large
masses and this form was discovered in the _column._ Column formation
made it possible for even poorly trained troops to move with a fair
degree of order, and moreover with greater speed (a hundred paces and
more in a minute); it made it possible to break through the rigid forms
of the old line formation; to fight on any ground, and therefore even on
ground which was extremely disadvantageous to the line formation; to
group the troops in any way if in the least appropriate; and, in
conjunction with attacks by scattered bands of sharpshooters, to contain
the enemy's lines, keep them engaged and wear them out until the moment
came for masses held in reserve to break through them at the decisive
point in the position. This new method of warfare, based on the combined
action of skirmishers and columns and on the partitioning of the army
into independent divisions or army corps, composed of all arms of the
service — a method brought to full perfection by Napoleon in both its
tactical and strategical aspects—had become necessary primarily because
of the changed personnel: the soldiery of the French Revolution.
Besides, two very important technical prerequisites had been complied
with: first, the lighter carriages for field guns constructed by
Gribeauval, which alone made possible the more rapid movement now
required of them; and secondly, the slanting of the butt, which had
hitherto been quite straight, continuing the line of the barrel.
Introduced in France in 1777, it was copied from hunting weapons and
made it possible to shoot at a particular individual without necessarily
missing him. But for this improvement it would have been impossible to
skirmish with the old weapons.

The revolutionary system of arming the whole people was soon restricted
to compulsory conscription (with substitution for the rich, who paid for
their release) and in this form it was adopted by most of the large
states on the Continent. Only Prussia attempted through its _Landwehr_
system, ^([76]) to draw to a greater extent on the military strength of
the nation. Prussia was also the first state to equip its whole
infantry—after the rifled muzzle-loader, which had been improved between
1830 and 1860 and found fit for use in war, had played a brief role—with
the most up-to-date weapon, the rifled breech-loader. Its successes in
1866 were due to these two innovations. ^([77])

The Franco-German War was the first in which two armies faced each other
both equipped with breech-loading rifles, and moreover both
fundamentally in the same tactical formations as in the time of the old
smoothbore flint-locks. The only difference was that the Prussians had
introduced the company column formation in an attempt to find a form of
fighting which was better adapted to the new type of arms. But when, at
St. Privat on August 18, ^([78]) the Prussian Guard tried to apply the
company column formation seriously, the five regiments which were
chiefly engaged lost in less than two hours more than a third of their
strength (176 officers and 5,114 men). From that time on the company
column, too, was condemned as a battle formation, no less than the
battalion column and the line; all idea of further exposing troops in
any kind of close formation to enemy gun-fire was abandoned, and on the
German side all subsequent fighting was conducted only in those compact
bodies of skirmishers into which the columns had so far regularly
dissolved of themselves under a deadly hail of bullets, although this
had been opposed by the higher commands as contrary to order; and in the
same way the only form of movement when under fire from enemy rifles
became the _double._ Once again the soldier had been shrewder than the
officer; it was _he_ who instinctively found the only way of fighting
which has proved of service up to now under the fire of breech-loading
rifles, and in spite of opposition from his officers he carried it
through successfully.

The Franco-German War marked a turning-point of entirely new
implications. In the first place the weapons used have reached such a
stage of perfection that further progress which would have any
revolutionising influence is no longer possible. Once armies have guns
which can hit a battalion at any range at which it can be distinguished,
and rifles which are equally effective for hitting individual men, while
loading them takes less time than aiming, then all further improvements
are of minor importance for field warfare. The era of evolution is
therefore, in essentials, closed in this direction. And secondly, this
war has compelled all continental powers to introduce in a stricter form
the Prussian _Landwehr_ system, and with it a military burden which must
bring them to ruin within a few years. The army has become the main
purpose of the state, and an end in itself; the peoples are there only
to provide soldiers and feed them. Militarism dominates and is
swallowing Europe. But this militarism also bears within itself the seed
of its own destruction. Competition among the individual states forces
them, on the one hand, to spend more money each year on the army and
navy, artillery, etc., thus more and more hastening their financial
collapse; and, on the other hand, to resort to universal compulsory
military service more and more extensively, thus in the long run making
the whole people familiar with the use of arms, and therefore enabling
them at a given moment to make their will prevail against the warlords
in command. And this moment will arrive as soon as the mass of the
people—town and country workers and peasants—_will have_ a will. At this
point the armies of the princes become transformed into armies of the
people; the machine refuses to work and militarism collapses by the
dialectics of its own evolution. What the bourgeois democracy of 1848
could not accomplish, just because it was _bourgeois_ and not
proletarian, namely, to give the labouring masses a will whose content
would be in accord with their class position—socialism will infallibly
secure. And this will mean the bursting asunder _from within_ of
militarism and with it of all standing armies.

That is the first moral of our history of modern infantry. The second
moral, which brings us back again to Herr Dühring, is that the whole
organisation and method of warfare of the armies, and along with these
victory or defeat, prove to be dependent on material, that is, economic
conditions: on the human material and the armaments, and therefore on
the quality and quantity of the population and on technical development.
Only a hunting people like the Americans could rediscover skirmishing
tactics — and they were hunters as a result of purely economic causes,
just as now, as a result of purely economic causes, these same Yankees
of the old States have transformed themselves into farmers,
industrialists, seamen and merchants who no longer skirmish in the
primeval forests, but instead all the more effectively in the field of
speculation, where they have likewise made much progress in making use
of large masses.—Only a revolution such as the French, which brought
about the economic emancipation of the bourgeois and, especially, of the
peasant, could find the mass armies and at the same time the free forms
of movement which shattered the old rigid lines—the military
counterparts of the absolutism which they were defending. And we have
seen in case after case how advances in technique, as soon as they
became applicable militarily and in fact were so applied, immediately
and almost forcibly produced changes and even revolutions in the methods
of warfare, often indeed against the will of the army command. And
nowadays any zealous N.C.O. could explain to Herr Dühring how greatly,
besides, the conduct of a war depends on the productivity and means of
communication of the army's own hinterland as well as of the theatre of
war. In short, always and everywhere it is the economic conditions and
the instruments of economic power which help “force” to victory, without
which force ceases to be force. And anyone who tried to reform methods
of warfare from the opposite standpoint, on the basis of Dühringian
principles, would certainly earn nothing but a beating. *4

If we pass now from land to sea, we find that in the last twenty years
alone an even more complete revolution has taken place there. The
warship of the Crimean War ^([79]) was the wooden two- and three-decker
of 60 to 100 guns; this was still mainly propelled by sail, with only a
low-powered auxiliary steam-engine. The guns on these warships were for
the most part 32-pounders, weighing approximately 50 centners, with only
a few 68-pounders weighing 95 centners. Towards the end of the war,
iron-clad floating batteries made their appearance; they were clumsy and
almost immobile monsters, but to the guns of that period they were
invulnerable. Soon warships, too, were swathed in iron armourplating; at
first the plates were still thin, a thickness of four inches being
regarded as extremely heavy armour. But soon the progress made with
artillery outstripped the armour-plating; each successive increase in
the strength of the armour used was countered by a new and heavier gun
which easily pierced the plates. In this way we have already reached
armour-plating ten, twelve, fourteen and twenty-four inches thick (Italy
proposes to have a ship built with plates three feet thick) on the one
hand, and on the other, rifled guns of 25, 35, 80 and even 100 tons (at
20 centners) in weight, which can hurl projectiles weighing 300, 400,
1,700 and up to 2,000 pounds to distances which were never dreamed of
before. The warship of the present day is a gigantic armoured
screwdriven steamer of 8,000 to 9,000 tons displacement and 6,000 to
8,000 horse power, with revolving turrets and four or at most six heavy
guns, the bow being extended under water into a ram for running down
enemy vessels. It is a single colossal machine, in which steam not only
drives the ship at a high speed, but also works the steering-gear,
raises the anchor, swings the turrets, changes the elevation of the guns
and loads them, pumps out water, hoists and lowers the boats—some of
which are themselves also steam-driven—and so forth. And the rivalry
between armour-plating and the fire power of guns is so far from being
at an end that nowadays a ship is almost always not up to requirements,
already out of date, before it is launched. The modern warship is not
only a product, but at the same time a specimen of modern large-scale
industry, a floating factory—producing mainly, to be sure, a lavish
waste of money. The country in which large-scale industry is most highly
developed has almost a monopoly of the construction of these ships. All
Turkish, almost all Russian and most German armoured vessels have been
built in England; armour-plates that are at all serviceable are hardly
made outside of Sheffield; of the three steelworks in Europe which alone
are able to make the heaviest guns, two (Woolwich and Elswick) are in
England, and the third (Krupp ^([80])) in Germany. In this sphere it is
most palpably evident that the "direct political force" {D. Ph. 538}
which, according to Herr Dühring, is the “decisive cause of the economic
situation” {D. K. G. 231}, is on the contrary completely subordinate to
the economic situation, that not only the construction but also the
operation of the marine instrument of force, the warship, has itself
become a branch of modern large-scale industry. And that this is so
distresses no one more than force itself, that is, the state, which has
now to pay for one ship as much as a whole small fleet used to cost;
which has to resign itself to seeing these expensive vessels become
obsolete, and therefore worthless, even before they slide into the
water; and which must certainly be just as disgusted as Herr Dühring
that the man of the “economic situation”, the engineer, is now of far
greater importance on board than the man of “direct force”, the captain.
We, on the contrary, have absolutely no cause to be vexed when we see
that, in this competitive struggle between armour-plating and guns, the
warship is being developed to a pitch of perfection which is making it
both outrageously costly and unusable in war, and that this struggle
makes manifest also in the sphere of naval warfare those inherent
dialectical laws of motion on the basis of which militarism, like every
other historical phenomenon, is being brought to its doom in consequence
of its own development.

Here, too, therefore we see absolutely clearly that it is not by any
means true that “the primary must be sought in direct political force
and not in any indirect economic power” {D. Ph. 538}. On the contrary.
For what in fact does “the primary” in force itself prove to be?
Economic power, the disposal of the means of power of large-scale
industry. Naval political force, which reposes on modern warships,
proves to be not at all “direct” but on the contrary _mediated_ by
economic power, highly developed metallurgy, command of skilled
technicians and highly productive coal-mines.

And yet what is the use of it all? If we put Herr Dühring in supreme
command in the next naval war, he will destroy all fleets of armoured
ships, which are the slaves of the economic situation, without torpedoes
or any other artifices, solely by virtue of his “direct force.”



IV. THEORY OF FORCE (CONCLUSION)


“It _is_ a circumstance of great importance that as a matter of fact the
domination over _nature_, generally speaking,” (!), “only proceeded,” (a
domination proceeded!) “through the domination over _man._ The
cultivation of landed property in tracts of considerable size never took
place anywhere without the antecedent subjection of man in some form of
slave-labour or corvée. The establishment of an economic domination over
things has presupposed the political, social and economic domination of
man over man. How could a large landed proprietor even be conceived
without at once including in this idea also his domination over slaves
serfs, or others indirectly unfree? What could the efforts of an
individual, at most supplemented by those of his family, have signified
or signify in extensively practiced agriculture? The exploitation of the
land, or the extension of economic control over it on a scale exceeding
the natural capacities of the individual, was only made possible in
previous history by the establishment, either before or simultaneously
with the introduction of dominion over land, of the enslavement of man
which this involves. In the later periods of development this servitude
was mitigated ... its present form in the more highly civilised states
_is_ wage-labour, to a greater or lesser degree carried on under police
rule. Thus wage-labour provides the practical possibility of that form
of contemporary wealth which _is_ represented by dominion over wide
areas of land and” (!) “extensive landed property. It goes without
saying that all other types of distributive wealth must be explained
historically in a similar way, and the indirect dependence of man on
man, which is now the essential feature of the conditions which
economically are most fully developed, cannot be understood and
explained by its own nature, but only as a somewhat transformed heritage
of an earlier direct subjugation and expropriation” {D. C. 18-19}.

Thus Herr Dühring.

Thesis: The domination of nature (by man) presupposes the domination of
man (by man).

Proof: The cultivation of landed _property in tracts of considerable
size_ never took place anywhere except by the use of bondmen.

Proof of the proof: How can there be large landowners without bondmen,
as the large landowner, even with his family, could work only a tiny
part of his property without the help of bondmen?

Therefore, in order to prove that man first had to subjugate man before
he could bring nature under his control, Herr Dühring transforms
"nature" without more ado into "landed property in tracts of
considerable size", and then this landed property—ownership
unspecified—is immediately further transformed into the property of a
large landed proprietor, who naturally cannot work his land without
bondmen.

In the first place "domination over nature" and the "cultivation of
landed property" are by no means the same thing. In industry, domination
over nature is exercised on quite another and much greater scale than in
agriculture, which is still subject to weather conditions instead of
controlling them.

Secondly, if we confine ourselves to the cultivation of landed property
consisting of tracts of considerable size, the question arises: whose
landed property is it? And then we find in the early history of all
civilised peoples, not the “large landed proprietors” whom Herr Dühring
interpolates here with his customary sleight of hand, which he calls
"natural dialectics", ^([82]) but tribal and village communities with
common ownership of the land. From India to Ireland the cultivation of
landed property in tracts of considerable size was originally carried on
by such tribal and village communities; sometimes the arable land was
tilled jointly for account of the community, and sometimes in separate
parcels of land temporarily allotted to families by the community, while
woodland and pastureland continued to be used in common. It is once
again characteristic of “the most exhaustive specialised studies” made
by Herr Dühring “in the domain of politics and law” {D. Ph. 537} that he
knows nothing of all this; that all his works breathe total ignorance of
Maurer’s epoch-making writings on the primitive constitution of the
German mark, ^([83]) the basis of all German law, and of the
ever-increasing mass of literature, chiefly stimulated by Maurer, which
is devoted to proving the primitive common ownership of the land among
all civilised peoples of Europe and Asia, and to showing the various
forms of its existence and dissolution. Just as in the domain of French
and English law Herr Dühring “himself acquired all his ignorance”, great
as it was, so it is with his even much greater ignorance in the domain
of German law. In this domain the man who flies into such a violent rage
over the limited horizon of university professors is himself today at
the very most, still where the professors were twenty years ago.

It is a pure “free creation and imagination” {43} on Herr Dühring's part
when he asserts that landed proprietors and bondmen were required for
the cultivation of landed property in tracts of considerable size. In
the whole of the Orient, where the village community or the state owns
the land, the very term landlord is not to be found in the various
languages, a point on which Herr Dühring can consult the English
jurists, whose efforts in India to solve the question: who is the owner
of the land? — were as vain as those of the late Prince Heinrich LXXII
of Reuss-Greiz-Schleiz-Lobenstein-Eberswalde ^([84]) in his attempts to
solve the question of who was the night-watchman. It was the Turks who
first introduced a sort of feudal ownership of land in the countries
conquered by them in the Orient. Greece made its entry into history, as
far back as the heroic epoch, with a system of social estates which
itself was evidently the product of a long but unknown prehistory; even
there, however, the land was mainly cultivated by independent peasants;
the larger estates of the nobles and tribal chiefs were the exception;
moreover they disappeared soon after. Italy was brought under
cultivation chiefly by peasants; when, in the final period of the Roman
Republic, the great complexes of estates, the latifundia, displaced the
small peasants and replaced them with slaves, they also replaced tillage
with stockraising, and, as Pliny already realised, brought Italy to ruin
(_latifundia Italiam perdidere)._ During the Middle Ages, peasant
farming was predominant throughout Europe (especially in bringing virgin
soil into cultivation); and in relation to the question we are now
considering it is of no importance whether these peasants had to pay
dues, and if so what dues, to any feudal lords. The colonists from
Friesland, Lower Saxony, Flanders and the Lower Rhine, who brought under
cultivation the land east of the Elbe which had been wrested. from the
Slavs, did this as free peasants under very favourable quit-rent
tenures, and not at all under “some form of corvée“ {D. C. 18}. — In
North America, by far the largest portion of the land was opened for
cultivation by the labour of free farmers, while the big landlords of
the South, with their slaves and their rapacious tilling of the land,
exhausted the soil until it could grow only firs, so that the
cultivation of cotton was forced further and further west. In Australia
and New Zealand, all attempts of the British government to establish
artificially a landed aristocracy came to nothing. In short, if we
except the tropical and subtropical colonies, where the climate makes
agricultural labour impossible for Europeans, the big landlord who
subjugates nature by means of his slaves or serfs and brings the land
under cultivation proves to be a pure figment of the imagination. The
very reverse is the case. Where he makes his appearance in antiquity, as
in Italy, he does not bring wasteland into cultivation, but transforms
arable land brought under cultivation by peasants into stock pastures,
depopulating and ruining whole countries. Only in a more recent period,
when the increasing density of population had raised the value of land,
and particularly since the development of agricultural science had made
even poorer land more cultivable—it is only from this period that large
landowners began to participate on an extensive scale in bringing
wasteland and grass-land under cultivation—and this mainly through the
robbery of common land from the peasants, both in England and in
Germany. But there was another side even to this. For every acre of
common land which the large landowners brought into cultivation in
England, they transformed at least three acres of arable land in
Scotland into sheep-runs and eventually even into mere big-game
hunting-grounds.

We are concerned here only with Herr Dühring's assertion that the
bringing into cultivation of tracts of land of considerable size and
therefore of practically the whole area now cultivated, “never and
nowhere” took place except through the agency of big landlords and their
bondmen—an assertion which, as we have seen, “presupposes” a really
unprecedented ignorance of history. It is not necessary, therefore, for
us to examine here either to what extent, at different periods, areas
which were already made entirely or mainly cultivable were cultivated by
slaves (as in the hey-day of Greece) or serfs (as in the manors of the
Middle Ages); or what was the social function of the large landowners at
various periods.

And after Herr Dühring has shown us this masterpiece of the
imagination—in which we do not know whether the conjuring trick of
deduction or the falsification of history is more to be admired—he
exclaims triumphantly:

“It goes without saying that all other types of distributive wealth must
_be explained historically in similar manner_!” {19.}

Which of course saves him the trouble of wasting even a single word more
on the origin, for example, of capital.

If, with his domination of man by man as a prior condition for the
domination of nature by man, Herr Dühring only wanted to state in a
general way that the whole of our present economic order, the level of
development now attained by agriculture and industry, is the result of a
social history which evolved in class antagonisms, in relationships of
domination and subjection, he is saying something which long ago, ever
since the _Communist Manifesto_, became a commonplace. But the question
at issue is how we are to explain the origin of classes and relations
based on domination, and if Herr Dühring's only answer is the one word
“force”, we are left exactly where we were at the start. The mere fact
that the ruled and exploited have at all times been far more numerous
than the rulers and the exploiters, and that therefore it is in the
hands of the former that the real force has reposed, is enough to
demonstrate the absurdity of the whole force theory. The relationships
based on domination and subjection have therefore still to be explained.

They arose in two ways.

As men originally made their exit from the animal world—in the narrower
sense of the term—so they made their entry into history: still half
animal, brutal, still helpless in face of the forces of nature, still
ignorant of their own strength; and consequently as poor as the animals
and hardly more productive than they. There prevailed a certain equality
in the conditions of existence, and for the heads of families also a
kind of equality of social position—at least an absence of social
classes — which continued among the primitive agricultural communities
of the civilised peoples of a later period. In each such community there
were from the beginning certain common interests the safeguarding of
which had to be handed over to individuals, true, under the control of
the community as a whole: adjudication of disputes; repression of abuse
of authority by individuals; control of water supplies, especially in
hot countries; and finally when conditions were still absolutely
primitive, religious functions. Such offices are found in aboriginal
communities of every period — in the oldest German marks and even today
in India. They are naturally endowed with a certain measure of authority
and are the beginnings of state power. The productive forces gradually
increase; the increasing density of the population creates at one point
common interests, at another conflicting interests, between the separate
communities, whose grouping into larger units brings about in turn a new
division of labour, the setting up of organs to safeguard common
interests and combat conflicting interests. These organs which, if only
because they represent the common interests of the whole group, hold a
special position in relation to each individual community—in certain
circumstances even one of opposition—soon make themselves still more
independent, partly through heredity of functions, which comes about
almost as a matter of course in a world where everything occurs
spontaneously, and partly because they become increasingly indispensable
owing to the growing number of conflicts with other groups. It is not
necessary for us to examine here how this independence of social
functions in relation to society increased with time until it developed
into domination over society; how he who was originally the servant,
where conditions were favourable, changed gradually into the lord; how
this lord, depending on the conditions, emerged as an Oriental despot or
satrap, the dynast of a Greek tribe, chieftain of a Celtic clan, and so
on; to what extent he subsequently had recourse to force in the course
of this transformation; and how finally the individual rulers united
into a ruling class. Here we are only concerned with establishing the
fact that the exercise of a social function was everywhere the basis of
political supremacy; and further that political supremacy has existed
for any length of time only when it discharged its social functions.
However great the number of despotisms which rose and fell in Persia and
India, each was fully aware that above all it was the entrepreneur
responsible for the collective maintenance of irrigation throughout the
river valleys, without which no agriculture was possible there. It was
reserved for the enlightened English to lose sight of this in India;
they let the irrigation canals and sluices fall into decay, and are now
at last discovering, through the regularly recurring famines, that they
have neglected the one activity which might have made their rule in
India at least as legitimate as that of their predecessors.

But alongside this process of formation of classes another was also
taking place. The spontaneously evolved division of labour within the
family cultivating the soil made possible, at a certain level of
well-being, the incorporation of one or more strangers as additional
labour forces. This was especially the case in countries where the old
common ownership of the land had already disintegrated or at least the
former joint cultivation had given place to the separate cultivation of
parcels of land by the respective families. Production had developed so
far that the labour-power of a man could now produce more than was
necessary for its mere maintenance; the means of maintaining additional
labour forces existed; likewise the means of employing them;
labour-power acquired a _value._ But the community itself and the
association to which it belonged yielded no available, superfluous
labour forces. On the other hand, such forces were provided by war, and
war was as old as the simultaneous existence alongside each other of
several groups of communities. Up to that time one had not known what to
do with prisoners of war, and had therefore simply killed them; at an
even earlier period, eaten them. But at the stage of &ldquo;economic
situation&rdquo; which had now been attained, the prisoners acquired
value; one therefore let them live and made use of their labour. Thus
force, instead of controlling the economic situation, was on the
contrary pressed into the service of the economic situation. _Slavery_
had been invented. It soon became the dominant form of production among
all peoples who were developing beyond the old community, but in the end
was also one of the chief causes of their decay. It was slavery that
first made possible the division of labour between agriculture and
industry on a larger scale, and thereby also Hellenism, the flowering of
the ancient world. Without slavery, no Greek state, no Greek art and
science, without slavery, no Roman Empire. But without the basis laid by
Hellenism and the Roman Empire, also no modern Europe. We should never
forget that our whole economic, political and intellectual development
presupposes a state of things in which slavery was as necessary as it
was universally recognised. In this sense we are entitled to say:
Without the slavery of antiquity no modern socialism.

It is very easy to inveigh against slavery and similar things in general
terms, and to give vent to high moral indignation at such infamies.
Unfortunately all that this conveys is only what everyone knows, namely,
that these institutions of antiquity are no longer in accord with our
present conditions and our sentiments, which these conditions determine.
But it does not tell us one word as to how these institutions arose, why
they existed, and what role they played in history. And when we examine
these questions, we are compelled to say—however contradictory and
heretical it may sound—that the introduction of slavery under the
conditions prevailing at that time was a great step forward. For it is a
fact that man sprang from the beasts, and had consequently to use
barbaric and almost bestial means to extricate himself from barbarism.
Where the ancient communities have continued to exist, they have for
thousands of years formed the basis of the cruellest form of state,
Oriental despotism, from India to Russia. It was only where these
communities dissolved that the peoples made progress of themselves, and
their next economic advance consisted in the increase and development of
production by means of slave labour. It is clear that so long as human
labour was still so little productive that it provided but a small
surplus over and above the necessary means of subsistence, any increase
of the productive forces, extension of trade, development of the state
and of law, or foundation of art and science, was possible only by means
of a greater division of labour. And the necessary basis for this was
the great division of labour between the masses discharging simple
manual labour and the few privileged persons directing labour,
conducting trade and public affairs, and, at a later stage, occupying
themselves with art and science. The simplest and most natural form of
this division of labour was in fact slavery. In the historical
conditions of the ancient world, and particularly of Greece, the advance
to a society based on class antagonisms could be accomplished only in
the form of slavery. This was an advance even for the slaves; the
prisoners of war, from whom the mass of the slaves was recruited, now at
least saved their lives, instead of being killed as they had been
before, or even roasted, as at a still earlier period.

We may add at this point that all historical antagonisms between
exploiting and exploited, ruling and oppressed classes to this very day
find their explanation in this same relatively undeveloped human labour.
So long as the really working population were so much occupied with
their necessary labour that they had no time left for looking after the
common affairs of society—the direction of labour, affairs of state,
legal matters, art, science, etc.—so long was it necessary that there
should constantly exist a special class, freed from actual labour, to
manage these affairs; and this class never failed, for its own
advantage, to impose a greater and greater burden of labour on the
working masses. Only the immense increase of the productive forces
attained by modern industry has made it possible to distribute labour
among all members of society without exception, and thereby to limit the
labour-time of each individual member to such an extent that all have
enough free time left to take part in the general—both theoretical and
practical—affairs of society. It is only now, therefore, that every
ruling and exploiting class has become superfluous and indeed a
hindrance to social development, and it is only now, too, that it will
be inexorably abolished, however much it may be in possession of “direct
force”.

When, therefore, Herr Dühring turns up his nose at Hellenism because it
was founded on slavery, he might with equal justice reproach the Greeks
with having had no steam-engines or electric telegraphs. And when he
asserts that our modern wage bondage can only be explained as a somewhat
transformed and mitigated heritage of slavery, and not by its own nature
(that is, by the economic laws of modern society), this either means
only that both wage-labour and slavery are forms of bondage and class
domination, which every child knows to be so, or is false. For with
equal justice we might say that wage-labour could only be explained as a
mitigated form of cannibalism, which, it is now established, was the
universal primitive form of utilisation of defeated enemies.

The role played in history by force as contrasted with economic
development is therefore clear. In the first place, all political power
is organically based on an economic, social function, and increases in
proportion as the members of society, through the dissolution of the
primitive community, become transformed into private producers, and thus
become more and more divorced from the administrators of the common
functions of society. Secondly, after the political force has made
itself independent in relation to society, and has transformed itself
from its servant into its master, it can work in two different
directions. Either it works in the sense and in the direction of the
natural economic development, in which case no conflict arises between
them, the economic development being accelerated. Or it works against
economic development, in which case, as a rule, with but few exceptions,
force succumbs to it. These few exceptions are isolated cases of
conquest, in which the more barbarian conquerors exterminated or drove
out the population of a country and laid waste or allowed to go to ruin
productive forces which they did not know how to use. This was what the
Christians in Moorish Spain did with the major part of the irrigation
works on which the highly developed agriculture and horticulture of the
Moors depended. Every conquest by a more barbarian people disturbs of
course the economic development and destroys numerous productive forces.
But in the immense majority of cases where the conquest is permanent,
the more barbarian conqueror has to adapt himself to the higher
“economic situation” {D. K. G. 231} as it emerges from the conquest; he
is assimilated by the vanquished and in most cases he has even to adopt
their language. But where — apart from cases of conquest—the internal
state power of a country becomes antagonistic to its economic
development as at a certain stage occurred with almost every political
power in the past, the contest always ended with the downfall of the
political power. Inexorably and without exception the economic
development has forced its way through—we have already mentioned the
latest and most striking example of this: the great French Revolution.
If, in accordance with Herr Dühring's theory, the economic situation and
with it the economic structure of a given country were dependent simply
on political force, it is absolutely impossible to understand why
Frederick William IV after 1848 could not succeed, in spite of his
“magnificent army”, ^([85]) ingrafting the mediaeval guilds and other
romantic oddities on to the railways, the steam-engines and the
large-scale industry which was just then developing in his country; or
why the tsar of Russia, who is possessed of even much more forcible
means, is not only unable to pay his debts, but cannot even maintain his
“force” without continually borrowing from the “economic situation” of
Western Europe.

To Herr Dühring force is the absolute evil; the first act of force is to
him the original sin; his whole exposition is a jeremiad on the
contamination of all subsequent history consummated by this original
sin; a jeremiad on the shameful perversion of all natural and social
laws by this diabolical power, force. That force, however, plays yet
another role in history, a revolutionary role; that, in the words of
Marx, it is the midwife of every old society pregnant with a new one,
that it is the instrument with the aid of which social movement forces
its way through and shatters the dead, fossilised political forms—of
this there is not a word in Herr Dühring. It is only with sighs and
groans that he admits the possibility that force will perhaps be
necessary for the overthrow of an economic system of
exploitation—unfortunately, because all use of force demoralises the
person who uses it. And this in spite of the immense moral and spiritual
impetus which has been given by every victorious revolution! And this in
Germany, where a violent collision—which may, after all, be forced on
the people—would at least have the advantage of wiping out the servility
which has penetrated the nation's mentality following the humiliation of
the Thirty Years' War. And this parson's mode of thought — dull, insipid
and impotent—presumes to impose itself on the most revolutionary party
that history has known!



V. THEORY OF VALUE


It is now about a hundred years since the publication in Leipzig of a
book which by the beginning of the nineteenth century had run through
over thirty editions; it was circulated and distributed in town and
country by the authorities, by preachers and philanthropists of all
kinds, and was generally prescribed as a reader for use in the
elementary schools. This book was Rochow’s _Kinderfreund_. Its purpose
was to teach the youthful offspring of the peasants and artisans their
vocation in life and their duties to their superiors in society and in
the state, and likewise to inspire in them a beneficent contentment with
their lot on earth, with black bread and potatoes, serf labour, low
wages, paternal thrashings and other delectations of this sort, and all
that by means of the system of enlightenment which was then in vogue.
With this aim in view the youth of the towns and of the countryside was
admonished how wisely nature had ordained that man must win his
livelihood and his pleasures by labour, and how happy therefore the
peasant or artisan should feel that it was granted to him to season his
meal with bitter labour, instead of, like the rich glutton, suffering
the pangs of indigestion or constipation, and having to gulp down the
choicest tit-bits with repugnance. These same platitudes that old Rochow
thought good enough for the peasant boys and girls of the electorate of
Saxony of his time, are served up to us by Herr Dühring on page 14 and
the following pages of his _Cursus_ as the "absolutely fundamental" {D.
Ph. 150} basis of the most up-to-date political economy

“Human wants as such have their natural laws, and their expansion is
confined within limits which can be transgressed only by unnatural acts
and only for a time, until these acts result in nausea, weariness of
life, decrepitude, social mutilation and finally salutary
annihilation... A game of life consisting purely of pleasures without
any further serious aim soon makes one _blasé_, or, what amounts to the
same thing exhausts all capacity to feel. Real labour, in some form or
other, is therefore the natural social law of healthy beings... If
instincts and wants were not provided with counterbalances they could
hardly bring us even infantile existence, let alone a historically
intensified development of life. If they could find satisfaction without
limit and without effort they would soon exhaust themselves, leaving an
empty existence in the form of boring intervals lasting until the wants
were felt again... In every respect, therefore, the fact that the
satisfaction of the instincts and passions depends on the surmounting of
economic obstacles is a salutary basic law of both the external
arrangement of nature and the inner constitution of man” {D. C. 14, 15,
16}—and so on, and so forth.

It can be seen that the commonest commonplaces of the worthy Rochow are
celebrating their centenary in Herr Dühring, and do so, moreover, as the
“deeper foundation” {11} of the one and only really critical and
scientific “socialitarian system” {IV}.

With the foundations thus laid, Herr Dühring can proceed to build.
Applying the mathematical method, he first gives us, following the
ancient Euclid's example, a series of definitions. This is all the more
convenient because it enables him at once to contrive his definitions in
such a way that what is to be proved with their help is already
partially contained in them. And so we learn at the outset that

the governing concept in all prior political economy has been wealth and
that wealth, as it really has been understood hitherto and as it has
developed its sway in world history, is “economic power over men and
things” {16-17}.

This is doubly wrong. In the first place the wealth of the ancient
tribal and village communities was in no sense a domination over men.
And secondly, even in societies moving in class antagonisms, wealth, in
so far as it includes domination over men, is mainly and almost
exclusively a domination over men exercised _by virtue of_, and _through
the agency of_, the domination over things. From the very early period
when the capture of slaves and the exploitation of slaves became
separate branches of business, the exploiters of slave-labour had to buy
the slaves, acquiring control over men only through their prior control
of things, of the purchase price of the slave and of his means of
subsistence and instruments of labour. Throughout the Middle Ages large
landed property was the prerequisite by means of which the feudal
nobility came to have quit-rent peasants and corvée peasants. And
nowadays even a six-year-old child sees that wealth dominates men
exclusively by means of the things which it has at its disposal.

But what is it that makes Herr Dühring concoct this false definition of
wealth, and why has he to sever the actual connection which existed in
all former class societies? In order to drag wealth from the domain of
economics over into that of morals. Domination over things is quite all
right, but domination over men is an evil thing; and as Herr Dühring has
forbidden himself to explain domination over men by domination over
things, he can once again do an audacious trick and explain domination
over men offhand by his beloved force. Wealth, as domination over men,
is “robbery” {17}—and with this we are back again at a corrupted version
of Proudhon's ancient formula: “Property is theft.”

And so we have now safely brought wealth under two essential aspects,
production and distribution: wealth as domination over things—production
wealth, the good side; wealth as domination over men—distribution wealth
up to the present day, bad side away with it! Applied to the conditions
of today, this means: The capitalist mode of production is quite good
and may remain, but the capitalist mode of distribution is no good and
must be abolished. Such is the nonsense which comes of writing on
economics without even having grasped the connection between production
and distribution.

After wealth, value is defined as follows:

“Value is the worth which economic things and services have in
commerce.” This worth corresponds to “the price or any other equivalent
name, for example wages” {D. C. 19}.

In other words, value is the price. Or rather, in order not to do Herr
Dühring an injustice and give the absurdity of his definition as far as
possible in his own words: value are the prices. For he says on page 19:

"value, and the prices expressing it in money"

— thus himself stating that the same value has very different prices and
consequently also just as many different values. If Hegel had not died
long ago, he would hang himself, with all his theologies he could not
have thought up this value which has as many different values as it has
prices. It requires once more someone with the positive assurance of
Herr Dühring to inaugurate a new and deeper foundation for economics
with the declaration that there is no difference between price and value
except that one is expressed in money and the other is not.

But all this still does not tell us what value is, and still less by
what it is determined. Herr Dühring has therefore to come across with
further explanations.

“Speaking absolutely in general, the basic law of comparison and
evaluation, on which value and the prices expressing it in money depend,
belongs in the first place to the sphere of pure production, apart from
distribution, which introduces only a second element into the concept of
value. The greater or lesser obstacles which the variety of natural
conditions places in the way of efforts directed toward the procurement
of things, and owing to which it necessitates a greater or lesser
expenditure of economic energy, determine also ... the greater or lesser
value”, {19-20} and this is appraised according to “the resistance
offered by nature and circumstances to the procuring of things {20} ...
The extent to which we invest our own energy into them” (things) “is the
immediate determining cause of the existence of value in general and of
a particular magnitude of it” {21}. :

In so far as there is a meaning in this, it is: The value of a product
of labour is determined by the labour-time necessary for its production;
and we knew that long ago, even without Herr Dühring. Instead of stating
the fact simply, he has to twist it into an oracular saying. It is
simply wrong to say that the dimensions in which anyone invests his
energies in anything (to keep to the bombastic style) is the immediate
determining cause of value and of the magnitude of value. In the first
place, it depends on what thing the energy is put into, and secondly,
how the energy is put into it. If someone makes a thing which has no
use-value for other people, his whole energy does not produce an atom of
value; and if he is stiff-necked enough to produce by hand an object
which a machine produces twenty times cheaper, nineteen-twentieths of
the energy he put into it produces neither value in general nor any
particular magnitude of value.

Moreover it is an absolute distortion to transform productive labour,
which creates positive products, into a merely negative overcoming of a
resistance. In order to come by a shirt we should then have to set about
it somewhat as follows: Firstly we overcome the resistance of the
cotton-seed to being sown and to growing, then the resistance of the
ripe cotton to being picked and packed and transported, then its
resistance to being unpacked and carded and spun, further the resistance
of the yarn to being woven, then the resistance of the cloth to being
bleached and sewn, and finally the resistance of the completed shirt to
being put on.

Why all this childish perversion and perversity? In order, by means of
the “resistance”, to pass from the “production value”, the true but
hitherto only ideal value, to the “distribution value”, the value,
falsified by force, which alone was acknowledged in past history:

“In addition to the resistance offered by nature ... there is yet
another, a purely social obstacle... An obstructive power steps in
between man and nature, and this power is once again man. Man, conceived
as alone and isolated, faces nature as a free being... The situation is
different as soon as we think of a second man who, sword in hand, holds
the approaches to nature and its resources and demands a price, whatever
form it may take, for allowing access. This second man..., so to speak,
puts a tax on the other and is thus the reason why the value of the
object striven for turns out greater than it might have been but for
this political and social obstacle to the procuring or production of the
object... The particular forms of this artificially enhanced worth of
things are extremely manifold. and it naturally has its concomitant
counterpart in a corresponding forcing down of the worth of labour {23}
... It is therefore an illusion to attempt to regard value in advance as
an equivalent in the proper sense of this term, that is, as something
which is of equal worth, or as a relation of exchange arising from the
principle that service and counter-service are equal... On the contrary,
the criterion of a correct theory of value will be that the most general
cause of evaluation conceived in the theory does not coincide with the
special form of worth which rests on compulsory distribution. This form
varies with the social system, while economic value proper can only be a
production value measured in relation to nature and in consequence of
this will only change with changes in the obstacles to production of a
purely natural and technical kind” [D. C. 24-25].

The value which a thing has in practice, according to Herr Dühring,
therefore consists of two parts: first, the labour contained in it, and,
secondly, the tax surcharge imposed “sword in hand”. In other words,
value in practice today is a monopoly price. Now if, in accordance with
this theory of value, all commodities have such a monopoly price, only
two alternatives are possible. Either each individual loses again as a
buyer what he gained as a seller; the prices have changed nominally but
in reality—in their mutual relationship—have remained the same;
everything remains as before, and the far-famed distribution value is a
mere illusion. — Or, on the other hand, the alleged tax surcharges
represent a real sum of values, namely, that produced by the labouring,
value-producing class but appropriated by the monopolist class, and then
this sum of values consists merely of unpaid labour; in this event, in
spite of the man with the sword in his hand, in spite of the alleged tax
surcharges and the asserted distribution value, we arrive once again at
the Marxian theory of _surplus-value_.

But let us look at some examples of the famous “distribution value”. On
page 135 and the following pages we find:

“The shaping of prices as a result of individual competition must also
be regarded as a form of economic distribution and of the mutual
imposition of tribute... If the stock of any necessary commodity is
suddenly reduced to a considerable extent, this gives the sellers a
disproportionate power of exploitation [135-36] ... what a colossal
increase in prices this may produce is shown particularly by those
abnormal situations in which the supply of necessary articles is cut off
for any length of time” [137] and so on. Moreover, even in the normal
course of things virtual monopolies exist which make possible arbitrary
price increases, as for example the railway companies, the companies
supplying towns with water and gas [see 153, 154], etc.

It has long been known that such opportunities for monopolistic
exploitation occur. But that the monopoly prices these produce are not
to rank as exceptions and special cases, but precisely as classical
examples of the determination of values in operation today—this is new.
How are the prices of the necessaries of life determined? Herr Dühring
replies: Go into a beleaguered city from which supplies have been cut
off, and find out! What effect has competition on the determination of
market prices? Ask the monopolists — they will tell you all about it!

For that matter, even in the case of these monopolies, the man with the
sword in his hand who is supposed to stand behind them is not
discoverable. On the contrary: in cities under siege, if the man with
the sword, the commandant, does his duty, he, as a rule, very soon puts
an end to the monopoly and requisitions the monopolised stocks for the
purpose of equal distribution. And for the rest the men with the sword,
when they have tried to fabricate a "distribution value", have reaped
nothing but bad business and financial loss. With their monopolisation
of the East Indian trade, the Dutch brought both their monopoly and
their trade to ruin. The two strongest governments which ever existed,
the North American revolutionary government and the French National
Convention, ventured to fix maximum prices, and they failed miserably.
^([86]) For some years now, the Russian government has been trying to
raise the exchange rate of Russian paper money—which it is lowering in
Russia by the continuous emission of irredeemable banknotes—by the
equally continuous buying up in London of bills of exchange on Russia.
It has had to pay for this pleasure in the last few years almost sixty
million rubles, and the ruble now stands at under two marks instead of
over three. If the sword has the magic economic powers ascribed to it by
Herr Dühring, why is it that no government has succeeded in permanently
compelling bad money to have the “distribution value” of good money, or
_assignats_ to have the “distribution value” of gold? And where is the
sword which is in command of the world market?

There is also another principal form in which the distribution value
facilitates the appropriation of other people's services without
counter-services: this is possession-rent, that is to say, rent of land
and the profit on capital. For the moment we merely record this, to
enable us to. state that this is all that we learn of this famous
“distribution value”.—All? No, not quite. Listen to this:

“In spite of the twofold standpoint which manifests itself in the
recognition of a production value and a distribution value, there is
nevertheless always underlying these _something in common_, _the thing
of which all values consist_ and by which they are therefore measured.
The immediate, natural measure is the expenditure of energy, and the
simplest unit is human energy in the crudest sense of the term. This
latter can be reduced to the existence time whose self-maintenance in
turn represents the overcoming of a certain sum of difficulties in
nutrition and life. Distribution, or appropriation, value is present in
pure and exclusive form only where the power to dispose of unproduced
things, or, to use a commoner expression, where these things themselves
are exchanged for services or things of real production value. The
homogeneous element, which is indicated and represented in every
expression of value and therefore also in the component parts of value
which are appropriated through distribution without counter-service
consists in the expenditure of human energy, which... finds
embodiment... in each commodity”

Now what should we say to this? If all commodity values are measured by
the expenditure of human energy embodied in the commodities, what
becomes of the distribution value, the price surcharge, the tax? True,
Herr Dühring tells us that even unproduced things—things which
consequently cannot have a real value—can be given a distribution value
and exchanged against things which have been produced and possess value.
But at the same time he tells us that _all values_—consequently also
purely and exclusively distributive values—consist in the expenditure of
energy embodied in them. Unfortunately we are not told how an
expenditure of energy can find embodiment in an unproduced thing. In any
case one point seems to emerge clearly from all this medley of values:
that distribution value the price surcharge on commodities extorted as a
result of social position, and the tax levied by virtue of the sword all
once more amount to nothing. The values of commodities are determined
solely by the expenditure of human energy, _vulgo_ labour, which finds
embodiment in them. So, apart from the rent of land and the few monopoly
prices, Herr Dühring says the same, though in more slovenly and confused
terms, as the much-decried Ricardo-Marxian theory of value said long ago
in clearer and more precise form.

He says it, and in the same breath he says the opposite. Marx taking
Ricardo's investigations as his starting-point, says, the value of
commodities is determined by the socially necessary general human labour
embodied in them, and this in turn is measured by its duration. Labour
is the measure of all values, but labour itself has no value. Herr
Dühring, after likewise putting forward, in his clumsy way, labour as
the measure of value, continues:

this “can be reduced to the existence time whose self-maintenance in
turn represents the overcoming of a certain sum of difficulties in
nutrition and life.” {D. C. 27}.

Let us ignore the confusion, due purely to his desire to be original, of
labour-time, which is the only thing that matters here, with existence
time, which has never yet created or measured values. Let us also ignore
the false “socialitarian” presence which the “self-maintenance” of this
existence time is intended to introduce; so long as the world has
existed and so long as it continues to exist every individual must
maintain himself in the sense that he _himself_ consumes his means of
subsistence. Let us assume that Herr Dühring expressed himself in
precise economic terms; then the sentence quoted either means nothing at
all or means the following: The value of a commodity is determined by
the labour-time embodied in it, and the value of this labour-time by the
means of subsistence required for the maintenance of the labourer for
this time. And, in its application to present-day society, this means:
the value of a commodity is determined by the _wages_ contained in it.

And this brings us at last to what Herr Dühring is really trying to say.
The value of a commodity is determined, in the phraseology of vulgar
economics, by the production outlays;

Carey, on the contrary, “brought out the truth that it is not the costs
of production, but the costs of reproduction that determine value”
(_Kritische Geschichte_, p. 401).

We shall see later what there is to these production or reproduction
costs; at the moment we only note that, as is well known, they consist
of wages and profit on capital. Wages represent the “expenditure of
energy” embodied in commodities, the production value. Profit represents
the tax or price surcharge extorted by the capitalist by virtue of his
monopoly, the sword in his hand—the distribution value. And so the whole
contradictory confusion of the Dühringian theory of value is ultimately
resolved into the most beautiful and harmonious clarity.

The determination of the value of commodities by wages, which in Adam
Smith still frequently appeared side by side with its determination by
labour-time, has been banned from scientific political economy since
Ricardo, and nowadays survives only in vulgar economics. It is precisely
the shallowest sycophants of the existing capitalist order of society
who preach the determination of value by wages, and along with this,
describe the profit of the capitalist likewise as a higher sort of
wages, as the wages of abstinence (reward to the capitalist for not
playing ducks and drakes with his capital), as the premium on risk, as
the wages of management, etc. Herr Dühring differs from them only in
declaring that profit is robbery. In other words, Herr Dühring bases his
socialism directly on the doctrines of the worst kind of vulgar
economics. And his socialism is worth just as much as this vulgar
economics. They stand and fall together.

After all, it is clear that what a labourer produces and what he costs
are just as much different things as what a machine produces and what it
costs. The value created by a labourer in a twelve-hour working-day has
nothing in common with the value of the means of subsistence which he
consumes in this working-day and the period of rest that goes with it.
In these means of subsistence there may be embodied three, four or seven
hours of labour-time varying with the stage of development reached in
the productivity of labour. If we assume that seven hours of labour were
necessary for their production, then the theory of value of vulgar
economics which Herr Dühring has accepted implies that the product of
twelve hours of labour has the value of the product of seven hours of
labour, that twelve hours of labour are equal to seven hours of labour,
or that 12=7. To put it even more plainly: A labourer working on the
land, no matter under what social relationships produces in a year a
certain quantity of grain, say sixty bushels of wheat. During this time
he consumes a sum of values amounting of forty-five bushels of wheat.
Then the sixty bushels of wheat have the same value as the forty-five
bushels, and that in the same market and with other conditions remaining
absolutely identical; in other words, sixty=forty-five. And this styles
itself political economy!

The whole development of human society beyond the stage of brute
savagery begins on the day when the labour of the family created more
products than were necessary for its maintenance on the day when a
portion of labour could be devoted to the production no longer of the
mere means of subsistence, but of means of production. A surplus of the
product of labour over and above the costs of maintenance of the labour,
and the formation and enlargement, out of this surplus, of a social
production and reserve fund, was and is the basis of all social,
political and intellectual progress. In history, up to the present, this
fund has been the possession of a privileged class, on which also
devolved along with this possession, political domination and
intellectual leadership. The impending social revolution will for the
first time make this social production and reserve fund—that is, the
total mass of raw materials, instruments of production and means of
subsistence — a really social fund, by depriving that privileged class
of the disposal of it and transferring it to the whole of society as its
common property.

Of two alternative courses, one. Either the value of commodities is
determined by the costs of maintenance of the labour necessary for their
production—that is, in present-day society, by the wages. In that case
each labourer receives in _his wages the value of the product of his
labour;_ and then the exploitation of the wage-earning class by the
capitalist class is an impossibility. Let us assume that the costs of
maintenance of a labourer in a given society can be expressed by the sum
of three marks. Then the product of a day's labour, according to the
above-cited theory of the vulgar economists, has the value of three
marks. Let us assume that the capitalist who employs this labourer, adds
a profit to this product, a tribute of one mark, and sells it for four
marks. The other capitalists do the same. But from that moment the
labourer can no longer cover his daily needs with three marks, but also
requires four marks for this purpose. As all other conditions are
assumed to have remained unchanged, the wages expressed in means of
subsistence must remain the same, while the wages expressed in money
must rise, namely, from three marks to four marks a day. What the
capitalists take from the working class in the form of profit, they must
give back to it in the form of wages. We are just where we were at the
beginning: if wages determine value, no exploitation of the worker by
the capitalist is possible. But the formation of a surplus of products
is also impossible, for, on the basis of the assumption from which we
started, the labourers consume just as much value as they produce. And
as the capitalists produce no value, it is impossible to see how they
expect to live. And if such a surplus of production over consumption,
such a production and reserve fund, nevertheless exists, and exists in
the hands of the capitalists, no other possible explanation remains but
that the workers consume for their self-maintenance merely the _value_
of the commodities and have handed over the commodities themselves to
the capitalist for further use.

Or, on the other hand, if this production and reserve fund does in fact
exist in the hands of the capitalist class, if it has actually arisen
through the accumulation of profit (for the moment we leave the land
rent out of account), then it necessarily consists of the accumulated
surplus of the product of labour handed over to the capitalist class by
the working class, over and above the sum of wages paid to the working
class by the capitalist class. In this case, however, it is not wages
that determine value, but the quantity of labour; in this case the
working class hands over to the capitalist class in the product of
labour a greater quantity of value than it receives from it in the shape
of wages; and then the profit on capital, like all other forms of
appropriation without payment of the labour product of others, is
explained as a simple component part of this surplus-value discovered by
Marx.

Incidentally, in Dühring's whole _Cursus_ of political economy there is
no mention of that great and epoch-making discovery with which Ricardo
opens his most important work:

“The value of a commodity ... depends on the quantity of labour which is
necessary for its production, and not on the greater or lesser
compensation which is paid for that labour.“

In the _Kritische Geschichte_ it is dismissed with the oracular phrase:

“It is not considered” (by Ricardo) “that the greater or lesser
proportion in which wages can be an allotment of the necessaries of
life” (!) “must also involve ... different forms of the value
relationships!” {D. K. G. 215.}

A phrase into which the reader can read what he pleases, and is on
safest ground if he reads into it nothing at all.

And now let the reader select for himself, from the five sorts of value
served up to us by Herr Dühring, the one that he likes best: the
production value, which comes from nature; or the distribution value,
which man’s wickedness has created and which is distinguished by the
fact that it is measured by the expenditure of energy, which is not
contained in it; or thirdly, the value which is measured by labour-time;
or fourthly, the value which is measured by the costs of reproduction;
or lastly, the value which is measured by wages. The selection is wide,
the confusion complete, and the only thing left for us to do is to
exclaim with Herr Dühring:

“The theory of value is the touchstone of the worth of economic
systems!” {499}



VI. SIMPLE AND COMPOUND LABOUR


Herr Dühring has discovered in Marx a gross blunder in economics that a
schoolboy would blush at, a blunder which at the same time contains a
socialist heresy very dangerous to society.

Marx's theory of value is “nothing but the ordinary ... theory that
labour is the cause of all values and labour-time is their measure. But
the question of how the distinct value of so-called skilled labour is to
be conceived is left in complete obscurity. It is true that in our
theory also only the labour-time expended can be the measure of the
natural cost and therefore of the absolute value of economic things; but
here the labour-time of each individual must be considered absolutely
equal, to start with, and it is only necessary to examine where, in
skilled production, the labour-time of other persons ... for example in
the tool used, is added to the separate labour-time of the individual.
Therefore the position is not, as in Herr Marx's hazy conception, that
the labour-time of one person is in itself more valuable than that of
another, because more average labour-time is condensed as it were within
it, but all labour-time is in principle and without exception—and
therefore without any need to take first an average — absolutely equal
in value; and in regard to the work done by a person, as also in regard
to every finished product, all that requires to be ascertained is how
much of the labour-time of other persons may be concealed in what
appears to be only his own labour-time. Whether it is a hand tool for
production, or the hand, or even the head itself, which could not have
acquired its special characteristics and capacity for work without the
labour-time of others, is not of the slightest importance in the strict
application of the theory. In his lucubrations on value, however, Herr
Marx never rids himself of the ghost of a skilled labour-time which
lurks in the background. He was unable to effect a thoroughgoing change
here because he was hampered by the traditional mode of thought of the
educated classes, to whom it necessarily appears monstrous to recognise
the labour-time of a porter and that of an architect as of absolutely
equal value from the standpoint of economics” {D. K. G. 499-500}.

The passage in Marx which calls forth this “mightier wrath” {501} on
Herr Dühring's part is very brief. Marx is examining what it is that
determines the value of _commodities_ and gives the answer: the human
labour embodied in them. This, he continues, “is the expenditure of
simple labour-power which, on an average, apart from any special
development, exists in the organism of every ordinary individual...
Skilled labour counts only as simple labour intensified, or rather, as
multiplied simple labour, a given quantity of skilled being considered
equal to a greater quantity of simple labour. Experience shows that this
reduction is constantly being made. A commodity may be the product of
the most skilled labour, but its value, by equating it to the product of
simple unskilled labour, represents a definite quantity of the latter
labour alone. The different proportions in which different sorts of
labour are reduced to unskilled labour as their standard, are
established by a social process that goes on behind the backs of the
producers, and, consequently, appear to be fixed by custom”.

Marx is dealing here first of all only with the determination of the
value of _commodities_, i.e., of objects which, within a society
composed of private producers, are produced and exchanged against each
other by these private producers for their private account. In this
passage therefore there is no question whatever of &ldquo;absolute
value&rdquo;—wherever this may be in existence—but of the value which is
current in a definite form of society. This value, in this definite
historical sense, is shown to be created and measured by the human
labour embodied in the individual commodities, and this human labour is
further shown to be the expenditure of simple labour-power. But not all
labour is a mere expenditure of simple human labour-power; very many
sorts of labour involve the use of capabilities or knowledge acquired
with the expenditure of greater or lesser effort, time and money. Do
these kinds of compound labour produce, in the same interval of time,
the same commodity values as simple labour, the expenditure of mere
simple labour-power? Obviously not. The product of one hour of compound
labour is a commodity of a higher value—perhaps double or treble — in
comparison with the product of one hour of simple labour. The values of
the products of compound labour are expressed by this comparison in
definite quantities of simple labour; but this reduction of compound
labour is established by a social process which goes on behind the backs
of the producers, by a process which at this point, in the development
of the theory of value, can only be stated but not as yet explained.

It is this simple fact, taking place daily before our eyes in
present-day capitalist society, which is here stated by Marx. This fact
is so indisputable that even Herr Dühring does not venture to dispute it
either in his _Cursus_ or in his history of political economy ; and the
Marxian presentation is so simple and lucid that no one but Herr Dühring
“is left in complete obscurity” by it. Because of his complete obscurity
he mistakes the commodity value, which alone Marx was for the time being
concerned with investigating, for “the natural cost”, which makes the
obscurity still more complete, and even for the “absolute value”, which
so far as our knowledge goes has never before had currency in political
economy. But whatever Herr Dühring may understand by the natural cost,
and whichever of his five kinds of value may have the honour to
represent absolute value, this much at least is sure: that Marx is not
discussing any of these things, but only the value of commodities; and
that in the whole section of _Capital_ which deals with value there is
not even the slightest indication of whether or to what extent Marx
considers this theory of the value of commodities applicable also to
other forms of society.

“Therefore the position is not,” Herr Dühring proceeds, “as in Herr
Marx's hazy conception, that the labour-time of one person is in itself
more valuable than that of another, because more average labour-time is
condensed as it were within it, but all labour-time is in principle and
without exception—and therefore without any need to take first an
average — absolutely equal in value” {D. K. G. 500}.

It is fortunate for Herr Dühring that fate did not make him a
manufacturer, and thus saved him from fixing the value of his
commodities on the basis of this new rule and thereby running infallibly
into the arms of bankruptcy. But say, are we here still in the society
of manufacturers? No, far from it. With his natural cost and absolute
value Herr Dühring has made us take a leap, a veritable _salto mortale_,
out of the present evil world of exploiters into his own economic
commune of the future, into the pure, heavenly air of equality and
justice; and so we must now, even though prematurely, take a glance at
this new world.

It is true that, according to Herr Dühring’s theory, only the
labour-time expended can measure the value of economic things even in
the economic commune; but as a matter of course the labour-time of each
individual must be considered absolutely equal to start with, all
labour-time is in principle and without exception absolutely equal in
value, without any need to take first an average. And now compare with
this radical equalitarian socialism Marx’s hazy conception that the
labour-time of one person is in itself more valuable than that of
another, because more average labour-time is condensed as it were within
it—a conception which held Marx captive by reason of the traditional
mode of thought of the educated classes, to whom it necessarily appears
monstrous that the labour-time of a porter and that of an architect
should be recognised as of absolutely equal value from the standpoint of
economics!

Unfortunately Marx put a short footnote to the passage in _Capital_
cited above: “The reader must note that we are not speaking here of the
_wages_ or value that the labourer _gets_ for a given labour-time, but
of the _value of the commodity_ in which that labour-time is
_materialised_.” Marx, who seems here to have had a presentiment of the
coming of his Dühring, therefore safeguards himself against an
application of his statements quoted above even to the wages which are
paid in existing society for compound labour. And if Herr Dühring, not
content with doing this all the same, presents these statements as the
principles on which Marx would like to see the distribution of the
necessaries of life regulated in society organised socialistically, he
is guilty of a shameless imposture, the like of which is only to be
found in the gangster press.

But let us look a little more closely at the doctrine of equality in
values. All labour-time is entirely equal in value, the porter’s and the
architect’s. So labour-time, and therefore labour itself, has a value.
But labour is the creator of all values. It alone gives the products
found in nature value in the economic sense. Value itself is nothing
else than the expression of the socially necessary human labour
materialised in an object. Labour _can_ therefore have _no_ value. One
might as well speak of the value of value, or try to determine the
weight, not of a heavy body, but of heaviness itself, as speak of the
value of labour, and try to determine it. Herr Dühring dismisses people
like Owen, Saint-Simon and Fourier by calling them social alchemists {D.
K. G. 237}. His subtilising over the value of labour-time, that is, of
labour, shows that he ranks far beneath the real alchemists. And now let
the reader fathom Herr Dühring's brazenness in imputing to Marx the
assertion that the labour-time of one person is in itself more valuable
than that of another {500}, that labour-time, and therefore labour, has
a value—to Marx, who first demonstrated that labour _can_ have _no_
value, and why it cannot!

For socialism, which wants to emancipate human labour-power from its
status of a _commodity_, the realisation that labour has no value and
can have none is of great importance. With this realisation all attempts
— inherited by Herr Dühring from primitive workers’ socialism — to
regulate the future distribution of the necessaries of life as a kind of
higher wages fall to the ground And from it comes the further
realisation that distribution, in so far as it is governed by purely
economic considerations, will be regulated by the interests of
production, and that production is most encouraged by a mode of
distribution which allows _all_ members of society to develop, maintain
and exercise their capacities with maximum universality. It is true
that, to the mode of thought of the educated classes which Herr Dühring
has inherited, it must seem monstrous that in time to come there will no
longer be any professional porters or architects, and that the man who
for half an hour gives instructions as an architect will also act as a
porter for a period, until his activity as an architect is once again
required. A fine sort of socialism that would be—perpetuating
professional porters!

If the equality of value of labour-time. means that each labourer
produces equal values in equal periods of time, without there being any
need to take an average, then this is obviously wrong. If we take two
workers, even in the same branch of industry, the value they produce in
one hour of labour-time will always vary with the intensity of their
labour and their skill—and not even an economic commune, at any rate not
on our planet, can remedy this evil—which, however, is only an evil for
people like Dühring. What, then, remains of the complete equality of
value of any and every labour? Nothing but the purely braggart phrase,
which has no other economic foundation than Herr Dühring's incapacity to
distinguish between the determination of value by labour and
determination of value by wages—nothing but the ukase, the basic law of
the new economic commune: Equal wages for equal labour-time! Indeed, the
old French communist workers and Weitling had much better reasons for
the equality of wages which they advocated.

How then are we to solve the whole important question of the higher
wages paid for compound labour? In a society of private producers,
private individuals or their families pay the costs of training the
qualified worker; hence the higher price paid for qualified labour-power
accrues first of all to private individuals: the skilful slave is sold
for a higher price, and the skilful wage-earner is paid higher wages. In
a socialistically organised society, these costs are borne by society,
and to it therefore belong the fruits, the greater values produced by
compound labour. The worker himself has no claim to extra pay. And from
this, incidentally, follows the moral that at times there is a drawback
to the popular demand of the workers for “the full proceeds of labour”.
^([87])



VII. CAPITAL AND SURPLUS VALUE


“To begin with, Herr Marx does not hold the accepted economic view of
capital, namely, that it is a means of production already produced; on
the contrary, he tries to get up a more special, dialectical-historical
idea that toys with metamorphoses of concepts and history. According to
him, capital is born of money, it forms a historical phase opening with
the sixteenth century, that is, with the first beginnings of a world
market, which presumably appeared at that period. It is obvious that the
keenness of national-economic analysis is lost in such a conceptual
interpretation. In such barren conceptions, which are represented as
half historical and half logical, but which in fact are only bastards of
historical and logical fantasy, the faculty of discernment perishes,
together with all honesty in the use of concepts” {D. K. G. 497-98} —

and so he blusters along for a whole page...

“Marx's definition of the concept of capital can only cause confusion in
the strict theory of national economy ... frivolities which are palmed
off as profound logical truths ... the fragility of foundations” {D. K.
G. 498} and so forth.

So according to Marx, we are told, capital was born of money at the
beginning of the sixteenth century. This is like saying that fully three
thousand years ago metallic money was born of cattle, because once upon
a time cattle, among other things, functioned as money. Only Herr
Dühring is capable of such a crude and inept manner of expressing
himself. In the analysis which Marx makes of the economic forms within
which the process of the circulation of commodities takes place, money
appears as the final form. “This final product of the circulation of
commodities is the _first form in which_ capital _appears._ As a matter
of history, capital, as opposed to landed property, invariably takes the
form at first of money; it appears as moneyed wealth, as the capital of
the merchant and of the usurer... We can see it daily under our very
eyes. All new capital, to commence with, comes on the stage, that is, on
the market, whether of commodities, labour, or money, even in our days,
in the shape of money that by a definite process has to be transformed
into capital.” Here once again Marx is stating a fact. Unable to dispute
it, Herr Dühring distorts it: Capital, he has Marx say, is born of
money!

Marx then investigates the processes by which money is transformed into
capital, and finds, first, that the form in which money circulates as
capital is the inversion of the form in which it circulates as the
general equivalent of commodities. The simple owner of commodities sells
in order to buy; he sells what he does not need, and with the money thus
procured he buys what he does need. The incipient capitalist starts by
buying what he does _not_ need himself; he buys in order to sell, and to
sell at a higher price, in order to get back the value of the money
originally thrown into the transaction, augmented by an increment in
money; and Marx calls this increment _surplus-value._

Whence comes this surplus-value? It cannot come either from the buyer
buying the commodities under their value, or from the seller selling
them above their value. For in both cases the gains and the losses of
each individual cancel each other, as each individual is in turn buyer
and seller. Nor can it come from cheating, for though cheating can
enrich one person at the expense of another, it cannot increase the
total sum possessed by both, and therefore cannot augment the sum of the
values in circulation. “The capitalist class, as a whole, in any
country, cannot over-reach themselves.”

And yet we find that in each country the capitalist class as a whole is
continuously enriching itself before our eyes, by selling dearer than it
had bought, by appropriating to itself surplus-value. We are therefore
just where we were at the start: whence comes this surplus-value? This
problem must be solved, and it must be solved in a _purely economic_
way, excluding all cheating and the intervention of any force—the
problem being: how is it possible constantly to sell dearer than one has
bought, even on the hypothesis that equal values are always exchanged
for equal values?

The solution of this problem was the most epoch-making achievement of
Marx’s work. It spread the clear light of day through economic domains
in which socialists no less than bourgeois economists previously groped
in utter darkness. Scientific socialism dates from the discovery of this
solution and has been built up around it.

This solution is as follows: The increase in the value of money that is
to be converted into capital cannot take place in the _money_ itself,
nor can it originate in the _purchase_, as here this money does no more
than realise the price of the commodity, and this price, inasmuch as we
took as our premise an exchange of equivalents, is not different from
its value. For the same reason, the increase in value cannot originate
in the _sale_ of the commodity. The change must, therefore, take place
in the _commodity_ bought; not however in its _value_, as it is bought
and sold at its value, but in its _use-value_ as such, that is, the
change of value must originate in the consumption of the commodity. “In
order to be able to extract value from the consumption of a commodity,
our friend, Moneybags, must be so lucky as to find ... in the market, a
commodity, whose use-value possesses the peculiar property of being a
source of value, whose actual consumption, therefore, is itself an
embodiment of labour, and, consequently, a _creation of value._ The
possessor of money does find on the market such a special commodity in
capacity for labour or _labour-power_.” Though, as we saw, labour as
such can have no value, this is by no means the case with labour-power.
This acquires a value from the moment that it becomes a _commodity_, as
it is in fact at the present time, and this value is determined, “as in
the case of every other commodity, by the labour-time necessary for the
production, and consequently also the reproduction, of this special
article“; that is to say, by the labour-time necessary for the
production of the means of subsistence which the labourer requires for
his maintenance in a fit state to work and for the perpetuation of his
race. Let us assume that these means of subsistence represent six hours
of labour-time daily. Our incipient capitalist, who buys labour-power
for carrying on his business, i.e., hires a labourer, consequently pays
this labourer the full value of his day's labour-power if he pays him a
sum of money which also represents six hours of labour. And as soon as
the labourer has worked six hours in the employment of the incipient
capitalist, he has fully reimbursed the latter for his outlay, for the
value of the day's labour-power which he had paid. But so far the money
would not have been converted into capital, it would not have produced
any surplus-value. And for this reason the buyer of labour-power has
quite a different notion of the nature of the transaction he has carried
out. The fact that only six hours’ labour is necessary to keep the
labourer alive for twenty-four hours, does not in any way prevent him
from working twelve hours out of the twenty-four. The value of the
labour-power, and the value which that labour-power creates in the
labour-process, are two different magnitudes. The owner of the money has
paid the value of a day’s labour-power; his, therefore, is the use of it
for a day — a whole day’s labour. The circumstance that the value which
the use of it during one day _creates_ is double its own value for a day
is a piece of especially good luck for the buyer, but according to the
laws of exchange of commodities by no means an injustice to the seller.
On our assumption, therefore, the labourer each day _costs_ the owner of
money the value of the product of six hours’ labour, but he _hands over_
to him each day the value of the product of twelve hours' labour. The
difference in favour of the owner of the money is six hours of unpaid
surplus-labour, a surplus-product for which he does not pay and in which
six hours’ labour is embodied. The trick has been performed.
Surplus-value has been produced; money has been converted into capital.

In thus showing how surplus-value arises, and how alone surplus-value
can arise under the domination of the laws regulating the exchange of
commodities, Marx exposed the mechanism of the existing capitalist mode
of production and of the mode of appropriation based on it; he revealed
the core around which the whole existing social order has crystallised.

However, this creation of capital requires that one essential
prerequisite be fulfilled: “For the conversion of his money into capital
the owner of money must meet in the market with the _free labourer_,
free in the double sense, that as a free man he can dispose of his
labour-power as his own commodity, and that on the other hand he has no
other commodity for sale, is short of everything necessary for the
realisation of his labour-power.” But this relation between the owners
of money or of commodities on the one hand, and those who possess
nothing beyond their own labour-power on the other, is not a natural
relation, nor is it one that is common to all historical periods: “It is
clearly the result of a past historical development, the product ... of
the extinction of a whole series of older forms of social production.”
And in fact we first encounter this free labourer on a mass scale in
history at the end of the fifteenth and the beginning of the sixteenth
century, as a result of the dissolution of the feudal mode of
production. With this, however, and with the bringing into being of
world trade and the world market dating from the same epoch, the basis
was established on which the mass of the existing movable wealth was
necessarily more and more converted into capital, and the capitalist
mode of production, aimed at the creation of surplus-value, necessarily
became more and more exclusively the prevailing mode.

Up to this point, we have been following the “barren conceptions” of
Marx, these “bastards of historical and logical fantasy” in which “the
faculty of discernment perishes, together with all honesty in the use of
concepts”. Let us contrast these “frivolities” with the “profound
logical truths” and the “definitive and most strictly scientific
treatment in the sense of the exact disciplines” {D. K. G. 498}, such as
Herr Dühring offers us.

So Marx “does not hold the accepted economic view of capital, namely,
that it is a means of production already produced” {497}; he says, on
the contrary, that a sum of values is converted into capital only when
it _increases its value_, when it forms surplus-value. And what does
Herr Dühring say?

“Capital is a basis of means of economic power for the continuation of
production _and for the formation of shares in the fruits of the general
labour-power_” {D C. 40},

However oracularly and slovenly that too is expressed, this much at
least is certain: the basis of means of economic power may continue
production to eternity, but according to Herr Dühring’s own words it
will not become capital so long as it does not form “shares in the
fruits of the general labour-power”—that is to say, form surplus-value
or at least surplus-product. Herr Dühring therefore not only himself
commits the sin with which he charges Marx—of not holding the accepted
economic view of capital—but besides commits a clumsy plagiarism of
Marx, “badly concealed” {D. K. G. 506} by high-sounding phrases.

On page 262 {D. C.} this is further developed:

“Capital in the social sense” (and Herr Dühring still has to discover a
capital in a sense which is not social) “is in fact specifically
different from the mere means of production; for while the latter have
only a technical character and are necessary under all conditions, the
former is distinguished by its social power of appropriation and the
formation of shares. It is true that social capital is to a great extent
nothing but the technical means of production _in their social
function;_ but it is precisely this function which ... must disappear”.

When we reflect that it was precisely Marx who first drew attention to
the “social function” by virtue of which alone a sum of values becomes
capital, it will certainly "at once be clear to every attentive
investigator of the subject that Marx’s definition of the concept of
capital can only cause confusion” {D. K. G. 498}—not, however, as Herr
Dühring thinks, in the strict theory of national economy but as is
evident simply and solely in the head of Herr Dühring himself, who in
the _Kritische Geschichte_ has already forgotten how much use he made of
the said concept of capital in his _Cursus_. However, Herr Dühring is
not content with borrowing from Marx the latter’s definition of capital,
though in a “purified” form. He is obliged to follow Marx also in the
“toying with metamorphoses of concepts and history” {497}, in spite of
his own better knowledge that nothing could come of it but “barren
conceptions”, “frivolities”, “fragility of the foundations” {498} and so
forth. Whence comes this “social function” {D. C. 262} of capital, which
enables it to appropriate the fruits of others’ labour and which alone
distinguishes it from mere means of production?

Herr Dühring says that it does not depend “on the nature of the means of
production and their technical indispensability” {262}.

It therefore arose historically, and on page 262 Herr Dühring only tells
us again what we have heard ten times before, when he explains its
origin by means of the old familiar adventures of the two men, one of
whom at the dawn of history converted his means of production into
capital by the use of force against the other. But not content with
ascribing a historical beginning to the social function through which
alone a sum of values becomes capital Herr Dühring prophesies that it
will also have a historical end. It is “precisely this which must
disappear” {262}. In ordinary parlance it is customary to call a
phenomenon which arose historically and disappears again historically,
“a historical phase”. Capital, therefore, is a historical phase not only
according to Marx but also according to Herr Dühring, and we are
consequently forced to the conclusion that we are among Jesuits here.
When two persons do the same thing, then it is not the same. [A
paraphrase of a dictum from the comedy _Adelphoe by_ the Roman
playwright Terentius (Act V, Scene 3).—_Ed_.] When Marx says that
capital is a historical phase, that is a barren conception, a bastard of
historical and logical fantasy, in which the faculty of discernment
perishes, together with all honesty in the use of concepts When Herr
Dühring likewise presents capital as a historical phase that is proof of
the keenness of his economic analysis and of his definitive and most
strictly scientific treatment in the sense of the exact disciplines.

What is it then that distinguishes the Dühringian conception of capital
from the Marxian?

“Capital,” says Marx, “has not invented surplus-labour. Wherever a part
of society possesses the monopoly of the means of production, the
labourer, free or not free, must add to the working-time necessary for
his own maintenance an extra working-time in order to produce the means
of subsistence for the owners of the means of production.”
Surplus-labour, labour beyond the time required for the labourer's own
maintenance, and appropriation by others of the product of this
surplus-labour, the exploitation of labour, is therefore common to all
forms of society that have existed hitherto, in so far as these have
moved in class antagonisms. But it is only when the product of this
surplus-labour assumes the form of surplus-value, when the owner of the
means of production finds the free labourer—free from social fetters and
free from possessions of his own—as an object of exploitation, and
exploits him for the purpose of the production of _commodities_—it is
only then, according to Marx, that the means of production assume the
specific character of capital. And this first took place on a large
scale at the end of the fifteenth and the beginning of the sixteenth
century.

Herr Dühring on the contrary declares that _every_ sum of means of
production which “forms shares in the fruits of the general
labour-power” {D. C. 40}, that is, yields surplus-labour in any form, is
capital. In other words, Herr Dühring annexes the surplus-labour
discovered by Marx, in order to use it to kill the surplus-value,
likewise discovered by Marx, which for the moment 3 does not suit his
purpose. According to Herr Dühring, therefore, not only the movable and
immovable wealth of the Corinthian and Athenian citizens, built on a
slave economy, but also the wealth of the large Roman landowners of the
time of the empire, and equally the wealth of the feudal barons of the
Middle Ages, in so far as it in any way served production—all this
without distinction is capital.

So that Herr Dühring himself does not hold “the accepted view of
capital, namely, that it is a means of production already produced” {D.
K. G. 497}, but rather one that is the very opposite of it, a view which
includes in capital even means of production which have not been
produced, the earth and its natural resources. The idea, however, that
capital is simply “produced means of production” is once again the
accepted view only in vulgar political economy. Outside of this vulgar
economics, which Herr Dühring holds so dear, the “produced means of
production” or any sum of values whatever, becomes capital only by
yielding profit or interest, i.e., by appropriating the surplus-product
of unpaid labour in the form of surplus-value, and, moreover, by
appropriating it in these two definite subforms of surplus-value. It is
of absolutely no importance that the whole of bourgeois economy is still
labouring under the idea that the property of yielding profit or
interest is inherent in every sum of values which is utilised under
normal conditions in production or exchange. In classical political
economy, capital and profit, or capital and interest, are just as
inseparable, stand in the same reciprocal relations to each other, as
cause and effect, father and son, yesterday and today. The word
“capital” in its modern economic meaning is first met with, however, at
the time when the thing itself makes its appearance, when movable wealth
acquires, to a greater and greater extent, the function of capital, by
exploiting the surplus-labour of free labourers for the production of
commodities; and in fact it was introduced by the first nation of
capitalists in history, the Italians of the fifteenth and sixteenth
centuries. And if Marx was the first to make a fundamental analysis of
the mode of appropriation characteristic of modern capital; if he
brought the concept of capital into harmony with the historical facts
from which, in the last analysis, it had been abstracted, and to which
it owed its existence; if by so doing Marx cleared this economic concept
of those obscure and vacillating ideas which still clung to it even in
classical bourgeois political economy and among the former socialists —
then it was Marx who applied that “definitive and most strictly
scientific treatment“ {498} about which Herr Dühring is so constantly
talking and which we so painfully miss in his works.

In actual fact, Herr Dühring’s treatment is quite different from this.
He is not content with first inveighing against the presentation of
capital as a historical phase by calling it a “bastard of historical and
logical fantasy” {498} and then himself presenting it as a historical
phase. He also roundly declares that _all_ means of economic power,
_all_ means of production which appropriate “shares in the fruits of the
general labour-power” {D. C. 40}—and therefore also landed property in
all class societies—are capital; which however does not in the least
prevent him, in the further course of his exposition, from separating
landed property and land rent, quite in the traditional manner, from
capital and profit, and designating as capital only those means of
production which yield profit or interest, as he does at considerable
length on page 156 and the following pages of his _Cursus_. With equal
justice Herr Dühring might first include under the name 'locomotive"
also horses, oxen, asses and dogs, on the ground that these, too, can be
used as means of transport, and reproach modern engineers with limiting
the name locomotive to the modern steam-engine and thereby setting it up
as a historical phase, using barren conceptions, bastards of historical
and logical fantasy and so forth; and then finally declare that horses,
asses, oxen and dogs are nevertheless excluded from the term locomotive,
and that this term is applicable only to the steam-engine.—And so once
more we are compelled to say that it is precisely the Dühringian
conception of capital in which all keenness of economic analysis is lost
and the faculty of discernment perishes, together with all honesty in
the use of concepts; and that the barren conceptions, the confusion, the
frivolities palmed off as profound logical truths and the fragility of
the foundations are to be found in full bloom precisely in Herr
Dühring’s work.

But all that is of no consequence. For Herr Dühring’s is the glory
nevertheless of having discovered the axis on which all economics, all
politics and jurisprudence, in a word, all history, has hitherto
revolved. Here it is:

“Force and labour are the two principal factors which come into play in
forming social connections” {D. C. 255}.

In this one sentence we have the complete constitution of the economic
world up to the present day. It is extremely short, and runs:

Article One: Labour produces.

Article Two: Force distributes.

And this, “speaking in plain human language” {D. K. G. 496}, sums up the
whole of Herr Dühring's economic wisdom.



VIII. CAPITAL AND SURPLUS-VALUE (CONCLUSION)


“In Herr Marx’s view, wages represent only the payment of that
labour-time during which the labourer is actually working to make his
own existence possible. But only a small number of hours is required for
this purpose; all the rest of the working-day, often so prolonged,
yields a surplus in which is contained what our author calls
‘surplus-value’, or, expressed in everyday language, the earnings of
capital. If we leave out of account the labour-time which at each stage
of production is already contained in the instruments of labour and in
the pertinent raw material, this surplus part of the working-day is the
share which falls to the capitalist entrepreneur. The prolongation of
the working-day is consequently earnings of pure exploitation for the
benefit of the capitalist” {D. K. G. 500-01}.

According to Herr Dühring, therefore, Marx’s surplus-value would be
nothing more than what, expressed in everyday language, is known as the
earnings of capital, or profit. Let us see what Marx says himself. On
page 195 of _Capital_, surplus-value is explained in the following words
placed in brackets after it: “Interest, Profit, Rent”. On page 210, Marx
gives an example in which a total surplus-value of £3.11.0. appears in
the different forms in which it is distributed: tithes, rates and taxes,
£1.10; rent £1.80; farmer’s profit and interest, £1.20; together making
a total surplus-value of £3.11.0.—On page 542, Marx points out as one of
Ricardo’s main shortcomings that he “has not {...} investigated
surplus-value as such, i.e., independently of its particular forms, such
as profit, rent, etc.”, and that he therefore lumps together the laws of
the rate of surplus-value and the laws of the rate of profit; against
this Marx announces: “I shall show in Book III that, with a given rate
of surplus-value, we may have any number of rates of profit, and that
various rates of surplus-value may, under given conditions, express
themselves in a single rate of profit.” On page 587 we find: “The
capitalist who produces surplus-value—i.e., who extracts unpaid labour
directly from the labourers, and fixes it in commodities, is, indeed,
the first appropriator, but by no means the ultimate owner, of this
surplus-value. He has to share it with capitalists, with landowners,
etc., who fulfil other functions in the complex of social production.
Surplus-value, therefore, splits up into various parts. Its fragments
fall to various categories of persons, and take various forms,
independent the one of the other, such as profit, interest, merchants’
profit, rent, etc. It is only in Book III that we can take in hand these
modified forms of surplus-value.” And there are many other similar
passages.

It is impossible to express oneself more clearly. On each occasion Marx
calls attention to the fact that his surplus-value must not be
confounded with profit or the earnings of capital; that this latter is
rather a subform and frequently even only a fragment of surplus-value.
And if in spite of this Herr Dühring asserts that Marxian surplus-value,
“expressed in everyday language, is the earnings of capital”; and if it
is an actual fact that the whole of Marx’s book turns on
surplus-value—then there are only two possibilities: Either Herr Dühring
does not know any better, and then it is an unparalleled act of
impudence to decry a book of whose main content he is ignorant; or he
knows what it is all about, and in that case he has committed a
deliberate act of falsification.

To proceed:

“The venomous hatred with which Herr Marx presents this conception of
the business of extortion is only too understandable. But even mightier
wrath and even fuller recognition of the exploitative character of the
economic form which is based on wage-labour is possible without
accepting the theoretical position expressed in Marx's doctrine of
surplus-value” {D. K. G. 501}.

The well-meant but erroneous theoretical position taken up by Marx stirs
in him a venomous hatred against the business of extortion; but in
consequence of his false “theoretical position” the emotion, in itself
ethical, receives an unethical expression, manifesting itself in ignoble
hatred and low venomousness, while the definitive and most strictly
scientific treatment {498} by Herr Dühring expresses itself in ethical
emotion of a correspondingly noble nature, in wrath which even in form
is ethically superior and in venomous hatred is also quantitatively
superior, is a mightier wrath. While Herr Dühring is gleefully admiring
himself in this way, let us see where this mightier wrath stems from.

We read on: “Now the question arises, how the competing entrepreneurs
are able constantly to realise the full product of labour, including the
surplus-product, at a price so far above the natural outlays of
production as is indicated by the ratio, already mentioned, of the
surplus labour-hours. No answer to this is to be found in Marx's theory,
and for the simple reason that there could be no place in it for even
raising that question. The luxury character of production based on hired
labour is not seriously dealt with at all, and the social constitution
with its exploitatory features is in no way recognised as the ultimate
basis of white slavery. On the contrary, political and social matters
are always to be explained by economics” {501}.

Now we have seen from the above passages that Marx does not at all
assert that the industrial capitalist, who first appropriates the
surplus-product, sells it regardless of circumstances on the average at
its full value, as is here assumed by Herr Dühring. Marx says expressly
that merchants’ profit also forms a part of surplus-value, and on the
assumptions made this is only possible when the manufacturer sells his
product to the merchant _below_ its value, and thus relinquishes to him
a part of the booty. The way the question is put here, there clearly
could be no place in Marx for even raising it. Stated in a rational way,
the question is: How is surplus-value transformed into its subforms:
profit, interest, merchants' profit, land rent, and so forth? And Marx,
to be sure, promises to settle this question in the third book. But if
Herr Dühring cannot wait until the second volume of _Capital_ ^([88])
appears he should in the meantime take a closer look at the first
volume. In addition to the passages already quoted, he would then see,
for example on p. 323, that according to Marx the immanent laws of
capitalist production assert themselves in the external movements of
individual masses of capital as coercive laws of competition, and in
this form are brought home to the mind and consciousness of the
individual capitalist as the directing motives of his operations that
therefore a scientific analysis of competition is not possible before we
have a conception of the inner nature of capital, just as the apparent
motions of the heavenly bodies are not intelligible to any but him who
is acquainted with their real motions, which are not directly
perceptible by the senses; and then Marx gives an example to show how in
a definite case, a definite law, the law of value, manifests itself and
exercises its motive power in competition. Herr Dühring might see from
this alone that competition plays a leading part in the distribution of
surplus-value, and with some reflection the indications given in the
first volume are in fact enough to make clear, at least in its main
features, the transformation of surplus-value into its subforms.

But competition is precisely what absolutely prevents Herr Dühring from
understanding the process. He cannot comprehend how the competing
entrepreneurs are able constantly to realise the full product of labour,
including the surplus-product, at prices so far above the natural
outlays of production. Here again we find his customary “strictness” {D.
C. 95} of expression, which in fact is simply slovenliness. In _Marx_,
the surplus-product as such has _absolutely no outlays of production;_
it is the part of the product which _costs nothing_ to the capitalist.
If therefore the competing entrepreneurs desired to realise the
surplus-product at its natural outlays of production, they would have
simply _to give it away._ But do not let us waste time on such
“micrological details” {D. K. G. 507}. Are not the competing
entrepreneurs every day selling the product of labour above its natural
outlays of production? According to Herr Dühring, the natural outlays of
production consist

“in the expenditure of labour or energy, and this in turn, in the last
analysis, can be measured by the expenditure of food” {D. C. 274};

that is, in present-day society, these costs consist in the outlays
really expended on raw materials, means of labour, and wages, as
distinguished from the “tax” {D. C. 135}, the profit, the surcharge
levied sword in hand {23}. Now everyone knows that in the society in
which we live the competing entrepreneurs do _not_ realise their
commodities at the natural outlays of production, but that they add on
to these—and as a rule also receive — the so-called surcharge, the
profit. The question which Herr Dühring thinks he has only to raise to
blow down the whole Marxian structure — as Joshua once blew down the
walls of Jericho ^([89]) — this question also exists for Herr Dühring's
economic theory. Let us see how he answers it.

“Capital ownership,” he says, “has no practical meaning, and cannot be
realised, unless indirect force against human material is simultaneously
incorporated in it. The product of this force is earnings of capital,
and the magnitude of the latter _will_ therefore depend on the range and
intensity in which this power is exercised {179} ... Earnings of capital
are a political and social institution which exerts a more powerful
influence than competition. In relation to this the capitalists act as a
social estate, and each one of them maintains his position. A certain
measure of earnings of capital is a necessity under the prevailing mode
of economy” {180}.

Unfortunately even now we do not know how the competing entrepreneurs
are able constantly to realise the product of labour above the natural
outlays of production. It cannot be that Herr Dühring thinks so little
of his public as to fob it off with the phrase that earnings of capital
are above competition, just as the King of Prussia was above the law.
^([90]) We know the manoeuvres by which the King of Prussia attained his
position above the law; the manoeuvres by which the earnings of capital
succeed in being more powerful than competition are precisely what Herr
Dühring should explain to us, but what he obstinately refuses to
explain. And it is of no avail, if, as he tells us, the capitalists act
in this connection as an estate, and each one of them maintains his
position. We surely cannot be expected to take his word for it that a
number of people only need to act as an estate for each one of them to
maintain his position. Everyone knows that the guildsmen of the Middle
Ages and the French nobles in 1789 acted very definitely as estates and
perished nevertheless. The Prussian army at Jena ^([91]) also acted as
an estate, but instead of maintaining their position they had on the
contrary to take to their heels and afterwards even to capitulate in
sections. Just as little can we be satisfied with the assurance that a
certain measure of earnings of capital is a necessity under the
prevailing mode of economy; for the point to be proved is precisely
_why_ this is so. We do not get a step nearer to the goal when Herr
Dühring informs us:

“The domination of capital arose in close connection with the domination
of land. Part of the agricultural serfs were transformed in the towns
into craftsmen and ultimately into factory material. After the rent of
land, earnings of capital developed as a second form of rent of
possession” {176}.

Even if we ignore the historical inexactitude of this assertion, it
nevertheless remains a mere assertion, and is restricted to assuring us
over and over again of precisely what should be explained and proved. We
can therefore come to no other conclusion than that Herr Dühring is
incapable of answering his own question: how the competing entrepreneurs
are able constantly to realise the product of labour above the natural
outlays of production; that is to say, he is incapable of explaining the
genesis of profit. He can only bluntly decree: earnings of capital shall
be the product of _force_ — which, true enough, is completely in
accordance with Article 2 of the Dühringian constitution of society:
Force distributes. This is certainly expressed very nicely; but now “the
question arises” {D. K. G. 501}: Force distributes—what? Surely there
must be something to distribute, or even the most omnipotent force, with
the best will in the world, can distribute nothing. The earnings
pocketed by the competing capitalists are something very tangible and
solid. Force can _seize_ them, but cannot _produce_ them. And if Herr
Dühring obstinately refuses to explain to us _how_ force seizes the
earnings of capitalists, the question of _whence_ force takes them he
meets only with silence, the silence of the grave. Where there is
nothing, the king, like any other force, loses his rights. Out of
nothing comes nothing, and certainly not profit. If capital ownership
has no practical meaning, and cannot be realised, unless indirect force
against human material is simultaneously embodied in it, then once again
the question arises, first, how capital-wealth got this force—a question
which is not settled in the least by the couple of historical assertions
cited above; secondly, how this force is transformed into an accession
of capital value, into profit; and thirdly, where it obtains this
profit.

From whatever side we approach Dühringian economics, we do not get one
step further. For every obnoxious phenomenon—profit, land rent,
starvation wages, the enslavement of the workers—he has only one word of
explanation: force, and ever again force, and Herr Dühring's “mightier
wrath” {501} finally resolves itself into wrath at force. We have seen,
first, that this invocation of force is a lame subterfuge, a relegation
of the problem from the sphere of economics to that of politics, which
is unable to explain a single economic fact; and secondly, that it
leaves unexplained the origin of force itself—and very prudently so, for
otherwise it would have to come to the conclusion that all social power
and all political force have their source in economic preconditions, in
the mode of production and exchange historically given for each society
at each period.

But let us see whether we cannot wrest from the inexorable builder of
“deeper foundations” {see D. C. 11} of political economy some further
disclosures about profit. Perhaps we shall meet with success if we apply
ourselves to his treatment of wages. On page 158 we find:

“Wages are the hire paid for the maintenance of labour-power, and are at
first taken into consideration only as a basis for the rent of land and
earnings of capital. In order to get absolute clarity as to the
relationships obtaining in this field, one must conceive the rent of
land, and subsequently also earnings of capital, first historically,
without wages, that is to say, on the basis of slavery or serfdom...
Whether it is a slave or a serf, or a wage-labourer who has to be
maintained, only gives rise to a difference in the mode of charging the
costs of production. _In every case the net proceeds obtained by the
utilisation of labour-power constitute the income of the master_... It
can therefore be seen that... the chief antithesis, by virtue of which
there exists on the one hand some form of _rent of possession_ and on
the other hand propertyless hired labour, is not to be found exclusively
in one of its members, but always only in both at the same time.”

Rent of possession, however, as we learn on page 188, is a phrase which
covers both land rent and earnings of capital. Further, we find on page
174:

“The characteristic feature of earnings of capital is that they are an
_appropriation of the most important part of the proceeds of
labour-power._ They cannot be conceived except in correlation with some
form of directly or indirectly subjected labour.”

And on page 183:

Wages “are in all circumstances nothing more than the hire by means of
which, generally speaking, the labourer's maintenance and possibility of
procreation must be assured”.

And finally, on page 195:

“The portion that falls to rent of possession must be lost to wages, and
vice versa, the portion of the general productive capacity” (!) “that
reaches labour must necessarily be taken from the revenues of
possession.”

Herr Dühring leads us from one surprise to another. In his theory of
value and the following chapters up to and including the theory of
competition, that is, from page 1 to page 155, the prices of commodities
or values were divided, first, into natural outlays of production or the
production value, i.e., the outlays on raw materials, instruments of
labour and wages; and secondly, into the surcharge or distribution value
{27}, that tribute levied sword in hand {23} for the benefit of the
monopolist class—a surcharge which, as we have seen, could not in
reality make any change in the distribution of wealth, for what it took
with one hand it would have to give back with the other, and which,
besides, in so far as Herr Dühring enlightens us as to its origin and
nature, arose out of nothing and therefore consists of nothing. In the
two succeeding chapters, which deal with the kinds of revenue, that is,
from page 156 to 217, there is no further mention of the surcharge.
Instead of this, the value of every product of labour, that is, of every
commodity, is now divided into the two following portions: first, the
production costs, in which the wages paid are included; and secondly,
the _“net proceeds_ obtained by the utilisation of labour-power”, which
constitute the master’s income. And these net proceeds have a very
well-known physiognomy, which no tattooing and no house-painter's art
can conceal. “In order to get absolute clarity as to the relationships
obtaining in this field” {158}, let the reader imagine the passages just
cited from Herr Dühring printed opposite the passages previously cited
from Marx, dealing with surplus-labour, surplus-product and
surplus-value, and he will find that Herr Dühring is here, though in his
own style, _directly copying_ from _Capital._

Surplus-labour, in any form, whether of slavery, serfdom or wage-labour,
is recognised by Herr Dühring as the source of the revenues of all
ruling classes up to now; this is taken from the much-quoted passage in
_Capital_, p. 227: Capital has not invented surplus-labour, and so
on.—And the “net proceeds” which constitute “the income of the master” —
what is that but the surplus of the labour product over and above the
wages, which, even in Herr Dühring, in spite of his quite superfluous
disguise of it in the term “hire”, must assure, generally speaking, the
labourer's maintenance and possibility of procreation? How can the
“appropriation of the most important part of the proceeds of
labour-power” {174} be carried out except by the capitalist, as Marx
shows, extorting from the labourer more labour than is necessary for the
reproduction of the means of subsistence consumed by the latter; that is
to say, by the capitalist making the labourer work a longer time than is
necessary for the replacement of the value of the wages paid to the
labourer? Thus the prolongation of the working-day beyond the time
necessary for the reproduction of the labourer’s means of
subsistence—Marx’s surplus-labour—this, and nothing but this, is what is
concealed behind Herr Dühring's “utilisation of labour-power”; and his
“net proceeds” {158} falling to the master—how can they manifest
themselves otherwise than in the Marxian surplus-product and
surplus-value? And what, apart from its inexact formulation, is there to
distinguish the Dühringian rent of possession from the Marxian
surplus-value? For the rest, Herr Dühring has taken the name “rent of
possession” [“_Besitzrente_“] from Rodbertus, who included both the rent
of land and the rent of capital, or earnings of capital, under the one
term _rent_, so that Herr Dühring had only to add "possession" to it. *6
And so that no doubt may be left of his plagiarism, Herr Dühring sums
up, in his own way, the laws of the changes of magnitude in the price of
labour-power and in surplus-value which are developed by Marx in Chapter
XV (page 539, _et seqq._, of _Capital_), and does it in such a manner
that what falls to the rent of possession must be lost to wages, and
vice versa, thereby reducing certain Marxian laws, so rich in content,
to a tautology without content—for it is self-evident that of a given
magnitude falling into two parts, one part cannot increase unless the
other decreases. And so Herr Dühring has succeeded in appropriating the
ideas of Marx in such a way that the "definitive and most strictly
scientific treatment in the sense of the exact disciplines" {D. K. G.
498}—which is certainly present in Marx's exposition—is completely lost.

We therefore cannot avoid the conclusion that the strange commotion
which Herr Dühring makes in the _Kritische Geschichte_ over _Capital_,
and the dust he raises with the famous question that comes up in
connection with surplus-value (a question which he had better have left
unasked, inasmuch as he cannot answer it himself)—that all this is only
a military ruse, a sly manoeuvre to cover up the gross plagiarism of
Marx committed in the _Cursus_ Herr Dühring had in fact every reason for
warning his readers not to occupy themselves with “the intricate maze
which Herr Marx calls _Capital”_ {D. K. G. 497}, with the bastards of
historical and logical fantasy, the confused and hazy Hegelian notions
and jugglery {498}, etc. The Venus against whom this faithful Eckart
warns the German youth had been taken by him stealthily from the Marxian
preserves and brought to a safe place for his own use. We must
congratulate him on these net proceeds derived from the utilisation of
Marx's labour-power, and on the peculiar light thrown by his annexation
of Marxian surplus-value under the name of rent of possession on the
motives for his obstinate (repeated in two editions) and false assertion
that by the term surplus-value Marx meant only profit or earnings of
capital.

And so we have to portray Herr Dühring's achievements in Herr Dühring's
own words as follows:

“In Herr” Dühring's “view wages represent only the payment of that
labour-time during which the labourer is actually working to make his
own existence possible. But only a small number of hours is required for
this purpose; all the rest of the working-day, often so prolonged,
yields a surplus in which is contained what our author calls” {500} —
rent of possession. “If we leave out of account the labour-time which at
each stage of production is already contained in the instruments of
labour and in the pertinent raw material, this surplus part of the
working-day is the share which falls to the capitalist entrepreneur. The
prolongation of the working-day is consequently earnings of pure
extortion for the benefit of the capitalist. The venomous hatred with
which Herr” Dühring “presents this conception of the business of
exploitation is only too understandable” {501}...

But what is less understandable is how he will now arrive once more at
his “mightier wrath” {501}.



IX. NATURAL LAWS OF THE ECONOMY. RENT OF LAND


Up to this point we have been unable, despite our sincerest efforts, to
discover how Herr Dühring, in the domain of economics, can

“come forward with the claim to a new _system_ which is not merely
adequate for the epoch but _authoritative for the epoch”_ {D. K. G. 1}.

However, what we have not been able to discern in his theory of force
and his doctrine of value and of capital, may perhaps become as clear as
daylight to us when we consider the “natural laws of national economy”
{D. C. 4} put forward by Herr Dühring. For, as he puts it with his usual
originality and in his trenchant way,

“the triumph of the higher scientific method consists in passing beyond
the mere description and classification of apparently static matter and
attaining living intuitions which illumine the genesis of things.
Knowledge of laws is therefore the most perfect knowledge, for it shows
us how one process is conditioned by another” {59}.

The very first natural law of any economy has been specially discovered
by Herr Dühring.

Adam Smith, “curiously enough, not only did not bring out the leading
part played by the most important factor in all economic development,
but even completely failed to give it distinctive formulation, and thus
unintentionally reduced to a subordinate role the power which placed its
stamp on the development of modern Europe” {64}. This “fundamental law,
to which the leading role must be assigned, is that of the technical
equipment, one might even say armament, of the natural economic energy
of man” {63}.

This “fundamental law” {66} discovered by Herr Dühring reads as follows:

Law No. 1. “The productivity of the economic instruments, natural
resources and human energy is increased by _inventions_ and
_discoveries_” {65}.

We are overcome with astonishment. Herr Dühring treats us as Molière's
newly baked nobleman is treated by the wag who announces to him the news
that all through his life he has been speaking prose without knowing it.
That in a good many cases the productive power of labour is increased by
inventions and discoveries (but also that in very many cases it is not
increased, as is proved by the mass of waste-paper in the archives of
every patent office in the world) we knew long ago; but we owe to Herr
Dühring the enlightening information that this banality, which is as old
as the hills, is the fundamental law of all economics. If “the triumph
of the higher scientific method” in economics, as in philosophy,
consists only in giving a high-sounding name to the first commonplace
that comes to one’s mind, and trumpeting it forth as a natural law or
even a fundamental law, then it becomes possible for anybody, even the
editors of the Berlin _Volks-Zeitung_, to lay “deeper foundations” {11}
and to revolutionise science. We should then “in all rigour” {9, 95} be
forced to apply to Herr Dühring himself Herr Dühring's judgment on
Plato:

“If however that is supposed to be political-economic wisdom, then the
author of” the critical foundations “shares it with every person who
ever had occasion to conceive an idea“ or even only to babble “about
anything that was obvious on the face of it” {D. K. G. 20}.

If, for example, we say animals eat, we are saying quite calmly, in our
innocence, something of great import; for we only have to say that
eating is the fundamental law of all animal life, and we have
revolutionised the whole of zoology.

Law No. 2. Division of Labour: “The cleaving of trades and the
dissection of activities raises the productivity of labour” {D. C. 73}.

In so far as this is true, it also has been a commonplace since Adam
Smith. _How_ far it is true will be shown in Part III.

Law No. 3. _“Distance and transport_ are the chief causes which hinder
or facilitate the co-operation of the productive forces” {91}.

Law No. 4. “The industrial state has an incomparably greater population
capacity than the agricultural state” {107}.

Law No. 5. “In the economy nothing takes place without a material
interest” {126}.

These are the “natural laws” {4, 5} on which Herr Dühring founds his new
economics. He remains faithful to his method, already demonstrated in
the section on Philosophy. In economics too a few self-evident
statements of the utmost banality—moreover quite often very ineptly
expressed — form the axioms which need no proof, the fundamental
theorems, the natural laws. Under the pretext of developing the content
of these laws, which have no content, he seizes the opportunity to pour
out a wordy stream of economic twaddle on the various themes whose
_names_ occur in these pretended laws—inventions, division of labour,
means of transport, population, interests, competition, and so forth—a
verbal outpouring whose flat commonplaces are seasoned only with
oracular grandiloquence, and here and there with inept formulations or
pretentious hair-splitting over all kinds of casuistical subtleties.
Then finally we reach rent of land, earnings of capital, and wages, and
as we have dealt with only the two latter forms of appropriation in the
preceding exposition, we propose now in conclusion to make a brief
examination of the Dühringian conception of rent.

In doing this we shall not consider those points which Herr Dühring has
merely copied from his predecessor Carey; we are not concerned with
Carey, nor with defending Ricardo's views on rent of land against
Carey’s distortions and stupidities. We are only concerned with Herr
Dühring, and he defines rent as

“that income which the proprietor _as such_ draws from the land” {D. C.
156}.

The economic concept of rent of land, which is what Herr Dühring is to
explain, is straightaway transferred by him into the juridical sphere,
so that we are no wiser than we were before. Our constructor of deeper
foundations must therefore, whether he likes it or not, condescend to
give some further explanation. He compares the lease of a farm to a
tenant with the loan of capital to an entrepreneur, but soon finds that
there is a hitch in the comparison, like in many others.

For, he says, “if one wanted to press the analogy further, the earnings
left to the tenant after payment of rent must correspond to the balance
of earnings of capital left with the entrepreneur who puts the capital
to use after he has paid interest. _But it is not customary_ to regard
tenants' earnings as the main income and rent as a balance... A proof of
this difference of conception is the _fact_ that in the theory of land
rent the case of management of land by the owner is not separately
treated, and no special emphasis is laid on the difference between the
amount of rent in the case of a lease and where the owner produces the
rent himself. _At any rate no one has found it necessary_ to conceive
the rent resulting from such self-management of land as divided in such
a way that one portion represents as it were the interest on the landed
property and the other portion the surplus earnings of enterprise. Apart
from the tenant’s own capital which he brings into the business, it
would _seem_ that his specific _earnings are mostly regarded_ as a kind
of wages. It is however _hazardous_ to assert anything on this subject,
as the question has never been raised in this definite form. Wherever we
are dealing with fairly large farms it can easily be seen that it will
not do to treat what are specifically the farmer’s earnings as wages.
For these earnings are themselves based on the antithesis existing in
relation to the rural labour-power, through whose exploitation that form
of income is alone made possible. It is clearly _a part of the rent_
which remains in the hands of the tenant and by which the _full rent_,
which the owner managing himself would obtain, is reduced” {157-58}.

The theory of land rent is a part of political economy which is
specifically English, and necessarily so, because it was only in England
that there existed a mode of production under which rent had in fact
been separated from profit and interest. In England, as is well known,
large landed estates and large-scale agriculture predominate. The
landlords lease their land in large, often very large, farms, to
tenant-farmers who possess sufficient capital to work them and, unlike
our peasants, do not work themselves but employ the labour of hands and
day-labourers on the lines of full-fledged capitalist entrepreneurs.
Here, therefore, we have the three classes of bourgeois society and the
form of income peculiar to each: the landlord, drawing rent of land; the
capitalist, drawing profit; and the labourer, drawing wages. It has
never occurred to any English economist to regard the farmer’s earnings
as a kind of wages, as _seems_ to Herr Dühring to be the case; even less
could it be _hazardous_ for such an economist to assert that the
farmer’s profit is what it indisputably, obviously and tangibly is,
namely, profit on capital. It is perfectly ridiculous to say that the
question of what the farmer’s earnings actually are has never been
raised in this definite form. In England there has never been any
necessity even to raise this question; both question and answer have
long been available, derived from the facts themselves, and since Adam
Smith there has never been any doubt about them.

The case of self-management, as Herr Dühring calls it — or rather, the
management of farms by bailiffs for the landowner’s account, as happens
most frequently in Germany—does not alter the matter. If the landowner
also provides the capital and has the farm run for his own account, he
pockets the profit on capital in addition to the rent, as is
self-understood and cannot be otherwise on the basis of the existing
mode of production. And if Herr Dühring asserts that up to now no one
has found it necessary to conceive the rent (he should say revenue)
resulting from the owner's own management as divided into parts, this is
simply untrue, and at best only proves his own ignorance once again. For
example:

“The revenue derived from labour is called wages. That derived from
stock, by the person who manages or employs it, is called profit... The
revenue which proceeds altogether from land, is called rent, and belongs
to the landlord... When those three different sorts of revenue belong to
different persons they are readily distinguished; but when they belong
to the same they are sometimes confounded with one another, at least in
common language. A gentleman _who farms_ a part of his own estate, after
paying the expense of cultivation, should _gain both the rent of the
landlord and the profit of the farmer._ He is apt to denominate,
however, his whole gain, profit, and thus confounds rent with profit, at
least in common language. The greater part of our North American and
West Indian planters are in this situation. They farm, the greater part
of them, their own estates, and accordingly we seldom hear of the rent
of a plantation, but frequently of its profit... A gardener who
cultivates his own garden with his own hands, unites in his own person
the three different characters, of landlord, farmer, and labourer. His
produce, therefore, should pay him the rent of the first, the profit of
the second, and the wages of the third. The whole, however, is commonly
considered as the earnings of his labour. Both rent and profit are, in
this case, confounded with wages."

This passage is from the sixth chapter of Book I of _Adam Smith_. The
case of self-management was therefore investigated a hundred years ago,
and the doubts and uncertainties which so worry Herr Dühring in this
connection are merely due to his own ignorance.

He eventually escapes from his quandary by an audacious trick:

The farmer's earnings come from the exploitation of the “rural
labour-power” and are therefore obviously a “part of the rent” by which
the “full rent”, which really should flow into the landowner’s pocket,
“is reduced”.

From this we learn two things. Firstly, that the farmer “reduces” the
rent of the landowner, so that, according to Herr Dühring, it is not, as
was considered hitherto, the farmer who pays rent to the landowner, but
the _landowner_ who _pays rent to the farmer_—certainly a “from the
ground up original view” {D. Ph. 525}. And secondly, we learn at last
what Herr Dühring thinks rent of land is: namely, the whole
surplus-product obtained in farming by the exploitation of rural labour.
But as this surplus-product in all economics hitherto—save perhaps for
the work of a few vulgar economists—has been divided into land rent and
profit on capital, we are compelled to note that Herr Dühring's view of
rent also is “not the accepted one” {D. K. G. 497}.

According to Herr Dühring, therefore, the only difference between rent
of land and earnings of capital is that the former is obtained in
agriculture and the latter in industry or commerce. And it was of
necessity that Herr Dühring arrived at such an uncritical and confused
view of the matter. We saw that his starting-point was the “really
historical conception”, that domination over the land could be based
only on domination over man. As soon, therefore, as land is cultivated
by means of any form of subjugated labour, a surplus for the landlord
arises, and this surplus is the rent, just as in industry the
surplus-labour product beyond what the labourer earns is the profit on
capital.

“Thus it is clear that land rent exists on a considerable scale wherever
and whenever agriculture is carried on by means of any of the forms of
subjugation of labour” {D. C. 162}.

In this presentation of rent as the whole surplus-product obtained in
agriculture, Herr Dühring comes up against both English farmer’s profit
and the division, based on English farming and recognised by all
classical political economy, of that surplus-product into rent of land
and farmer’s profit, and hence against the _pure_, precise conception of
rent. What does Herr Dühring do? He pretends not to have the slightest
inkling of the division of the surplus-product of agriculture into
farmer’s profit and rent, and therefore of the whole rent theory of
classical political economy; he pretends that the question of what
farmer’s profit really is has never yet been raised “in this definite
form” {157}, that at issue is a subject which has never yet been
investigated and about which there is no knowledge but only illusion and
uncertainty. And he flees from fatal England—where, without the
intervention of any theoretical school, the surplus-product of
agriculture is so remorselessly divided into its elements: rent of land
and profit on capital—to the country so beloved by him, where the
Prussian law exercises dominion, where self-management is in full
patriarchal bloom, where “the landlord understands by rent the income
from his plots of land” and the Junkers’ views on rent still claim to be
authoritative for science—where therefore Herr Dühring can still hope to
slip through with his confused ideas of rent and profit and even to find
credence for his latest discovery: that rent of land is paid not by the
farmer to the landlord but by the landlord to the farmer.



X. FROM _KRITISCHE GESCHICHTE_


^([92])

Finally, let us take a glance at the _Kritische Geschichte der
Nationalökonomie_, at “that enterprise” of Herr Dühring's which, as he
says, “is absolutely without precedent” {9}. It may be that here at last
we shall find the definitive and most strictly scientific treatment
which he has so often promised us.

Herr Dühring makes a great deal of noise over his discovery that

“economic science” is “an enormously modern phenomenon” (p. 12).

In fact, Marx says in _Capital_: “Political economy ... as an
independent science, first sprang into being during the period of
manufacture”; and in _Zur Kritik der politischen Oekonomie_, page 29,
that “classical political economy ... dates from William Petty in
England and Boisguillebert in France, and closes with Ricardo in the
former country and Sismondi in the latter”. Herr Dühring follows the
path thus laid down for him, except that in his view _higher_ economics
begins only with the wretched abortions brought into existence by
bourgeois science after the close of its classical period. On the other
hand, he is fully justified in triumphantly proclaiming at the end of
his introduction:

“But if this enterprise, in its externally appreciable peculiarities and
in the more novel portion of its content, is absolutely without
precedent, in its inner critical approaches and its general standpoint,
it is even more peculiarly mine” (p. 9).

It is a fact that, on the basis of both its external and its internal
features, he might very well have announced his “enterprise” (the
industrial term is not badly chosen) as: _The Ego and His Own_ [an
oblique reference to Stirner’s book].

Since political economy, as it made its appearance in history, is in
fact nothing but the scientific insight into the economy in the period
of capitalist production, principles and theorems relating to it, for
example, in the writers of ancient Greek society, can only be found in
so far as certain phenomena—commodity production, trade, money,
interest-bearing capital, etc.—are common to both societies. In so far
as the Greeks make occasional excursions into this sphere, they show the
same genius and originality as in all other spheres. Because of this,
their views form, historically, the theoretical starting-points of the
modern science. Let us now listen to what the world-historic Herr
Dühring has to say.

“We have, strictly speaking, really” (!) “absolutely nothing positive to
report of antiquity concerning scientific economic theory, and the
completely unscientific Middle Ages give still less occasion for this”
(for this — for reporting _nothing!). “As_ however the fashion of
vaingloriously displaying a semblance of erudition ... has defaced the
true character of modern science, notice must be taken of at least a few
examples” {17}.

And Herr Dühring then produces examples of a criticism which is in truth
free from even the “semblance of erudition”.

Aristotle's thesis, that

“twofold is the use of every object... The one is peculiar to the object
as such, the other is not, as a sandal which may be worn, and is also
exchangeable. Both are uses of the sandal, for even he who exchanges the
sandal for the money or food he is in want of, makes use of the sandal
as a sandal. But not in its natural way. For it has not been made for
the sake of being exchanged” —

this thesis, Herr Dühring maintains, is “not only expressed in a really
platitudinous and scholastic way“ {18}; but those who see in it a
“differentiation between use-value and exchange-value” fall besides into
the “ridiculous frame of mind” {19} of forgetting that “in the most
recent period” and “in the framework of the most advanced system”—which
of course is Herr Dühring's own system—nothing has been left of
use-value and exchange-value.

“In Plato’s work on the state, people ... claim to have found the
_modern_ doctrine of the national-economic division of labour” {20}.

This was apparently meant to refer to the passage in _Capital_, Ch. XII,
5 (p. 369 of the third edition), where the views of classical antiquity
on the division of labour are on the contrary shown to have been “in
most striking contrast” with the modern view. Herr Dühring has nothing
but sneers for Plato's presentation—one which, for his time, was full of
genius—of the division of labour as the natural basis of the city (which
for the Greeks was identical with the state); and this on the ground
that he did not mention—though the Greek Xenophon did, Herr Dühring —
the “limit”

“set by the given dimensions of the market to the further
differentiation of professions and the technical subdivision of special
operations... Only the conception of this limit constitutes the
knowledge with the aid of which this idea, otherwise hardly fit to be
called scientific, becomes a major economic truth” {20}.

It was in fact “Professor” Roscher {14}, of whom Herr Dühring is so
contemptuous, who set up this “limit” at which the idea of the division
of labour is supposed first to become “scientific”, and who therefore
expressly pointed to Adam Smith as the discoverer of the law of the
division of labour. In a society in which commodity production is the
dominant form of production, “the market”—to adopt Herr Dühring’s style
for once—was always a “limit” very well known to “business people” {18}.
But more than “the knowledge and instinct of routine” is needed to
realise that it was not the market that created the capitalist division
of labour, but that, on the contrary, it was the dissolution of former
social connections, and the division of labour resulting from this, that
created the market (see _Capital_, Vol. I, Ch. XXIV, 5: “Creation of the
Home-Market for Industrial Capital”).

“The role of money has at all times provided the first and main stimulus
to economic” (!) “ideas. But what did an Aristotle know of this role? No
more, clearly than was contained in the idea that exchange through the
medium of money had followed the primitive exchange by barter” {21}.

But when “an” Aristotle presumes to discover the two different _forms of
the circulation_ of money—the one in which it operates as a mere medium
of circulation, and the other in which it operates as money capital,

he is thereby—according to Herr Dühring—“only expressing a moral
antipathy”

And when “an” Aristotle carries his audacity so far as to attempt an
analysis of money in its “role” of a _measure of value_, and actually
states this problem, which has such decisive importance for the theory
of money, correctly—then “a” Dühring prefers (and for very good private
reasons) to say nothing about such impermissible temerity.

Final result: Greek antiquity, as mirrored in the “notice taken” {21} by
Dühring, in fact possessed “only quite ordinary ideas” (p. 25), if such
_“niaiserie” (p. 19)_ has anything whatever in common with ideas,
whether ordinary or extraordinary.

It would be better to read Herr Dühring's chapter on mercantilism
^([93]) in the “original”, that is, in F. List's _Nationales System_,
Chapter 29: “The Industrial System, Incorrectly Called the Mercantile
System by the School”. How carefully Herr Dühring manages to avoid here
too any “semblance of erudition” {17} is shown by the following passage,
among others:

List, Chapter 28: “The Italian Political Economists”, says:

“Italy was in advance of all modern nations both in the practice and in
the theory of political economy”,

and then he cites, as

“the first work written in Italy, which deals especially with political
economy, the book by Antonio Serra, of Naples, on the way to secure for
the kingdoms an abundance of gold and silver (1613)”.

Herr Dühring confidently accepts this and is therefore able to regard
Serra's _Breve trattato_

“as a kind of inscription at the entrance of the more recent prehistory
of economics” {34}.

His treatment of the _Breve trattato_ is in fact limited to this “piece
of literary buffoonery” {506}. Unfortunately, the actual facts of the
case were different: in 1609, that is four years before the _Breve
trattato_, Thomas Mun's _A Discourse of Trade etc_., had appeared. The
particular significance of this book was that, even in its first
edition, it was directed against the original _monetary system_ which
was then still defended in England as being the policy of the state;
hence it represented the conscious _self-separation_ of the mercantile
system from the system which gave it birth. Even in the form in which it
first appeared the book had several editions and exercised a direct
influence on legislation. In the edition of 1664 _(England's Treasure
etc.)_, which had been completely rewritten by the author and was
published after his death, it continued to be the mercantilist gospel
for another hundred years. If mercantilism therefore has an epoch-making
work “as a kind of inscription at the entrance”, it is this book, and
for this very reason it simply does not exist for Herr Dühring's
“history which most carefully observes the distinctions of rank” {133}.

Of _Petty_, the founder of modern political economy, Herr Dühring tells
us that there was

“a fair measure of superficiality in his way of thinking” {54} and that
“he had no sense of the intrinsic and nicer distinctions between
concepts” {55} ... while he possessed “a versatility which knows a great
deal but skips lightly from one thing to another without taking root in
any idea of a more profound character” {56}, .. his “national-economic
ideas are still very crude”, and “he achieves _naivetés_, whose
contrasts ... a more serious thinker may well find amusing at times”
{56}.

What inestimable condescension, therefore, for the “more serious
thinker” Herr Dühring to deign to take any notice at all of “a Petty”
{60}! And what notice does he take of him?

Petty's propositions on

“labour and even labour-time as a measure of value, of which _imperfect
traces_ can be found in his writings” {62}

are not mentioned again apart from this sentence. Imperfect traces! In
his _Treatise on Taxes and Contributions_ (first edition 1662), Petty
gives a perfectly clear and correct analysis of the magnitude of value
of commodities. In illustrating this magnitude at the outset by the
equal value of precious metals and corn on which the same quantity of
labour has been expended, he says the first and the last “theoretical”
word on the value of the precious metals. But he also lays it down in a
definite and general form that the values of commodities must be
measured by _equal labour._ He applies his discovery to the solution of
various problems, some of which are very intricate, and on various
occasions and in various works, even where he does not repeat the
fundamental proposition, he draws important conclusions from it. But
even in his very first work he says:

“This” (estimation by equal labour) “I say to be _the foundation of
equalizing and balancing of values_, yet in the superstructures and
practices hereupon, I confess there is much variety, and intricacy.”

Petty was thus conscious equally of the importance of his discovery and
of the difficulty of applying it in detail. He therefore tried to find
another way in certain concrete cases.

A _natural par_ should therefore be found between land and labour, so
that value might be expressed at will "by either of them alone as well
or better by both"

Even this error has genius.

Herr Dühring makes this penetrating observation on Petty's theory of
value:

“Had his own thought been more penetrating it would not be possible to
find, in other passages, traces of a contrary view, to which we have
previously referred” {63-64};

that is to say, to which no “previous” reference has been made except
that the “traces” are “imperfect”. This is very characteristic of Herr
Dühring's method—to allude to something “previously” in a meaningless
phrase, in order “subsequently” to make the reader believe that he has
“previously” been made acquainted with the main point, which in fact the
author in question has slid over both previously and subsequently.

In Adam Smith, however, we can find not only “traces” of “contrary
views” on the concept of value, not only two but even three, and
strictly speaking even four sharply contrary opinions on value, running
quite comfortably side by side and intermingled. But what is quite
natural in a writer who is laying the foundations of political economy
and is necessarily feeling his way, experimenting and struggling with a
chaos of ideas which are only just taking shape, may seem strange in a
writer who is surveying and summarising more than a hundred and fifty
years of investigation whose results have already passed in part from
books into the consciousness of the generality. And, to pass from great
things to small: as we have seen, Herr Dühring himself gives us five
different kinds of value to select from at will, and with them, an equal
number of contrary views. Of course, “had his own thought been more
penetrating”, he would not have had to expend so much effort in trying
to throw his readers back from Petty's perfectly clear conception of
value into the uttermost confusion.

A smoothly finished work of Petty’s which may be said to be cast in a
single block, is his _Quantulumcunque concerning Money_, published in
1682, ten years after his _Anatomy of Ireland (this_ “first” appeared in
1672, not 1691 as stated by Herr Dühring, who takes it second-hand from
the “most current textbook compilations”). ^([94]) In this book the last
vestiges of mercantilist views, found in other writings by him, have
completely disappeared. In content and form it is a little masterpiece,
and for this very reason Herr Dühring does not even mention its title.
It is quite in the order of things that in relation to the most
brilliant and original of economic investigators, our vainglorious and
pedantic mediocrity should only snarl his displeasure, and take offence
at the fact that the flashes of theoretical thought do not proudly
parade about in rank and file as ready-made “axioms” {D. Ph. 224}, but
merely rise sporadically to the surface from the depths of “crude” {D.
K. G. 57} practical material, for example, of taxes.

Petty's foundations of _Political Arithmetic_ {58}, _vulgo_ statistics,
are treated by Herr Dühring in the same way as that author’s
specifically economic works. He malevolently shrugs his shoulders at the
odd methods used by Petty! Considering the grotesque methods still
employed in this field a century later even by Lavoisier, ^([95]) and in
view of the great distance that separates even contemporary statistics
from the goal which Petty assigned to them in broad outline, such
self-satisfied superiority two centuries _post festum_ stands out in all
its undisguised stupidity.

Petty’s most important ideas—which received such scant attention in Herr
Dühring's “enterprise” {9}—are, in the latter's view, nothing but
disconnected conceits, chance thoughts, incidental comments, to which
only in our day a significance is given, by the use of excerpts torn
from their context, which in themselves they have not got; which
therefore also play no part in the _real_ history of political economy,
but only in modern books below the standard of Herr Dühring's
deep-rooted criticism and “historical depiction in the grand style”
{556}. In his “enterprise”, he seems to have had in view a circle of
readers who would have implicit faith and would never be bold enough to
ask for proof of his assertions. We shall return to this point soon
(when dealing with Locke and North), but must first take a fleeting
glance at Boisguillebert and Law.

In connection with the former, we must draw attention to the sole find
made by Herr Dühring: he has discovered a connection between
Boisguillebert and Law which had hitherto been missed. Boisguillebert
asserts that the precious metals could be replaced, in the normal
monetary functions which they fulfil in commodity circulation, by credit
money (_un morceau de papier_). Law on the other hand imagines that any
“increase” whatever in the number of these “pieces of paper” increases
the wealth of a nation. Herr Dühring draws from this the conclusion that
Boisguillebert’s

“turn of thought already harboured a new turn in mercantilism” {83}

in other words, already included Law. This is made as clear as daylight
in the following:

“_All_ that was necessary was to assign to the ‘simple pieces of paper’
the same role that the precious metals _should_ have played, and a
metamorphosis of mercantilism was thereby at once accomplished” {83}.

In the same way it is possible to accomplish at once the metamorphosis
of an uncle into an aunt. It is true that Herr Dühring adds appealingly:

“Of course Boisguillebert had no such purpose in mind” {83}.

But how, in the devil’s name, could he intend to replace his own
rationalist conception of the monetary function of the precious metals
by the superstitious conception of the mercantilists for the sole reason
that, according to him, the precious metals can be replaced in this role
by paper money?

Nevertheless, Herr Dühring continues in his serio-comic style,

“nevertheless it may be conceded that here and there our author
succeeded in making a really apt remark” (p. 83).

In reference to Law, Herr Dühring succeeded in making only this “really
apt remark”:

“Law too was naturally never able completely to _eradicate_ the
above-named basis” (namely, “the basis of the precious metals”), “but he
pushed the issue of notes to its extreme limit, that is to say, to the
collapse of the system” (p. 94).

In reality, however, these paper butterflies, mere money tokens, were
intended to flutter about among the public, not in order to “eradicate”
the basis of the precious metals, but to entice them from the pockets of
the public into the depleted treasuries of the state. ^([96])

To return to Petty and the inconspicuous role in the history of
economics assigned to him by Herr Dühring, let us first listen to what
we are told about Petty’s immediate successors, Locke and North. Locke’s
_Considerations on Lowering of Interest and Raising of Money_, and
North’s _Discourses upon Trade_, appeared in the same year, 1691.

“What he” (Locke) “wrote on interest and coin does not go beyond the
range of the reflections, current under the dominion of mercantilism, in
connection with the events of political life” (p. 64).

To the reader of this “report” it should now be clear as crystal why
Locke's _Lowering of Interest_ had such an important influence, in more
than one direction, on political economy in France and Italy during the
latter half of the eighteenth century.

“Many businessmen thought the same” (as Locke) “on free play for the
rate of interest, and the developing situation also produced the
tendency to regard restrictions on interest as ineffective. At a period
when a Dudley North could write his _Discourses upon Trade_ in the
direction of free trade, a great deal must already have been in the air,
as they say, which made the theoretical opposition to restrictions on
interest rates seem something not at all extraordinary” (p. 64).

So Locke had only to cogitate the ideas of this or that contemporary
“businessman”, or to breathe in a great deal of what was “in the air, as
they say” to be able to theorise on free play for the rate of interest
without saying anything “extraordinary”! In fact, however, as early as
1662, in his _Treatise on Taxes and Contributions_, Petty had
counterposed interest, as rent of money which we call usury to rent of
land and houses, and lectured the landlords, who wished to keep down by
legislation not of course land rent, but the rent of money, on the
vanity and fruitlessness of making civil positive law against the law of
nature. In his _Quantulumcunque_ (1682) he therefore declared that
legislative regulation of the rate of interest was as stupid as
regulation of exports of precious metals or regulation of exchange
rates. In the same work he made statements of unquestionable authority
on the raising of money (for example, the attempt to give sixpence the
name of one shilling by doubling the number of shillings coined from one
ounce of silver).

As regards this last point, Locke and North did little more than copy
him. In regard to interest, however, Locke followed Petty’s parallel
between rent of money and rent of land, while North goes further and
opposes interest as rent of stock to land rent, and the stocklords to
the landlords. And while Locke accepts free play for the rate of
interest, as demanded by Petty, only with reservations, North accepts it
unconditionally.

Herr Dühring—himself still a bitter mercantilist in the “more subtle”
{55} sense—surpasses himself when he dismisses Dudley North’s
_Discourses upon Trade_ with the comment that they were written “in the
direction of free trade” {64}. It is rather like saying of Harvey that
he wrote “in the direction” of the circulation of the blood. North's
work—apart from its other merits—is a classical exposition, driven home
with relentless logic, of the doctrine of free trade, both foreign and
internal—certainly “something extraordinary” {64} in the year 1691!

Herr Dühring, by the way, informs us that

North was a “merchant” and a bad type at that, also that his work “met
with no approval” {64}.

Indeed! How could anyone expect a book of this sort to have met with
“approval” among the mob setting the tone at the time of the final
triumph of protectionism in England? But this did not prevent it from
having an immediate effect on theory, as can be seen from a whole series
of economic works published in England shortly after it, some of them
even before the end of the seventeenth century.

Locke and North gave us proof of how the first bold strokes which Petty
dealt in almost every sphere of political economy were taken up one by
one by his English successors and further developed. The traces of this
process during the period 1691 to 1752 are obvious even to the most
superficial observer from the very fact that all the more important
economic writings of that time start from Petty, either positively or
negatively. That period, which abounded in original thinkers, is
therefore the most important for the investigation of the gradual
genesis of political economy. The “historical depiction in the grand
style” {556}, which chalks up against Marx the unpardonable sin of
making so much commotion in _Capital_ about Petty and the writers of
that period, simply strikes them right out of history. From Locke,
North, Boisguillebert and Law it jumps straight to the physiocrats, and
then, at the entrance to the real temple of political economy,
appears—David Hume. With Herr Dühring's permission, however, we restore
the chronological order, putting Hume before the physiocrats.

Hume’s economic _Essays_ appeared in 1752. In the related essays: _of
Money_, _of the Balance of Trade_, _of Commerce_, Hume follows step by
step, and often even in his personal idiosyncrasies, Jacob Vanderlint’s
_Money Answers All Things_, published in London in 1734. However unknown
this Vanderlint may have been to Herr Dühring, references to him can be
found in English economic works even at the end of the eighteenth
century, that is to say, in the period after Adam Smith.

Like Vanderlint, Hume treated money as a mere token of value; he copied
almost word for word (and this is important as he might have taken the
theory of money as a token of value from many other sources)
Vanderlint's argument on why the balance of trade cannot be permanently
either favourable or unfavourable to a country; like Vanderlint, he
teaches that the equilibrium of balances is brought about naturally, in
accordance with the different economic situations in the different
countries; like Vanderlint, he preaches free trade, but less boldly and
consistently; like Vanderlint, though with less profundity, he
emphasises wants as the motive forces of production; he follows
Vanderlint in the influence on commodity prices which he erroneously
attributes to bank money and government securities in general; like
Vanderlint, he rejects credit money; like Vanderlint, he makes commodity
prices dependent on the price of labour, that is, on wages; he even
copies Vanderlint’s absurd notion that by accumulating treasures
commodity prices are kept down, etc., etc.

At a much earlier point Herr Dühring made an oracular allusion to how
others had misunderstood Hume's monetary theory with a particularly
minatory reference to Marx, who in _Capital_ had, besides, pointed in a
manner contrary to police regulations to the secret connections of Hume
with Vanderlint and with J. Massie, who will be mentioned later.

As for this misunderstanding, the facts are as follows. In regard to
Hume’s real theory of money (that money is a mere token of value, and
therefore, other conditions being equal, commodity prices rise in
proportion to the increase in the volume of money in circulation, and
fall in proportion to its decrease), Herr Dühring, with the best
intentions in the world — though in his own luminous way—can only repeat
the errors made by his predecessors. Hume, however, after propounding
the theory cited above, himself raises the objection (as Montesquieu,
starting from the same premises, had done previously) that

nevertheless “’tis certain” that since the discovery of the mines in
America, “industry has encreased in all the nations of Europe, except in
the possessors of those mines”, and that this “may justly be ascribed,
amongst other reasons, to the encrease of gold and silver”.

His explanation of this phenomenon is that

“though the high price of commodities be a necessary consequence of the
encrease of gold and silver, yet it follows not immediately upon that
encrease; but some time is required before the money circulate through
the whole state, and make its effects be felt on all ranks of people”.
In this interval it has a beneficial effect on industry and trade.

At the end of this analysis Hume also tells us why this is so, although
in a less comprehensive way than many of his predecessors and
contemporaries:

“‘Tis easy to trace the money in its progress through the whole
commonwealth; where we shall find, that it must first quicken the
diligence of every individual, before _it encreases the price of
labour_."

In other words, Hume is here describing the effect of a revolution in
the value of the precious metals, namely, a depreciation, or, which is
the same thing, a revolution in the _measure of value_ of the precious
metals. He correctly ascertains that, in the slow process of readjusting
the prices of commodities, this depreciation "increases the price of
labour" — _vulgo_, wages—only in the last instance; that is to say, it
increases the profit made by merchants and industrialists at the cost of
the labourer (which he, however, thinks is just as it should be), and
thus “quickens diligence”. But he does not set himself the task of
answering the real scientific question, namely, whether and in what way
an increase in the supply of the precious metals, their value remaining
the same, affects the prices of commodities; and he lumps together
_every_ “increase of the precious metals” with their depreciation. Hume
therefore does precisely what Marx says he does _(Zur Kritik etc._, p.
141). We shall come back once more to this point in passing, but we must
first turn to Hume's essay on Interest.

Hume's arguments, expressly directed against Locke that the rate of
interest is not regulated by the amount of available money but by the
rate of profit, and his other explanations of the causes which determine
rises or falls in the rate of interest, are all to be found, much more
exactly though less cleverly stated, in An _Essay on the Governing
Causes of the Natural Rate of Interest; wherein the sentiments of Sir W.
Petty and Mr. Locke_, _on that head_, _are considered_. This work
appeared in 1750, two years before Hume's essay; its author was J.
Massie, a writer active in various fields, who had a wide public, as can
be seen from contemporary English literature. Adam Smith's discussion of
the rate of interest is closer to Massie than to Hume. Neither Massie
nor Hume know or say anything regarding the nature of “profit”, which
plays a role with both.

“In general,” Herr Dühring sermonises us, “the attitude of most of
Hume’s commentators has been very prejudiced, and ideas have been
attributed to him which he never entertained in the least” {131}.

And Herr Dühring himself gives us more than one striking example of this
“attitude”.

For example, Hume’s essay on interest begins with the following words:

“Nothing is esteemed a more certain sign of the flourishing condition of
any nation than the lowness of interest: And with reason; though I
believe the cause is somewhat different from what is commonly
apprehended.”

In the very first sentence, therefore, Hume cites the view that the
lowness of interest is the surest indication of the flourishing
condition of a nation as a commonplace which had already become trivial
in his day. And in fact this “idea” had already had fully a hundred
years, since Child, to become generally current. But we are told:

“Among” (Hume’s) “views on the rate of interest _we must particularly
draw attention to the idea_ that it is the true barometer of conditions”
(conditions of what?) “and that its lowness is an almost infallible sign
of the prosperity of a nation” (p. 130).

Who is the “prejudiced” and captivated “commentator” who says this? None
other than Herr Dühring.

What arouses the naive astonishment of our critical historian is the
fact that Hume, in connection with some felicitous idea or other, “does
not even claim to have originated it” {131}. This would certainly not
have happened to Herr Dühring.

We have seen how Hume confuses every increase of the precious metals
with such an increase as is accompanied by a depreciation, a revolution
in their own value, hence, in the measure of value of commodities. This
confusion was inevitable with Hume because he had not the slightest
understanding of the function of the precious metals as the _measure of
value._ And he could not have it, because he had absolutely no knowledge
of value itself. The word itself is to be found perhaps only once in his
essays, namely, in the passage where, in attempting to “correct” Locke's
erroneous notion that the precious metals had “only an imaginary value”,
he makes it even worse by saying that they had “merely a fictitious
value”.

In this he is much inferior not only to Petty but to many of his English
contemporaries. He shows the same “backwardness” in still proclaiming
the old-fashioned notion that the _“merchant” is_ the mainspring of
production—an idea which Petty had long passed beyond. As for Herr
Dühring’s assurance that in his essays Hume concerned himself with the
“chief economic relationships” {121}, if the reader only compares
Cantillon’s work quoted by Adam Smith (which appeared the same year as
Hume's essays, 1752, but many years after its author’s death), ^([97])
he will be surprised at the narrow range of Hume’s economic writings.
Hume, as we have said, in spite of the letters-patent issued to him by
Herr Dühring, is nevertheless quite a respectable figure also in the
field of political economy, but in this field he is anything but an
original investigator, and even less an epoch-making one. The influence
of his economic essays on the educated circles of his day was due not
merely to his excellent presentation, but principally to the fact that
the essays were a progressive and optimistic glorification of industry
and trade, which were then flourishing — in other words, of the
capitalist society which at that time was rapidly rising in England, and
whose “approval” they therefore had to gain. Let one instance suffice
here. Everyone knows the passionate fight that the masses of the English
people were waging, just in Hume’s day, against the system of indirect
taxes which was being regularly exploited by the notorious Sir Robert
Walpole for the relief of the landlords and of the rich in general. In
his essay _Of Taxes_, in which, without mentioning his name, Hume
polemises against his indispensable authority Vanderlint—the stoutest
opponent of indirect taxation and the most determined advocate of a land
tax—we read:

“They” (taxes on consumption) “must be very heavy taxes, indeed, and
very injudiciously levied, which the artisan will not, of himself, be
enabled to pay, by superior industry and frugality, _without raising the
price of his labour_.”

It is almost as if Robert Walpole himself were speaking, especially if
we also take into consideration the passage in the essay on “public
credit” in which, referring to the difficulty of taxing the state’s
creditors, the following is said:

“The diminution of their revenue would not be _disguised_ under the
appearance of a branch of excise or customs.”

As might have been expected of a Scotchman, Hume’s admiration of
bourgeois acquisitiveness was by no means purely platonic. Starting as a
poor man, he worked himself up to a very substantial annual income of
many thousands of pounds; which Herr Dühring (as he is here not dealing
with Petty) tactfully expresses in this way:

“Possessed of very small means to start with he succeeded, by good
_domestic economy_, in reaching the position of not having to write to
please anyone” {134}.

Herr Dühring further says:

“He had never made the slightest concession to the influence of parties,
princes or universities” {134}.

There is no evidence that Hume ever entered into a literary partnership
with a “Wagener”, ^([98]) but it is well known that he was an
indefatigable partisan of the Whig oligarchy, which thought highly of
_“Church_ and state”, and that in reward for these services he was given
first a secretaryship in the Embassy in Paris and subsequently the
incomparably more important and better-paid post of an Under-Secretary
of State.

“In politics Hume was and always remained conservative and strongly
monarchist in his views. For this reason he was never so bitterly
denounced for heresy as Gibbon by the supporters of the established
church,”

says old Schlosser.

“This selfish Hume, this lying historian” reproaches the English monks
with being fat, having neither wife nor family and living by begging;
“but he himself never had a family or a wife, and was a great, fat
fellow, fed, in considerable part, out of public money, without having
merited it by any real public services”—this is what the “rude” plebeian
Cobbett says.

Hume was “in essential respects greatly superior to a Kant in the
_practical_ management of life” {122}, is what Herr Dühring says.

But why is Hume given such an exaggerated position in _Kritische
Geschichte?_ Simply because this “serious and subtle thinker” {121} has
the honour of enacting the Dühring of the eighteenth century. Hume
serves as proof that

“the creation of this whole branch of science” (economics) “is the
achievement of a more enlightened philosophy” {123};

and similarly Hume as predecessor is the best guarantee that this whole
branch of science will find its close, for the immediately foreseeable
future, in that phenomenal man who has transformed the merely “more
enlightened” philosophy into the absolutely luminous philosophy of
reality, and with whom, just as was the case with Hume,

“the cultivation of philosophy in the narrow sense of the word is
combined — something unprecedented on German soil—with scientific
endeavours on behalf of the national economy” {D. Ph. 531}

Accordingly we find Hume, in any case respectable as an economist,
inflated into an economic star of the first magnitude, whose importance
has hitherto been denied only by the same envious people who have
hitherto also so obstinately hushed up Herr Dühring's achievements,
“authoritative for the epoch” {D. K. G. 1}.

* * *

The _physiocratic_ school left us in _Quesnay’s Tableau économique_, as
everyone knows, a nut on which all former critics and historians of
political economy have up to now broken their jaws in vain; This
_Tableau_, which was intended to bring out clearly the physiocrats’
conception of the production and circulation of a country's total
wealth, remained obscure enough for the succeeding generations of
economists. On this subject, too, Herr Dühring comes to finally
enlighten us.

What this “economic image of the relations of production and
distribution _means in Quesnay himself,”_ he says, can only be stated if
one has _“first carefully examined_ the leading ideas which are peculiar
to him”. All the more because these have hitherto been set forth only
with “wavering indefiniteness”, and their “essential features cannot be
recognised” {105} even in Adam Smith.

Herr Dühring will now once and for all put an end to this traditional
“superficial reporting”. He then proceeds to pull the reader’s leg
through five whole pages, five pages in which all kinds of pretentious
phrases, constant repetitions and calculated confusion are designed to
conceal the awkward fact that Herr Dühring has hardly as much to tell us
in regard to Quesnay's “leading ideas” {105}, as the “most current
textbook compilations” {109} against which he warns us so untiringly. It
is “one of the most dubious sides” {111} of this introduction that here
too the _Tableau_, which up to that point had only been mentioned by
name, is just casually snuffled at, and then gets lost in all sorts of
“reflections”, such as, for example, “the difference between effort and
result”. Though the latter, “it is true, is not to be found completed in
Quesnay's ideas”, Herr Dühring will give us a fulminating example of it
as soon as he comes from his lengthy introductory “effort” to his
remarkably shortwinded “result” {109}, that is to say, to his
elucidation of the _Tableau_ itself. We shall now give all, _literally
all_ that he feels it right to tell us of Quesnay’s _Tableau._

In his “effort” Herr Dühring says:

“It seemed to him“ (Quesnay) “self-evident that the proceeds” (Herr
Dühring had just spoken of the net product) “must be thought of and
treated as a _money value_ {105-06} ... He connected his deliberations”
(!) “immediately with the _money values_ which he assumed as the results
of the sales of all agricultural products when they first change hands.
In this way” (!) “he operates in the columns of his _Tableau_ with
several milliards” {106} (that is, with money values).

We have therefore learnt three times over that, in his _Tableau_,
Quesnay operates with the “money values” of “agricultural products”,
including the money values of the “net product” or “net proceeds”.
Further on in the text we find:

“Had Quesnay considered things from a really natural standpoint, and had
he rid himself not only of regard for the precious metals and the amount
of money, but also of regard for _money values..._ But as it is he
reckons solely with _sums of value_, and imagined” (!) “the net product
in advance as _a money value”_ {106}.

So for the fourth and fifth time: there are only money values in the
_Tableau!_

“He” (Quesnay) “obtained it” (the net product) “by deducting the
expenses and _thinking,” (!)_ “principally” (not traditional but for
that matter all the more superficial reporting) “of that value which
would accrue to the landlord as rent” {106}.

We have still not advanced a step; but now it is coming:

“On the other hand, _however_, _now also”_—this “however, now also” is a
gem!—“the net product, as a natural object, enters into circulation, and
in this way becomes an element which ... should serve ... to maintain
the class which is described as sterile. In this the confusion can _at
once_” (!)“be seen—the confusion arising from the fact that in one case
it is the money value, and in the other the thing itself, which
determines the course of thought” {106}.

In general, it seems, _all_ circulation of commodities suffers from the
“confusion“ that commodities enter into circulation simultaneously as
“natural objects” and as “money values”. But we are still moving in a
circle about “money value”, for

“Quesnay is anxious to avoid a double booking of the national-economic
proceeds” {106}.

With Herr Dühring's permission: In Quesnay's _Analysis_ at the foot of
the _Tableau_, the various kinds of products figure as “natural objects”
and above, in the _Tableau_ itself, their money values are given.
Subsequently Quesnay even made his famulus, the Abbé Baudeau, include
the natural objects in the _Tableau_ itself, _beside_ their money
values.

After all this “effort“, we at last get the “result”. Listen and marvel
at these words:

“Nevertheless, the inconsequence“ (referring to the role assigned by
Quesnay to the landlords) _“at once_ becomes clear when we enquire _what
becomes of the net product_, _which has been appropriated as rent_, _in
the course of the national-economic circulation._ In regard to this the
physiocrats and the _economic Tableau_ could offer nothing but confused
and arbitrary conceptions, ascending to mysticism” {110}.

All’s well that ends well. So Herr Dühring does not know “what becomes
of the net product, which has been appropriated as rent, in the course
of the national-economic circulation” (represented in the _Tableau_). To
him, the _Tableau is_ the “squaring of the circle” {110}. By his own
confession, he does not understand the ABC of physiocracy. After all the
beating about the bush, the dropping of buckets into an empty well, the
hying hither and thither, the harlequinades, episodes, diversions,
repetitions and stupefying mix-ups whose sole purpose was to prepare us
for the imposing conclusion, “what the _Tableau_ means in Quesnay
himself” {105}—after all this Herr Dühring's shamefaced confession that
_he himself does not know_.

Once he has shaken off this painful secret, this Horatian “black care”
which sat hunched on his back during his ride through the land of the
physiocrats, our “serious and subtle thinker” blows another merry blast
on his trumpet, as follows:

“The lines which Quesnay draws here and there” (in all there are just
five of them!) “in his otherwise fairly simple” (!) “_Tableau_, and
which are meant to represent the circulation of the net product”, make
one wonder whether “these whimsical combinations of columns” may not be
suffused with fantastic mathematics; they are reminiscent of Quesnay’s
attempts to square the circle” {110}—and so forth.

As Herr Dühring, by his own admission, was unable to understand these
lines in spite of their simplicity, he had to follow his favourite
procedure of _casting suspicion_ on them. And now he can confidently
deliver the _coup de grâce_ to the vexatious _Tableau:_

“We have considered the net product in this its _most dubious aspect”_
{111}, etc.

So the confession he was constrained to make that he does not understand
the first word about the _Tableau économique_ and the “role” played by
the net product which figures in it—that is what Herr Dühring calls “the
most dubious aspect of the net product”! What grim humour!

But in order that our readers may not be left in the same cruel
ignorance about Quesnay’s _Tableau_ as those necessarily are who receive
their economic wisdom “first hand” from Herr Dühring, we will explain it
briefly as follows:

As is known, the physiocrats divide society into three classes: (1) The
productive, i.e., the class which is actually engaged in agriculture —
tenant-farmers and agricultural labourers; they are called productive,
because their labour yields a surplus: rent. (2) The class which
appropriates this surplus, including the landowners and their retainers,
the prince and in general all officials paid by the state, and finally
also the Church in its special character as appropriator of tithes. For
the sake of brevity, in what follows we call the first class simply
“farmers”, and the second class “landlords”. (3) The industrial or
sterile class; sterile because, in the view of the physiocrats, it adds
to the raw materials delivered to it by the productive class only as
much value as it consumes in means of subsistence supplied to it by that
same class. Quesnay's _Tableau_ was intended to portray how the total
annual product of a country (concretely, France) circulates among these
three classes and facilitates annual reproduction.

The first premise of the _Tableau_ was that the farming system and with
it large-scale agriculture, in the sense in which this term was
understood in Quesnay’s time, had been generally introduced, Normandy,
Picardy, Île-de-France and a few other French provinces serving as
prototypes. The farmer therefore appears as the real leader in
agriculture, as he represents in the _Tableau_ the whole productive
(agricultural) class and pays the landlord a rent in money. An invested
capital or inventory of ten milliard livres is assigned to the farmers
as a whole; of this sum, one-fifth, or two milliards, is the working
capital which has to be replaced every year—this figure too was
estimated on the basis of the best-managed farms in the provinces
mentioned above.

Further premises: (1) that for the sake of simplicity constant prices
and simple reproduction prevail; (2) that all circulation which takes
place solely within one class is excluded, and that only circulation
between class and class is taken into account; (3) that all purchases
and sales taking place between class and class in the course of the
industrial year are combined in a single total sum. Lastly, it must be
borne in mind that in Quesnay’s time in France, as was more or less the
case throughout Europe, the home industry of the peasant families
satisfied by far the greater portion of their needs other than food, and
is therefore taken for granted here as supplementary to agriculture.

The starting-point of the _Tableau is_ the total harvest, the gross
product of the annual yield of the soil, which is consequently placed as
the first item—or the “total reproduction” of the country, in this case
France. The magnitude of value of this gross product is estimated on the
basis of the average prices of agricultural products among the trading
nations. It comes to five milliard livres, a sum which roughly expresses
the money value of the gross agricultural production of France based on
such statistical estimates as were then possible. This and nothing else
is the reason why in his _Tableau_ Quesnay “operates with several
milliards” {106}, to be precise, with five milliards, and not with five
_livres tournois_. ^([99])

The whole gross product, of a value of five milliards, is therefore in
the hands of the productive class, that is, in the first place the
farmers, who have produced it by advancing an annual working capital of
two milliards, which corresponds to an invested capital of ten
milliards. The agricultural products—foodstuffs, raw materials,
etc.—which are required for the replacement of the working capital,
including therefore the maintenance of all persons directly engaged in
agriculture, are taken in _natura_ from the total harvest and expended
for the purpose of new agricultural production. Since, as we have seen,
constant prices and simple reproduction on a given scale are assumed,
the money value of the portion which is thus taken from the gross
product is equal to two milliard livres. This portion, therefore, does
not enter into general circulation. For, as we have noted, circulation
which takes place only _within_ a particular class, and not between one
class and another, is excluded from the _Tableau._

After the replacement of the working capital out of the gross product
there remains a surplus of three milliards, of which two are in means of
subsistence and one in raw materials. The rent which the farmers have to
pay to the landlords is however only two-thirds of this sum, equal to
two milliards. It will soon be seen why it is only these two milliards
which figure under the heading of “net product” or “net income” {106}.

But in addition to the “total reproduction” of agriculture amounting in
value to five milliards, of which three milliards enter into general
circulation, there is also in the hands of the farmers, _before_ the
movement described in the _Tableau_ begins, the whole "_pécule_" of the
nation, two milliards of cash money. This comes about in the following
way.

As the total harvest is the starting-point of the _Tableau_, this
starting-point also forms the closing point of an economic year, for
example, of the year 1758, from which point a new economic year begins.
During the course of this new year, 1759, the portion of the gross
product destined to enter into circulation is distributed among the two
other classes through the medium of a number of individual payments,
purchases and sales. These movements separated, following each other in
succession, and stretching over a whole year, are however—as was bound
to happen in any case in the _Tableau_—combined into a few
characteristic transactions each of which embraces a whole year's
operations at once. This, then, is how at the close of the year 1758
there has flowed back to the farmer class the money paid by it to the
landlords as rent for the year 1757 (the _Tableau_ itself will show how
this comes about), amounting to two milliards; so that the farmer class
can again throw this sum into circulation in 1759. Since, however, that
sum, as Quesnay observes, is much larger than is required in reality for
the total circulation of the country (France), inasmuch as there is a
constant succession of separate payments, the two milliard livres in the
hands of the farmers represent the total money in circulation in the
nation.

The class of landlords drawing rent first appears, as is the case
sometimes even today, in the role of receivers of payments. On Quesnay's
assumption the landlords proper receive only foursevenths of the two
milliards of rent: two-sevenths go to the government, and one-seventh to
the receivers of tithes. In Quesnay's day the Church was the biggest
landlord in France and in addition received the tithes on all other
landed property.

The working capital (_avances annuelles_) advanced by the “sterile”
class in the course of a whole year consists of raw materials to the
value of one milliard—only raw materials, because tools, machinery,
etc., are included among the products of that class itself. The many
different roles, however, played by such products in the industrial
enterprises of this class do not concern the _Tableau_ any more than the
circulation of commodities and money which takes place exclusively
within that class. The wages for the labour by which the sterile class
transforms the raw materials into manufactured goods are equal to the
value of the means of subsistence which it receives in part directly
from the productive class, and in part indirectly, through the
landlords. Although it is itself divided into capitalists and
wage-workers, it forms, according to Quesnay's basic conception, an
integral class which is in the pay of the productive class and of the
landlords. The total industrial production, and consequently also its
total circulation, which is distributed over the year following the
harvest, is likewise combined into a single whole. It is therefore
assumed that at the beginning of the movement set out in the _Tableau_
the annual commodity production of the sterile class is entirely in its
hands, and consequently that its whole working capital, consisting of
raw materials to the value of one milliard, has been converted into
goods to the value of two milliards, one-half of which represents the
price of the means of subsistence consumed during this transformation.
An objection might be raised here: Surely the sterile class also uses up
industrial products for its own domestic needs; where are these shown,
if its own total product passes through circulation to the other
classes? This is the answer we are given: The sterile class not only
itself consumes a portion of its own commodities, but in addition it
strives to retain as much of the rest as possible. It therefore sells
the commodities thrown by it into circulation above their real value,
and must do this, as we have evaluated these commodities at the total
value of their production. This, however, does not affect the figures of
the _Tableau_, for the two other classes receive manufactured goods only
to the value of their total production.

So now we know the economic position of the three different classes at
the beginning of the movement set out in the _Tableau._

The productive class, after its working capital has been replaced in
kind, still has three milliards of the gross product of agriculture and
two milliards in money. The landlord class appears only with its rent
claim of two milliards on the productive class. The sterile class has
two milliards in manufactured goods. Circulation passing between only
two of these three classes is called imperfect by the physiocrats;
circulation which takes place between all three classes is called
perfect.

Now for the economic _Tableau_ itself.

_First_ (imperfect) _Circulation:_ The farmers pay the landlords the
rent due to them with two milliards of money, without receiving anything
in return. With one of these two milliards the landlords buy means of
subsistence from the farmers, to whom one-half of the money expended by
them in the payment of rent thus returns.

In his _Analyse du Tableau économique_ Quesnay does not make further
mention of the state, which receives two-sevenths, or of the Church,
which receives one-seventh, of the land rent, as their social roles are
generally known. In regard to the landlord class proper, however, he
says that its expenditure (in which that of all its retainers is
included) is at least as regards the great bulk of it unfruitful
expenditure, with the exception of that small portion which is used “for
the maintenance and improvement of their lands and the raising of their
standard of cultivation”. But by “natural law” their proper function
consists precisely in “provision for the good management and expenditure
for the maintenance of their patrimony in good repair”, or, as is
explained further on, in making the _avances foncieres_, that is,
outlays for the preparation of the soil and provision of all equipment
needed by the farms, which enable the farmer to devote his whole capital
exclusively to the business of actual cultivation.

_Second_ (perfect) _Circulation:_ With the second milliard of money
still remaining in their hands, the landlords purchase manufactured
goods from the sterile class, and the latter, with the money thus
obtained, purchases from the farmers means of subsistence for the same
sum.

_Third_ (imperfect) _Circulation:_ The farmers buy from the sterile
class, with one milliard of money, a corresponding amount of
manufactured goods; a large part of these goods consists of agricultural
implements and other means of production required in agriculture. The
sterile class returns the same amount of money to the farmers, buying
raw materials with it to the value of one milliard to replace its own
working capital. Thus the two milliards expended by the farmers in
payment of rent have flowed back to them, and the movement is closed.
And therewith also the great riddle is solved:

“what becomes of the net product, which has been appropriated as rent,
in the course of the economic circulation?” {110.}

We saw above that at the starting-point of the process there was a
surplus of three milliards in the hands of the productive class. Of
these, only two were paid as net product in the form of rent to the
landlords. The third milliard of the surplus constitutes the interest on
the total invested capital of the farmers, that is, ten per cent on ten
milliards. They do not receive this interest—this should be carefully
noted—from circulation; it exists _in natura_ in their hands, and they
realise it only in circulation, by thus converting it into manufactured
goods of equal value.

If it were not for this interest, the farmer—the chief agent in
agriculture—would not advance the capital for investment in it. Already
from this standpoint, according to the physiocrats, the appropriation by
the farmer of that portion of the agricultural _surplus proceeds_ which
represents interest is as necessary a condition of reproduction as the
farmer class itself; and hence this element cannot be put in the
category of the national “net product” or “net income”; for the latter
is characterised precisely by the fact that it is consumable without any
regard to the immediate needs of national reproduction. This fund of one
milliard, however, serves, according to Quesnay, for the most part to
cover the repairs which become necessary in the course of the year, and
the partial renewals of invested capital; further, as a reserve fund
against accidents, and lastly, where possible, for the enlargement of
the invested and working capital, as well as for the improvement of the
soil and extension of cultivation.

The whole process is certainly “fairly simple” {110}. There enter into
circulation: from the farmers, two milliards in money for the payment of
rent, and three milliards in products, of which two-thirds are means of
subsistence and one-third raw materials; from the sterile class, two
milliards in manufactured goods. Of the means of subsistence amounting
to two milliards, one half is consumed by the landlords and their
retainers, the other half by the sterile class in payment for its
labour. The raw materials to the value of one milliard replace the
working capital of this latter class. Of the manufactured goods in
circulation, amounting to two milliards, one half goes to the landlords
and the other to the farmers, for whom it is only a converted form of
the interest, which accrues at first hand from agricultural
reproduction, on their invested capital. The money thrown into
circulation by the farmer in payment of rent flows back to him, however,
through the sale of his products, and thus the same process can take
place again in the next economic year.

And now we must admire Herr Dühring's “really critical” {D. Ph. 404}
exposition, which is so infinitely superior to the “traditional
superficial reporting” {D. K. G. 105}. After mysteriously pointing out
to us five times in succession how hazardous it was for Quesnay to
operate in the _Tableau_ with mere money values—which moreover turned
out not to be true—he finally reaches the conclusion that, when he asks,

“what becomes of the net product, which has been appropriated as rent,
in the course of the national-economic circulation?”—the economic
_Tableau_ “could offer nothing but confused and arbitrary conceptions,
ascending to mysticism” {110}.

We have seen that the _Tableau_—this both simple and, for its time,
brilliant depiction of the annual process of reproduction through the
medium of circulation—gives a very exact answer to the question of what
becomes of this net product in the course of national-economic
circulation. Thus once again the “mysticism” and the “confused and
arbitrary conceptions” are left simply and solely with Herr Dühring, as
“the most dubious aspect” and the sole “net product” {111} of his study
of physiocracy.

[table insert]

Herr Dühring is just as familiar with the historical influence of the
physiocrats as with their theories.

“With Turgot,” he teaches us, “physiocracy in France came to an end both
in practice and in theory” {120}.

That Mirabeau, however, was essentially a physiocrat in his economic
views; that he was the leading economic authority in the Constituent
Assembly of 1789; that this Assembly in its economic reforms translated
from theory into practice a substantial portion of the physiocrats'
principles, and in particular laid a heavy tax also on land rent, the
net product appropriated by the landowners “without consideration”—all
this does not exist for “a” Dühring. —

Just as the long stroke drawn through the years 1691 to 1752 removed all
of Hume’s predecessors, so another stroke obliterated Sir James Steuart,
who came between Hume and Adam Smith. There is not a syllable in Herr
Dühring's “enterprise” {9} on Steuart’s great work, which, apart from
its historical importance, permanently enriched the domain of political
economy. But, instead, Herr Dühring applies to him the most abusive
epithet in his vocabulary, and says that he was _“a professor”_ {136} in
Adam Smith’s time. Unfortunately this insinuation is a pure invention.
Steuart, as a matter of fact, was a large landowner in Scotland, who was
banished from Great Britain for alleged complicity in the Stuart plot
and through long residence and his journeys on the Continent made
himself familiar with economic conditions in various countries.

In a word: according to the _Kritische Geschichte_ the only value all
earlier economists had was to serve either as “rudiments” {1} of Herr
Dühring's “authoritative” {1} and deeper foundations, or, because of
their unsound doctrines, as a foil to the latter. In political economy,
however, there are also some heroes who represent not only “rudiments”
of the “deeper foundation” {D. C. 11}, but “principles” {5} from which
this foundation, as was prescribed in Herr Dühring’s natural philosophy,
is not “developed” {353} but actually “composed”: for example, the
“incomparably great and eminent” {16} _List_, who, for the benefit of
German manufacturers, puffed up the “more subtle” mercantilistic
teachings of a Ferrier and others into “mightier” words; also _Care_,
who reveals the true essence of his wisdom in the following sentence:

“Ricardo’s system is one of discords ... its whole tends to the
production of hostility among classes ... his book is the true manual of
the demagogue, who seeks power by means of agrarianism, war, and
plunder”;

People who want to study the history of political economy in the present
and immediately foreseeable future will certainly be on much safer
ground if they make themselves acquainted with the “watery products”,
“commonplaces” and “beggars’ soup” {14} of the “most current text-book
compilations” {109}, rather than rely on Herr Dühring’s “historical
depiction in the grand style” {556}.

* * *

What, then, is the final result of our analysis of Dühring’s “very own
system” of political economy? Nothing, except the fact that with all the
great words and the still more mighty promises we are just as much duped
as we were in the _Philosophy._ His theory of value, this “touchstone of
the worth of economic systems” {499}, amounts to this: that by value
Herr Dühring understands five totally different and directly
contradictory things, and, therefore, to put it at its best, himself
does not know what he wants. The “natural laws of all economics” {D. C.
4}, ushered in with such pomp, prove to be merely universally familiar
and often not even properly understood platitudes of the worst
description. The sole explanation of economic facts which his “very own”
system can give us is that they are the result of “force”, a term with
which the philistine of all nations has for thousands of years consoled
himself for everything unpleasant that happens to him, and which leaves
us just where we were. Instead however of investigating the origin and
effects of this force, Herr Dühring expects us to content ourselves
gratefully with the mere _word_ “force” as the last final cause and
ultimate explanation of all economic phenomena. Compelled further to
elucidate capitalist exploitation of labour, he first represents it in a
general way as based on taxes and price surcharges, thereby completely
appropriating the Proudhonian “deduction” _(prélèvement)_, and then
proceeding to explain it in detail by means of Marx’s theory of
surplus-labour, surplus-product and surplus-value. In this way he
manages to bring about a happy reconciliation of two totally
contradictory modes of outlook, by copying down both without taking his
breath. And just as in philosophy he could not find enough hard words
for the very Hegel whom he was so constantly exploiting and at the same
time emasculating, so in the _Kritische Geschichte_ the most baseless
calumniation of Marx only serves to conceal the fact that everything in
the _Cursus_ about capital and labour which makes any sense at all is
likewise an emasculated plagiarism of Marx. His ignorance, which in the
_Cursus_ puts the “large landowner” at the beginning of the history of
the civilised peoples, and knows not a word of the common ownership of
land in the tribal and village communities, which is the real
starting-point of all history — this ignorance, at the present day
almost incomprehensible, is well-nigh surpassed by the ignorance which,
in the _Kritische Geschichte_, thinks not little of itself because of
“the universal breadth of its historical survey” {2}, and of which we
have given only a few deterrent examples. In a word: first the colossal
“effort” of self-admiration, of charlatan blasts on his own trumpet, of
promises each surpassing the other; and then the “result” {109}—exactly
nil.



PART III: SOCIALISM


I. Historical

We saw in the “Introduction” ^([100]) how the French philosophers of the
eighteenth century, the forerunners of the Revolution, appealed to
reason as the sole judge of all that is. A rational government, rational
society, were to be founded; everything that ran counter to eternal
reason was to be remorselessly done away with. We saw also that this
eternal reason was in reality nothing but the idealised understanding of
the eighteenth century citizen, just then evolving into the bourgeois.
The French Revolution had realised this rational society and government.
But, the new order of things, rational enough as compared with earlier
conditions, turned out to be by no means absolutely rational. The state
based upon reason completely collapsed. Rousseau’s Contrat Social had
found its realisation in the Reign of Terror, from which the
bourgeoisie, who had lost confidence in their own political capacity,
had taken refuge first in the corruption of the Directorate, and,
finally, under the wing of the Napoleonic despotism. ^([101]) The
promised eternal peace was turned into an endless war of conquest. The
society based upon reason had fared no better. The antagonism between
rich and poor, instead of dissolving into general prosperity, had become
intensified by the removal of the guild and other privileges, which had
to some extent bridged it over, and by the removal of the charitable
institutions of the Church. The development of industry upon a
capitalistic basis made poverty and misery of the working masses
conditions of existence of society. The number of crimes increased from
year to year. Formerly, the feudal vices had openly stalked about in
broad daylight; though not eradicated, they were now at any rate thrust
into the background. In their stead, the bourgeois vices, hitherto
practiced in secret, began to blossom all the more luxuriantly. Trade
became to a greater and greater extent cheating. The “fraternity” of the
revolutionary motto ^([102]) was realised in the chicanery and rivalries
of the battle of competition. Oppression by force was replaced by
corruption; the sword, as the first social lever, by gold. The right of
the first night was transferred from the feudal lords to the bourgeois
manufacturers. Prostitution increased to an extent never heard of.
Marriage itself remained, as before, the legally recognised form, the
official cloak of prostitution, and, moreover, was supplemented by rich
crops of adultery. In a word, compared with the splendid promises of the
philosophers, the social and political institutions born of the “triumph
of reason” were bitterly disappointing caricatures. All that was wanting
was the men to formulate this disappointment and they came with the turn
of the century. In 1802 Saint-Simon's Geneva letters appeared; in 1808
appeared Fourier's first work, ^([103]) although the groundwork of his
theory dated from 1799; on January 1, 1800, Robert Owen undertook the
direction of New Lanark.

At this time, however, the capitalist mode of production, and with it
the antagonism between the bourgeoisie and the proletariat, was still
very incompletely developed. Modern industry, which had just arisen in
England, was still unknown in France. But modern industry develops, on
the one hand, the conflicts which make absolutely necessary a revolution
in the mode of production, conflicts not only between the classes
begotten of it, but also between the very productive forces and the
forms of exchange created by it. And, on the other hand, it develops, in
these very gigantic productive forces, the means of ending these
conflicts. If, therefore, about the year 1800, the conflicts arising
from the new social order were only just beginning to take shape, this
holds still more fully as to the means of ending them. The propertyless
masses of Paris, during the Reign of Terror, were able for a moment to
gain the mastery. But, in doing so, they only proved how impossible it
was for their domination to last under the conditions then obtaining.
The proletariat, which then for the first time evolved itself from these
propertyless masses as the nucleus of a new class, as yet quite
incapable of independent political action, appeared as an oppressed,
suffering estate, to whom, in its incapacity to help itself, help could,
at best, be brought in from without or down from above.

This historical situation also dominated the founders of socialism. To
the crude conditions of capitalist production and the crude class
conditions corresponded crude theories. The solution of the social
problems, which as yet lay hidden in undeveloped economic conditions,
the utopians attempted to evolve out of the human brain. Society
presented nothing but wrongs; to remove these was the task of reason. It
was necessary, then, to discover a new and more perfect system of social
order and to impose this upon society from without by propaganda, and,
wherever it was possible, by the example of model experiments. These new
social systems were foredoomed as utopian; the more completely they were
worked out in detail, the more they could not avoid drifting off into
pure fantasies.

These facts once established, we need not dwell a moment longer upon
this side of the question, now wholly belonging to the past. We can
leave it to the literary small fry à la Dühring to solemnly quibble over
these fantasies, which today only make us smile, and to crow over the
superiority of their own bald reasoning, as compared with such
“insanity” {D. K. G. 276, 278, 283}. For ourselves, we delight in the
stupendously grand thoughts and germs of thought that everywhere break
out through their fantastic covering, and to which these philistines are
blind.

Already in his Geneva letters, Saint-Simon lays down the proposition
that

“all men ought to work”.

In the same work he recognises also that the Reign of Terror was the
reign of the non-possessing masses.

“See,” says he to them, “what happened in France at the time when your
comrades held sway there; they brought about a famine.”

But to recognise the French Revolution as a class war between nobility,
bourgeoisie, and the non-possessors, was, in the year 1802, a most
pregnant discovery. In 1816, he declares that politics is the science of
production, and foretells the complete absorption of politics by
economics. The knowledge that economic conditions are the basis of
political institutions appears here only in embryo. Yet what is here
already very plainly expressed is the idea of the future conversion of
political rule over men into an administration of things and a direction
of processes of production — that is to say, the “abolition of the
state”, about which recently there has been so much noise. Saint-Simon
shows the same superiority over his contemporaries, when in 1814,
immediately after the entry of the allies into Paris, ^([104]) and again
in 1815, during the Hundred Days’ War, ^([105]) he proclaims the
alliance of France with England, and then of both these countries with
Germany, as the only guarantee for the prosperous development and peace
of Europe. To preach to the French in 1815 an alliance with the victors
of Waterloo at any rate required somewhat more courage than to declare a
war of tittle-tattle on German professors. ^([106])

If in Saint-Simon we find a comprehensive breadth of view, by virtue of
which almost all the ideas of later Socialists, that are not strictly
economic, are found in him in embryo, we find in Fourier a criticism of
the existing conditions of society, genuinely French and witty, but not
upon that account any the less thorough. Fourier takes the bourgeoisie,
their inspired prophets before the Revolution, and their interested
eulogists after it, at their own word. He lays bare remorselessly the
material and moral misery of the bourgeois world. He confronts it with
the philosophers’ dazzling promises of a society in which reason alone
should reign, of a civilisation in which happiness should be universal,
of an illimitable human perfectibility, and with the rose-coloured
phraseology of the bourgeois ideologists of his time. He points out how
everywhere the most pitiful reality corresponds with the most
high-sounding phrases, and he overwhelms this hopeless fiasco of phrases
with his mordant sarcasm. Fourier is not only a critic; his
imperturbably serene nature makes him a satirist, and assuredly one of
the greatest satirists of all time. He depicts, with equal power and
charm, the swindling speculations that blossomed out upon the downfall
of the Revolution, and the shopkeeping spirit prevalent in, and
characteristic of, French commerce at that time. Still more masterly is
his criticism of the bourgeois form of the relations between the sexes,
and the position of woman in bourgeois society. He was the first to
declare that in any given society the degree of woman’s emancipation is
the natural measure of the general emancipation. ^([107]) But Fourier is
at his greatest in his conception of the history of society. He divides
its whole course, thus far, into four stages of evolution — savagery,
the patriarchate barbarism, civilisation. This last is identical with
the so-called bourgeois society of today. He proves

“that the civilised stage raises every vice practiced by barbarism in a
simple fashion into a form of existence, complex, ambiguous, equivocal,
hypocritical”,

that civilisation moves in a “vicious circle”, in contradictions which
it constantly reproduces without being able to solve them; hence it
constantly arrives at the very opposite to that which it wants to
attain, or pretends to want to attain, so that, e.g.,

“under civilisation _poverty is born of superabundance itself_”.

Fourier, as we see, uses the dialectic method in the same masterly way
as his contemporary, Hegel. Using these same dialectics, he argues
against the talk about illimitable human perfectibility, that every
historical phase has its period of ascent and also its period of
descent, and he applies this observation to the future of the whole
human race. As Kant introduced into natural science the idea of the
ultimate destruction of the earth, Fourier introduced into historical
science that of the ultimate destruction of the human race. —

Whilst in France the hurricane of the Revolution swept over the land, in
England a quieter, but not on that account less tremendous, revolution
was going on. Steam and the new tool-making machinery were transforming
manufacture into modern industry, and thus revolutionising the whole
foundation of bourgeois society. The sluggish march of development of
the manufacturing period changed into a veritable storm and stress
period of production. With constantly increasing swiftness the
splitting-up of society into large capitalists and non-possessing
proletarians went on. Between these, instead of the former stable middle
class, an unstable mass of artisans and small shopkeepers, the most
fluctuating portion of the population, now led a precarious existence.
The new mode of production was, as yet, only at the beginning of its
period of ascent; as yet it was the normal method of production — the
only one possible under existing conditions. Nevertheless, even then it
was producing crying social abuses — the herding together of a homeless
population in the worst quarters of the large towns; the loosening of
all traditional moral bonds, of patriarchal subordination, of family
relations, overwork, especially of women and children, to a frightful
extent; complete demoralisation of the working class, suddenly flung
into altogether new conditions. At this juncture there came forward as a
reformer a manufacturer 29 years old — a man of almost sublime,
child-like simplicity of character, and at the same time one of the few
born leaders of men. Robert Owen had adopted the teaching of the
materialistic philosophers: that man's character is the product, on the
one hand, of heredity; on the other, of the environment of the
individual during his lifetime, and especially during his period of
development. In the industrial revolution most of his class saw only
chaos and confusion, and the opportunity of fishing in these troubled
waters and making large fortunes quickly. He saw in it the opportunity
of putting into practice his favourite theory, and so of bringing order
out of chaos. He had already tried it with success, as superintendent of
more than five hundred men in a Manchester factory. From 1800 to 1829,
he directed the great cotton-mill at New Lanark, in Scotland, as
managing partner, along the same lines, but with greater freedom of
action and with a success that made him a European reputation. A
population, originally consisting of the most diverse and, for the most
part, very demoralised elements, a population that gradually grew to
2,500, he turned into a model colony, in which drunkenness, police,
magistrates, lawsuits, poor laws, charity, were unknown. And all this
simply by placing the people in conditions worthy of human beings, and
especially by carefully bringing up the rising generation. He was the
founder of infant schools, and introduced them first at New Lanark. At
the age of two the children came to school, where they enjoyed
themselves so much that they could scarcely be got home again. Whilst
his competitors worked their people thirteen or fourteen hours a day, in
New Lanark the working-day was only ten and a half hours. When a crisis
in cotton stopped work for four months, his workers received their full
wages all the time. And with all this the business more than doubled in
value, and to the last yielded large profits to its proprietors.

In spite of all this, Owen was not content. The existence which he
secured for his workers was, in his eyes, still far from being worthy of
human beings.

“The people were slaves at my mercy.”

The relatively favourable conditions in which he had placed them were
still far from allowing a rational development of the character and of
the intellect in all directions, much less of the free exercise of all
their faculties.

“And yet the working part of this population of 2,500 persons was
producing as much real wealth for society, as, less than half a century
before, it would have required the working part of a population of
600,000 to create. I asked myself what became of the difference between
the wealth consumed by 2,500 persons and that which would have been
consumed by 600,000.”

The answer was clear. It had been used to pay the proprietors of the
establishment 5 per cent on the capital they had laid out, in addition
to over £300,000 (6,000,000 marks) clear profit. And that which held for
New Lanark held to a still greater extent for all the factories in
England.

“If this new wealth had not been created by machinery, the wars in
opposition to Napoleon, and to support the aristocratic principles of
society, could not have been maintained. And yet this new power was the
creation of the working class.” ^([108])

To them, therefore, the fruits of this new power belonged. The
newly-created gigantic productive forces hitherto used only to enrich
individuals and to enslave the masses, offered to Owen the foundations
for a reconstruction of society; they were destined, as the common
property of all, to be worked for the common good of all.

Owen’s communism was based upon this purely business foundation, the
outcome, so to say, of commercial calculation. Throughout, it maintained
this practical character. Thus, in 1823, Owen proposed the relief of the
distress in Ireland by communist colonies, and drew up complete
estimates of costs of founding them, yearly expenditure, and probable
revenue. And in his definite plan for the future, the technical working
out of details is managed with such practical knowledge that the Owen
method of social reform once accepted, there is from the practical point
of view little to be said against the actual arrangement of details.

His advance in the direction of communism was the turning-point in
Owen’s life. As long as he was simply a philanthropist, he was rewarded
with nothing but wealth, applause, honour, and glory. He was the most
popular man in Europe. Not only men of his own class, but statesmen and
princes listened to him approvingly. But when he came out with his
communist theories, that was quite another thing. Three great obstacles
seemed to him especially to block the path to social reform: private
property, religion, the present form of marriage. He knew what
confronted him if he attacked these — outlawry, excommunication from
official society, the loss of his whole social position. But nothing of
this prevented him from attacking them without fear of consequences, and
what he had foreseen happened. Banished from official society, with a
conspiracy of silence against him in the press, ruined by his
unsuccessful communist experiments in America, in which he sacrificed
all his fortune, he turned directly to the working class and continued
working in their midst for thirty years. Every social movement, every
real advance in England on behalf of the workers links itself on to the
name of Robert Owen. He forced through in 1819, after five years’
fighting, the first law limiting the hours of labour for women and
children in factories. ^([109]) He was president of the first congress
at which all the Trade Unions of England united in a single great trade
association. ^([110])He introduced as transition measures to the
complete communistic organisation of society, on the one hand,
co-operative societies for retail trade and production. These have since
that time, at least, given practical proof that the merchant and the
manufacturer are socially quite unnecessary. On the other hand, he
introduced labour bazaars for the exchange of the products of labour
through the medium of labour-notes, whose unit was a single hour of work
^([111]); institutions necessarily doomed to failure, but completely
anticipating Proudhon's bank of exchange ^([112]) of a much later
period, and differing entirely from this in that they did not claim to
be the panacea for all social ills, but only a first step towards a much
more radical revolution of society.

These are the men on whom the sovereign Herr Dühring looks down, from
the height of his “final and ultimate truth“ {D. Ph. 2}, with a contempt
of which we have given a few examples in the Introduction. And in one
respect this contempt is not devoid of adequate reason: for its basis
is, in essence, a really frightful ignorance of the works of the three
utopians. Thus Herr Dühring says of Saint-Simon that

“his basic idea was, in essentials, correct, and apart from some
one-sided aspects, even today provides the directing impulse towards
real creation” {D. K. G. 246}.

But although Herr Dühring does actually seem to have had some of
Saint-Simon's works in his hands, our search through the twenty-seven
relevant printed pages for Saint-Simon's “basic idea” is just as
fruitless as our earlier search for what Quesnay’s _Tableau_ “meant in
Quesnay himself” {105}, and in the end we have to allow ourselves to be
put off with the phrase

“that imagination and philanthropic fervour ... along with the
extravagant fantasy that goes with it, dominated the whole of
Saint-Simon's thought complex” {252}!

As regards Fourier, all that Herr Dühring knows or takes into account is
his fantasies of the future, painted in romantic detail. This of course
“is far more important” for establishing Herr Dühring's infinite
superiority over Fourier than an examination of how the latter “attempts
_occasionally_ to criticise actual conditions” {282}. Occasionally! In
fact, almost every page of his works scintillates with sparkling satire
and criticism aimed at the wretchedness of our vaunted civilisation. It
is like saying that Herr Dühring only “occasionally” declares Herr
Dühring to be the greatest thinker of all time. And as for the twelve
pages devoted to Robert Owen, Herr Dühring has absolutely no other
source for them than the miserable biography of the philistine Sargant,
who also did not know Owen’s most important works — on marriage and the
communist system. Herr Dühring can therefore go the length of boldly
asserting that we should not “assume any clear-cut communism” {301} in
Owen. Had Herr Dühring ever even fingered Owen's _Book of the New Moral
World_, he would most assuredly have found clearly expressed in it not
only the most clear-cut communism possible, with equal obligation to
labour and equal rights in the product — equal according to age, as Owen
always adds — but also the most comprehensive building project of the
future communist community, with its groundplan, front and side and
bird's-eye views. But if one limits one's “first-hand study of the
writings of the representatives of socialist idea-complexes” {XIII} to a
knowledge of the title and at most the _motto_ {294} of a small number
of these works, like Herr Dühring, the only thing left to do is make
such a stupid and purely fantastic assertion. Owen did not only preach
“clear-cut communism” {301}; for five years (at the end of the thirties
and beginning of the forties) he put it into practice in the Harmony
Hall Colony ^([113]) in Hampshire, the clear-cut quality of whose
communism left nothing to be desired. I myself was acquainted with
several former members of this communist model experiment. But Sargant
knew absolutely nothing of all this, or of any of Owen's activities
between 1836 and 1850, and consequently Herr Dühring's “more profound
historical work” {XIII} is also left in pitch-black ignorance. Herr
Dühring calls Owen “in every respect a veritable monster of importunate
philanthropy” {261}. But when this same Herr Dühring starts to give us
information about the contents of books whose title and motto he hardly
knows, we must not on any account say that he is “in every respect a
veritable monster of importunate ignorance”, for on _our_ lips this
would certainly be “abuse”.

The utopians, we saw, were utopians because they could be nothing else
at a time when capitalist production was as yet so little developed.
They necessarily had to construct the elements of a new society out of
their own heads, because within the old society the elements of the new
were not as yet generally apparent; for the basic plan of the new
edifice they could only appeal to reason, just because they could not as
yet appeal to contemporary history. But when now, almost eighty years
after their time, Herr Dühring steps on to the stage and puts forward
his claim to an “authoritative” {1} system of a new social order — not
evolved out of the historically developed material at his disposal, as
its necessary result — oh, no! — but constructed in his sovereign head,
in his mind, pregnant with ultimate truths — then he, who scents
epigones everywhere, is himself nothing but the epigone of the utopians,
the latest utopian. He calls the great utopians “social alchemists”
{237}. That may be so. Alchemy was necessary in its epoch. But since
that time modern industry has developed the contradictions lying dormant
in the capitalist mode of production into such crying antagonisms that
the approaching collapse of this mode of production is, so to speak,
palpable; that the new productive forces themselves can only be
maintained and further developed by the introduction of a new mode of
production corresponding to their present stage of development; that the
struggle between the two classes engendered by the hitherto existing
mode of production and constantly reproduced in ever sharper antagonism
has affected all civilised countries and is daily becoming more violent;
and that these historical interconnections the conditions of the social
transformation which they make necessary, and the basic features of this
transformation likewise determined by them, have also already been
apprehended. And if Herr Dühring now manufactures a new utopian social
order out of his sovereign brain instead of from the economic material
available, he is not practicing mere “social alchemy”. He is acting
rather like a person who, after the discovery and establishment of the
laws of modern chemistry, attempts to restore the old alchemy and to use
atomic weights, molecular formulas, the quantivalence of atoms,
crystallography and spectral analysis for the sole purpose of
discovering — _the philosopher's stone._



II. THEORETICAL


The materialist conception of history starts from the proposition that
the production and, next to production, the exchange of things produced,
is the basis of all social structure; that in every society that has
appeared in history, the manner in which wealth is distributed and
society divided into classes or estates is dependent upon what is
produced, how it is produced, and how the products are exchanged. From
this point of view the final causes of all social changes and political
revolutions are to be sought, not in men's brains, not in man's better
insight into eternal truth and justice, but in changes in the modes of
production and exchange. They are to be sought, not in the _philosophy_,
but in the _economics_ of each particular epoch. The growing perception
that existing social institutions are unreasonable and unjust, that
reason has become unreason, and right wrong, is only proof that in the
modes of production and exchange changes have silently taken place with
which the social order, adapted to earlier economic conditions, is no
longer in keeping. From this it also follows that the means of getting
rid of the incongruities that have been brought to light must also be
present, in a more or less developed condition, within the changed modes
of production themselves. These means are not to be _invented_, spun out
of the head, but _discovered_ with the aid of the head in the existing
material facts of production.

What is, then, the position of modern socialism in this connection?

The present structure of society — this is now pretty generally conceded
— is the creation of the ruling class of today, of the bourgeoisie. The
mode of production peculiar to the bourgeoisie, known, since Marx, as
the capitalist mode of production, was incompatible with the local
privileges and the privileges of estate as well as with the reciprocal
personal ties of the feudal system. The bourgeoisie broke up the feudal
system and built upon its ruins the capitalist order of society, the
kingdom of free. competition, of personal liberty, of the equality,
before the law, of all commodity owners, of all the rest of the
capitalist blessings. Thenceforward the capitalist mode of production
could develop in freedom. Since steam, machinery, and the making of
machines by machinery transformed the older manufacture into modern
industry, the productive forces evolved under the guidance of the
bourgeoisie developed with a rapidity and in a degree unheard of before.
But just as the older manufacture, in its time, and handicraft, becoming
more developed under its influence, had come into- collision with the
feudal trammels of the guilds, so now modern industry, in its more
complete development, comes into collision with the bounds within which
the capitalistic mode of production holds it confined. The new
productive forces have already outgrown the capitalistic mode of using
them. And this conflict between productive forces and modes of
production is not a conflict engendered in the mind of man, like that
between original sin and divine justice. It exists, in fact,
objectively, outside us, independently of the will and actions even of
the men that have brought it on. Modern socialism is nothing but the
reflex, in thought, of this conflict in fact; its ideal reflection in
the minds, first, of the class directly suffering under it, the working
class.

Now, in what does this conflict consist?

Before capitalistic production, i.e., in the Middle Ages, the system of
petty industry obtained generally, based upon the private property of
the labourers in their means of production; {in the country,} the
agriculture of the small peasant, freeman or serf; in the towns, the
handicrafts. The instruments of labour — land, agricultural implements,
the workshop, the tool — were the instruments of labour of single
individuals, adapted for the use of one worker, and, therefore, of
necessity, small, dwarfish, circumscribed. But, for this very reason
they belonged, as a rule, to the producer himself. To concentrate these
scattered, limited means of production, to enlarge them, to turn them
into the powerful levers of production of the present day — this was
precisely the historic role of capitalist production and of its
upholder, the bourgeoisie. In Part IV of _Capital_, Marx has explained
in detail, how since the fifteenth century this has been historically
worked out through the three phases of simple co-operation, manufacture
and modern industry. But the bourgeoisie, as is also shown there, could
not transform these puny means of production into mighty productive
forces without transforming them, at the same time, from means of
production of the individual into _social_ means of production only
workable by a _collectivity of men._ The spinning-wheel, the hand-loom,
the blacksmith's hammer, were replaced by the spinning-machine, the
power-loom, the steam-hammer; the individual workshop by the factory
implying the co-operation of hundreds and thousands of workmen. In like
manner, production itself changed from a series of individual into a
series of social acts, and the products from individual to social
products. The yarn, the cloth, the metal articles that now came out of
the factory were the joint product of many workers, through whose hands
they had successively to pass before they were ready. No one person
could say of them: “I made that; this is _my_ product.”

But where, in a given society, the fundamental form of production is
that spontaneous division of labour, there the products take on the form
of _commodities_ whose mutual exchange, buying and selling, enable the
individual producers to satisfy their manifold wants. And this was the
case in the Middle Ages. The peasant, e.g., sold to the artisan
agricultural products and bought from him the products of handicraft.
Into this society of individual producers, of commodity producers, the
new mode of production thrust itself. In the midst of the old division
of labour, grown up spontaneously and upon _no definite plan_, which had
governed the whole of society, now arose division of labour upon _a
definite plan_, as organised in the factory; side by side with
_individual_ production appeared _social_ production. The products of
both were sold in the same market, and, therefore, at prices at least
approximately equal. But organisation upon a definite plan was stronger
than spontaneous division of labour. The factories working with the
combined social forces of a collectivity of individuals produced their
commodities far more cheaply than the individual small producers.
Individual production succumbed in one department after another.
Socialised production revolutionised all the old methods of production.
But its revolutionary character was, at the same time, so little
recognised that it was, on the contrary, introduced as a means of
increasing and developing the production of commodities. When it arose,
it found readymade, and made liberal use of, certain machinery for the
production and exchange of commodities: merchants' capital, handicraft,
wage-labour. Socialised production thus introducing itself as a new form
of the production of commodities, it was a matter of course that under
it the old forms of appropriation remained in full swing, and were
applied to its products as well.

In the mediaeval stage of evolution of the production of commodities,
the question as to the owner of the product of labour could not arise.
The individual producer, as a rule, had, from raw material belonging to
himself, and generally his own handiwork, produced it with his own
tools, by the labour of his own hands or of his family. There was no
need for him to appropriate the new product. It belonged wholly to him,
as a matter of course. His property in the product was, therefore, based
_upon his own labour._ Even where external help was used, this was, as a
rule, of little importance, and very generally was compensated by
something other than wages. The apprentices and journeymen of the guilds
worked less for board and wages than for education, in order that they
might become master craftsmen themselves. Then came the concentration of
the means of production in large workshops and manufactories, their
transformation into actual socialised means of production. But the
socialised means of production and their products were still treated,
after this change, just as they had been before, i.e., as the means of
production and the products of individuals. Hitherto, the owner of the
instruments of labour had himself appropriated the product, because, as
a rule, it was his own product and the assistance of others was the
exception. Now the owner of the instruments of labour always
appropriated to himself the product, although it was no longer _his_
product but exclusively the product of the _labour of others._ Thus, the
products now produced socially were not appropriated by those who had
actually set in motion the means of production and actually produced the
commodities, but by the _capitalists._ The means of production, and
production itself had become in essence socialised. But they were
subjected to a form of appropriation which presupposes the private
production of individuals, under which, therefore, everyone owns his own
product and brings it to market. The mode of production is subjected to
this form of appropriation, although it abolishes the conditions upon
which the latter rests. ^(*8) This contradiction, which gives to the new
mode of production its capitalistic character, _contains the germ of the
whole of the social antagonisms of today._ The greater the mastery
obtained by the new mode of production over all decisive fields of
production and in all economically decisive countries, the more it
reduced individual production to an insignificant residium, _the more
clearly was brought out the incompatibility of socialised production
with capitalistic appropriation._

The first capitalists found, as we have said, wage-labour ready-made for
them. But it was exceptional, complementary, accessory, transitory
wage-labour. The agricultural labourer, though, upon occasion, he hired
himself out by the day, had a few acres of his own land on which he
could at all events live at a pinch. The guilds were so organised that
the journeyman of today became the master of tomorrow. But all this
changed, as soon as the means of production became socialised and
concentrated in the hands of capitalists. The means of production, as
well as the product, of the individual producer became more and more
worthless; there was nothing left for him but to turn wage-worker under
the capitalist. Wage-labour, aforetime the exception and accessory, now
became the rule and basis of all production; aforetime complementary, it
now became the sole remaining function of the worker. The wage-worker
for a time became a wage-worker for life. The number of these permanent
wageworkers was further enormously increased by the breaking-up of the
feudal system that occurred at the same time, by the disbanding of the
retainers of the feudal lords, the eviction of the peasants from their
homesteads, etc. The separation was made complete between the means of
production concentrated in the hands of the capitalists, on the one
side, and the producers, possessing nothing but their labour-power, on
the other. _The contradiction between socialised production and
capitalistic appropriation manifested itself as the antagonism of
proletariat and bourgeoisie._

We have seen that the capitalistic mode of production thrust its way
into a society of commodity producers, of individual producers, whose
social bond was the exchange of their products. But every society based
upon the production of commodities has this peculiarity: that the
producers have lost control over their own social interrelations. Each
man produces for himself with such means of production as he may happen
to have, and for such exchange as he may require to satisfy his
remaining wants. No one knows how much of his particular article is
coming on the market, nor how much of it will be wanted. No one knows
whether his individual product will meet an actual demand, whether he
will be able to make good his costs of production or even to sell his
commodity at all. Anarchy reigns in socialised production. But the
production of commodities, like every other form of production, has its
peculiar, inherent laws inseparable from it; and these laws work,
despite anarchy, in and through anarchy. They reveal themselves in the
only persistent form of social interrelations, i.e., in exchange, and
here they affect the individual producers as compulsory laws of
competition. They are, at first, unknown to these producers themselves,
and have to be discovered by them gradually and as the result of
experience. They work themselves out, therefore, independently of the
producers, and in antagonism to them, as inexorable natural laws of
their particular form of production. The product governs the producers.

In mediaeval society, especially in the earlier centuries, production
was essentially directed towards satisfying the wants of the individual.
It satisfied, in the main, only the wants of the producer and his
family. Where relations of personal dependence existed, as in the
country, it also helped to satisfy the wants of the feudal lord. In all
this there was, therefore, no exchange; the products, consequently, did
not assume the character of commodities. The family of the peasant
produced almost everything they wanted: clothes and furniture, as well
as means of subsistence. Only when it began to produce more than was
sufficient to supply its own wants and the payments in kind to the
feudal lord, only then did it also produce commodities. This surplus,
thrown into socialised exchange and offered for sale, became
commodities. The artisans of the towns, it is true, had from the first
to produce for exchange. But they, also, themselves supplied the
greatest part of their own individual wants. They had gardens and plots
of land. They turned their cattle out into the communal forest, which
also, yielded them timber and firing. The women spun flax, wool, and so
forth. Production for the purpose of exchange, production of
commodities, was only in its infancy. Hence, exchange was restricted,
the market narrow, the methods of production stable; there was local
exclusiveness without, local unity within, the mark ^([114]) in the
country; in the town, the guild.

But with the extension of the production of commodities, and especially
with the introduction of the capitalist mode of production, the laws of
commodity production, hitherto latent, came into action more openly and
with greater force. The old bonds were loosened, the old exclusive
limits broken through, the producers were more and more turned into
independent, isolated producers of commodities. The anarchy of social
production became apparent and grew to greater and greater height. But
the chief means by aid of which the capitalist mode of production
intensified this anarchy of socialised production was the exact opposite
of anarchy. It was the increasing organisation of production, upon a
social basis, in every individual productive establishment. By this, the
old, peaceful, stable condition of things was ended. Wherever this
organisation of production was introduced into a branch of industry, it
brooked no other method of production by its side. Where it laid hold of
a handicraft, that old handicraft was wiped out. The field of labour
became a battle-ground. The great geographical discoveries, and the
colonisation following upon them, multiplied markets and quickened the
transformation of handicraft into manufacture. The war did not simply
break out between the individual producers of particular localities. The
local struggles begot in their turn national conflicts, the commercial
wars of the seventeenth and the eighteenth centuries. ^([115]) Finally,
modern industry and the opening of the world market made the struggle
universal, and at the same time gave it an unheard-of virulence.
Advantages in natural or artificial conditions of production now decide
the existence or non-existence of individual capitalists, as well as of
whole industries and countries. He that falls is remorselessly cast
aside. It is the Darwinian struggle of the individual for existence
transferred from nature to society with intensified violence. The
conditions of existence natural to the animal appear as the final term
of human development. The contradiction between socialised production
and capitalistic appropriation now presents itself as _an antagonism
between the organisation of production in the individual workshop_, _and
the anarchy of production in society generally._

The capitalistic mode of production moves in these two forms of the
antagonism immanent to it from its very origin. It is never able to get
out of that "vicious circle" which Fourier had already discovered. What
Fourier could not, indeed, see in his time is that this circle is
gradually narrowing; that the movement becomes more and more a spiral,
and must come to an end, like the movement of the planets, by collision
with the centre. It is the compelling force of anarchy in the production
of society at large that more and more completely turns the great
majority of men into proletarians; and it is the masses of the
proletariat again who will finally put an end to anarchy in production.
It is the compelling force of anarchy in social production that turns
the limitless perfectibility of machinery under modern industry into a
compulsory law by which every individual industrial capitalist must
perfect his machinery more and more, under penalty of ruin. But the
perfecting of machinery is making human labour superfluous. If the
introduction and increase of machinery means the displacement of
millions of manual by a few machine-workers, improvement in machinery
means the displacement of more and more of the machine-workers
themselves. It means, in the last instance, the production of a number
of available wage-workers in excess of the average needs of capital, the
formation of a complete industrial reserve army, as I called it in 1845,
^(*9) available at the times when industry is working at high pressure,
to be cast out upon the street when the inevitable crash comes, a
constant dead-weight upon the limbs of the working class in its struggle
for existence with capital, a regulator for the keeping of wages down to
the low level that suits the interests of capital. Thus it comes about,
to quote Marx, that machinery becomes the most powerful weapon in the
war of capital against the working class; that the instruments of labour
constantly tear the means of subsistence out of the hands of the
labourer; that the very product of the worker is turned into an
instrument for his subjugation. Thus it comes about that the economising
of the instruments of labour becomes at the same time, from the outset,
the most reckless waste of labour-power, and robbery based upon the
normal conditions under which labour functions; that machinery, the most
powerful instrument for shortening labour-time, becomes the most
unfailing means for placing every moment of the labourer's time and that
of his family at the disposal of the capitalist for the purpose of
expanding the value of his capital. Thus it comes about that the
overwork of some becomes the preliminary condition for the idleness of
others, and that modern industry, which hunts after new consumers over
the whole world, forces the consumption of the masses at home down to a
starvation minimum, and in doing this destroys its own home market. “The
law that always equilibrates the relative surplus-population, or
industrial reserve army, to the extent and energy of accumulation, this
law rivets the labourer to capital more firmly than the wedges of Vulcan
did Prometheus to the rock. It establishes an accumulation of misery
corresponding with accumulation of capital. Accumulation of wealth at
one pole is, therefore, at the same time accumulation of misery, agony
of toil, slavery, ignorance, brutality, mental degradation, at the
opposite pole, i.e., on the side of the class that _produces its own
product in the form of capital”_ (Marx’s _Capital_, p. 671.) And to
expect any other division of the products from the capitalistic mode of
production is the same as expecting the electrodes of a battery not to
decompose acidulated water, not to liberate oxygen at the positive,
hydrogen at the negative pole, so long as they are connected with the
battery.

We have seen that the ever increasing perfectibility of modern machinery
is, by the anarchy of social production, turned into a compulsory law
that forces the individual industrial capitalist always to improve his
machinery, always to increase its productive force. The bare possibility
of extending the field of production is transformed for him into a
similar compulsory law. The enormous expansive force of modern industry,
compared with which that of gases is mere child’s play, appears to us
now as a _necessity_ for expansion, both qualitative and quantitative,
that laughs at all resistance. Such resistance is offered by
consumption, by sales, by the markets for the products of modern
industry. But the capacity for extension, extensive and intensive, of
the markets is primarily governed by quite different laws that work much
less energetically. The extension of the markets cannot keep pace with
the extension of production. The collision becomes inevitable, and as
this cannot produce any real solution so long as it does not break in
pieces the capitalist mode of production, the collisions become
periodic. Capitalist production has begotten another “vicious circle”.

As a matter of fact, since 1825, when the first general crisis broke
out, the whole industrial and commercial world, production and exchange
among all civilised peoples and their more or less barbaric hangers-on,
are thrown out of joint about once every ten years. Commerce is at a
standstill, the markets are glutted, products accumulate, as
multitudinous as they are unsaleable, hard cash disappears, credit
vanishes, factories are closed, the mass of the workers are in want of
the means of subsistence, because they have produced too much of the
means of subsistence; bankruptcy follows upon bankruptcy, execution upon
execution. The stagnation lasts for years; productive forces and
products are wasted and destroyed wholesale, until the accumulated mass
of commodities finally filters off, more or less depreciated in value,
until production and exchange gradually begin to move again. Little by
little the pace quickens. It becomes a trot. The industrial trot breaks
into a canter, the canter in turn grows into the headlong gallop of a
perfect steeplechase of industry, commercial credit, and speculation,
which finally, after break-neck leaps, ends where it began — in the
ditch of a crisis. And so over and over again. We have now, since the
year 1825, gone through this five times, and at the present moment
(1877) we are going through it for the sixth time. And the character of
these crises is so clearly defined that Fourier hit all of them off when
he described the first as _crise plethorique_, a crisis from plethora.

In these crises, the contradiction between socialised production and
capitalist appropriation ends in a violent explosion. The circulation of
commodities is, for the time being, stopped. Money, the means of
circulation, becomes a hindrance to circulation. All the laws of
production and circulation of commodities are turned upside down. The
economic collision has reached its apogee. _The mode of production is in
rebellion against the mode of exchange_, _the productive forces are in
rebellion against the mode of production which they have outgrown._

The fact that the socialised organisation of production within the
factory has developed so far that it has become incompatible with the
anarchy of production in society, which exists side by side with and
dominates it, is brought home to the capitalists themselves by the
violent concentration of capital that occurs during crises, through the
ruin of many large, and a still greater number of small, capitalists.
The whole mechanism of the capitalist mode of production breaks down
under the pressure of the productive forces, its own creations. It is no
longer able to turn all this mass of means of production into capital.
They lie fallow, and for that very reason the industrial reserve army
must also lie fallow. Means of production, means of subsistence,
available labourers, all the elements of production and of general
wealth, are present in abundance. But “abundance becomes the source of
distress and want” (Fourier), because it is the very thing that prevents
the transformation of the means of production and subsistence into
capital. For in capitalistic society the means of production can only
function when they have undergone a preliminary transformation into
capital, into the means of exploiting human labour-power. The necessity
of this transformation into capital of the means of production and
subsistence stands like a ghost between these and the workers. It alone
prevents the coming together of the material and personal levers of
production; it alone forbids the means of production to function, the
workers to work and live. On the one hand, therefore, the capitalistic
mode of production stands convicted of its own incapacity to further
direct these productive forces. On the other, these productive forces
themselves, with increasing energy, press forward to the removal of the
existing contradiction, to the abolition of their quality as capital,
_to the practical recognition of their character as social productive
forces._

This rebellion of the productive forces, as they grow more and more
powerful, against their quality as capital, this stronger and stronger
command that their social character shall be recognised, forces the
capitalist class itself to treat them more and more as social productive
forces, so far as this is possible under capitalist conditions. The
period of industrial high pressure, with its unbounded inflation of
credit, not less than the crash itself, by the collapse of great
capitalist establishments, tends to bring about that form of the
socialisation of great masses of means of production which we meet with
in the different kinds of joint-stock companies. Many of these means of
production and of communication are, from the outset, so colossal that,
like the railways, they exclude all other forms of capitalistic
exploitation. At a further stage of evolution this form also becomes
insufficient: the official representative of capitalist society — the
state — will ultimately have to ^(*10) undertake the direction of
production. This necessity for conversion into state property is felt
first in the great institutions for intercourse and communication — the
post office, the telegraphs, the railways.

If the crises demonstrate the incapacity of the bourgeoisie for managing
any longer modern productive forces, the transformation of the great
establishments for production and distribution into joint-stock
companies and state property shows how unnecessary the bourgeoisie are
for that purpose. All the social functions of the capitalist are now
performed by salaried employees. The capitalist has no further social
function than that of pocketing dividends, tearing off coupons, and
gambling on the Stock Exchange, where the different capitalists despoil
one another of their capital. At first the capitalist mode of production
forces out the workers. Now it forces out the capitalists, and reduces
them, just as it reduced the workers, to the ranks of the surplus
population, although not immediately into those of the industrial
reserve army.

But the transformation, either into joint-stock companies, or into state
ownership, does not do away with the capitalistic nature of the
productive forces. In the joint-stock companies this is obvious. And the
modern state, again, is only the organisation that bourgeois society
takes on in order to support the general external conditions of the
capitalist mode of production against the encroachments as well of the
workers as of individual capitalists. The modern state, no matter what
its form, is essentially a capitalist machine, the state of the
capitalists, the ideal personification of the total national capital.
The more it proceeds to the taking over of productive forces, the more
does it actually become the national capitalist, the more citizens does
it exploit. The workers remain wage-workers — proletarians. The
capitalist relation is not done away with. It is rather brought to a
head. But, brought to a head, it topples over. State ownership of the
productive forces is not the solution of the conflict, but concealed
within it are the technical conditions that form the elements of that
solution.

This solution can only consist in the practical recognition of the
social nature of the modern forces of production, and therefore in the
harmonising of the modes of production, appropriation, and exchange with
the socialised character of the means of production And this can only
come about by society openly and directly taking possession of the
productive forces which have outgrown all control except that of society
as a whole. The social character of the means of production and of the
products today reacts against the producers, periodically disrupts all
production and exchange, acts only like a law of nature working blindly,
forcibly, destructively. But with the taking over by society of the
productive forces, the social character of the means of production and
of the products will be utilised by the producers with a perfect
understanding of its nature, and instead of being a source of
disturbance and periodical collapse, will become the most powerful lever
of production itself.

Active social forces work exactly like natural forces: blindly,
forcibly, destructively, so long as we do not understand, and reckon
with them. But when once we understand them, when once we grasp their
action, their direction, their effects, it depends only upon ourselves
to subject them more and more to our own will, and by means of them to
reach our own ends. And this holds quite especially of the mighty
productive forces of today. As long as we obstinately refuse to
understand the nature and the character of these social means of action
— and this understanding goes against the grain of the capitalist mode
of production and its defenders — so long these forces are at work in
spite of us, in opposition to us, so long they master us, as we have
shown above in detail. But when once their nature is understood, they
can, in the hands of the producers working together, be transformed from
master demons into willing servants. The difference is as that between
the destructive force of electricity in the lightning of the storm, and
electricity under command in the telegraph and the voltaic arc; the
difference between a conflagration, and fire working in the service of
man. With this recognition, at last, of the real nature of the
productive forces of today, the social anarchy of production gives place
to a social regulation of production upon a definite plan, according to
the needs of the community and of each individual. Then the capitalist
mode of appropriation, in which the product enslaves first the producer
and then the appropriator, is replaced by the mode of appropriation of
the products that is based upon the nature of the modern means of
production: upon the one hand, direct social appropriation, as means to
the maintenance and extension of production — on the other, direct
individual appropriation, as means of subsistence and of enjoyment.

Whilst the capitalist mode of production more and more completely
transforms the great majority of the population into proletarians, it
creates the power which, under penalty of its own destruction, is forced
to accomplish this revolution. Whilst it forces on more and more the
transformation of the vast means of production, already socialised, into
state property, it shows itself the way to accomplishing this
revolution. _The proletariat seizes political power and turns the means
of production in the first instance into state property._ But, in doing
this, it abolishes itself as proletariat, abolishes all class
distinctions and class antagonisms, abolishes also the state as state.
Society thus far, based upon class antagonisms, had need of the state,
that is, of an organisation of the particular class, which was _pro
tempore_ the exploiting class, for the maintenance of its external
conditions of production, and, therefore, especially, for the purpose of
forcibly keeping the exploited classes in the condition of oppression
corresponding with the given mode of production (slavery, serfdom,
wage-labour). The state was the official representative of society as a
whole; the gathering of it together into a visible embodiment. But it
was this only in so far as it was the state of that class which itself
represented, for the time being, society as a whole: in ancient times,
the state of slave-owning citizens; in the Middle Ages, the feudal
lords; in our own time, the bourgeoisie. When at last it becomes the
real representative of the whole of society, it renders itself
unnecessary. As soon as there is no longer any social class to be held
in subjection; as soon as class rule, and the individual struggle for
existence based upon our present anarchy in production, with the
collisions and excesses arising from these, are removed, nothing more
remains to be repressed, and a special repressive force, a state, is no
longer necessary. The first act by virtue of which the state really
constitutes itself the representative of the whole of society — the
taking possession of the means of production in the name of society —
this is, at the same time, its last independent act as a state. State
interference in social relations becomes, in one domain after another,
superfluous, and then dies out of itself; the government of persons is
replaced by the administration of things, and by the conduct of
processes of production. The state is not "abolished". _It dies out._
This gives the measure of the value of the phrase "a free people's
state", both as to its justifiable use at times by agitators, and as to
its ultimate scientific insufficiency ^([117]); and also of the demands
of the so-called anarchists for the abolition of the state out of hand.

Since the historical appearance of the capitalist mode of production,
the appropriation by society of all the means of production has often
been dreamed of, more or less vaguely, by individuals, as well as by
sects, as the ideal of the future. But it could become possible, could
become a historical necessity, only when the actual conditions for its
realisation were there. Like every other social advance, it becomes
practicable, not by men understanding that the existence of classes is
in contradiction to justice, equality, etc., not by the mere willingness
to abolish these classes, but by virtue of certain new economic
conditions. The separation of society into an exploiting and an
exploited class, a ruling and an oppressed class, was the necessary
consequence of the deficient and restricted development of production in
former times. So long as the total social labour only yields a produce
which but slightly exceeds that barely necessary for the existence of
all; so long, therefore, as labour engages all or almost all the time of
the great majority of the members of society — so long, of necessity,
this society is divided into classes. Side by side with the great
majority, exclusively bond slaves to labour, arises a class freed from
directly productive labour, which looks after the general affairs of
society: the direction of labour, state business, law, science, art,
etc. It is, therefore, the law of division of labour that lies at the
basis of the division into classes. But this does not prevent this
division into classes from being carried out by means of violence and
robbery, trickery and fraud. It does not prevent the ruling class, once
having the upper hand, from consolidating its power at the expense of
the working class, from turning its social leadership into an
exploitation of the masses.

But if, upon this showing, division into classes has a certain
historical justification, it has this only for a given period, only
under given social conditions. It was based upon the insufficiency of
production. It will be swept away by the complete development of modern
productive forces. And, in fact, the abolition of classes in society
presupposes a degree of historical evolution at which the existence, not
simply of this or that particular ruling class, but of any ruling class
at all, and, therefore, the existence of class distinction itself has
become an obsolete anachronism. It presupposes, therefore, the
development of production carried out to a degree at which appropriation
of the means of production and of the products, and, with this, of
political domination, of the monopoly of culture, and of intellectual
leadership by a particular class of society, has become not only
superfluous but economically, politically, intellectually a hindrance to
development. This point is now reached. Their political and intellectual
bankruptcy is scarcely any longer a secret to the bourgeoisie
themselves. Their economic bankruptcy recurs regularly every ten years.
In every crisis, society is suffocated beneath the weight of its own
productive forces and products, which it cannot use, and stands helpless
face to face with the absurd contradiction that the producers have
nothing to consume, because consumers are wanting. The expansive force
of the means of production bursts the bonds that the capitalist mode of
production had imposed upon them. Their deliverance from these bonds is
the one precondition for an unbroken, constantly accelerated development
of the productive forces, and therewith for a practically unlimited
increase of production itself. Nor is this all. The socialised
appropriation of the means of production does away, not only with the
present artificial restrictions upon production, but also with the
positive waste and devastation of productive forces and products that
are at the present time the inevitable concomitants of production, and
that reach their height in the crises. Further, it sets free for the
community at large a mass of means of production and of products, by
doing away with the senseless extravagance of the ruling classes of
today and their political representatives. The possibility of securing
for every member of society, by means of socialised production, an
existence not only fully sufficient materially, and becoming day by day
more full, but an existence guaranteeing to all the free development and
exercise of their physical and mental faculties — this possibility is
now for the first time here, but it is _here_. ^(*11)

With the seizing of the means of production by society production of
commodities is done away with, and, simultaneously, the mastery of the
product over the producer. Anarchy in social production is replaced by
systematic, definite organisation. The struggle for individual existence
disappears. Then for the first time man, in a certain sense, is finally
marked off from the rest of the animal kingdom, and emerges from mere
animal conditions of existence into really human ones. The whole sphere
of the conditions of life which environ man, and which have hitherto
ruled man, now comes under the dominion and control of man who for the
first time becomes the real, conscious lord of nature because he has now
become master of his own social organisation. The laws of his own social
action, hitherto standing face to face with man as laws of nature
foreign to, and dominating him, will then be used with full
understanding, and so mastered by him. Man’s own social organisation,
hitherto confronting him as a necessity imposed by nature and history,
now becomes the result of his own free action. The extraneous objective
forces that have hitherto governed history pass under the control of man
himself. Only from that time will man himself, with full consciousness,
make his own history — only from that time will the social causes set in
movement by him have, in the main and in a constantly growing measure,
the results intended by him. It is the humanity's leap from the kingdom
of necessity to the kingdom of freedom.

To accomplish this act of universal emancipation is the historical
mission of the modern proletariat. To thoroughly comprehend the
historical conditions and thus the very nature of this act, to impart to
the now oppressed class a full knowledge of the conditions and of the
meaning of the momentous act it is called upon to accomplish, this is
the task of the theoretical expression of the proletarian movement,
scientific socialism.



III. PRODUCTION


After all that has been said above, the reader will not be surprised to
learn that the exposition of the principal features of socialism given
in the preceding part is not at all in accordance with Herr Dühring’s
view. On the contrary. He must hurl it into the abyss where lie all the
other rejected “bastards of historical and logical fantasy”, “barren
conceptions”, “confused and hazy notions” {D. K. G. 498}, etc. To Herr
Dühring, socialism in fact is not at all a necessary product of
historical development and still less of the grossly material economic
conditions of today, directed toward the filling of the stomach
exclusively {231}. He's got it all worked out much better. His socialism
is a final and ultimate truth;

it is “the natural system of society” {D. Ph. 282}, whose roots are to
be found in a “universal principle of justice” {D. C. 282},

and if he cannot avoid taking notice of the existing situation, created
by the sinful history of the past, in order to remedy it, this must be
regarded rather as a misfortune for the pure principle of justice. Herr
Dühring creates his socialism, like everything else, through the medium
of his famous two men. Instead of these two puppets playing the part of
master and servant, as they did in the past, they perform this once, for
a change, the piece on the equality of rights — and the foundations of
the Dühringian socialism have been laid.

It therefore goes without saying that to Herr Dühring the periodical
crises in industry have not at all the historical significance which we
were compelled to attribute to them.

In his view, crises are only occasional deviations from “normality”
{218} and at most only serve to promote “the development of a more
regulated order” {219}. The “common method” {227} of explaining crises
by over-production is in no wise adequate for his “more exact conception
of things” {343}. Of course such an explanation “may be permissible for
specific crises in particular areas”. As, for example, “a swamping of
the book market with works suddenly released for republication and
suitable for mass sale” {227}.

Herr Dühring can at any rate go to sleep with the gratifying feeling
that his immortal works will never bring on any such world disaster.

He claims, however, that in great crises, it is not over-production, but
rather “the lagging behind of popular consumption... artificially
produced under-consumption... interference with the natural growth of
the _needs of the people_” (!) “which ultimately make the gulf between
supply and demand so critically wide” {D. C. 227, 228}.

And he has even had the good fortune to find a disciple for this crisis
theory of his.

But unfortunately the under-consumption of the masses, the restriction
of the consumption of the masses to what is necessary for their
maintenance and reproduction, is not a new phenomenon. It has existed as
long as there have been exploiting and exploited classes. Even in those
periods of history when the situation of the masses was particularly
favourable, as for example in England in the fifteenth century, they
under-consumed. They were very far from having their own annual total
product at their disposal to be consumed by them. Therefore, while
under-consumption has been a constant feature in history for thousands
of years, the general shrinkage of the market which breaks out in crises
as the result of a surplus of production is a phenomenon only of the
last fifty years; and so Herr Dühring's whole superficial vulgar
economics is necessary in order to explain the new collision not by the
_new_ phenomenon of over-production but by the thousand-year-old
phenomenon of under-consumption. It is like a mathematician attempting
to explain the variation in the ratio between two quantities, one
constant and one variable, not by the variation of the variable but by
the fact that the constant quantity remains unchanged. The
under-consumption of the masses is a necessary condition of all forms of
society based on exploitation, consequently also of the capitalist form;
but it is the capitalist form of production which first gives rise to
crises. The under-consumption of the masses is therefore also a
prerequisite condition of crises, and plays in them a role which has
long been recognised. But it tells us just as little why crises exist
today as why they did not exist before.

Herr Dühring’s notions of the world market are altogether curious. We
have seen how, like a typical German man of letters, he seeks to explain
real industrial specific crises by means of imaginary crises on the
Leipzig book market — the storm on the ocean by the storm in a teacup.
He also imagines that present-day capitalist production must

“depend for its market mainly _on the circles of the possessing classes_
themselves” {221},

which does not prevent him, only sixteen pages later, from presenting,
in the generally accepted way, the iron and cotton industries as the
modern industries of decisive importance {236} — that is, precisely the
two branches of production whose output is consumed only to an
infinitesimally small degree within the circle of the possessing classes
and is dependent more than any other on mass use. Wherever we turn in
Herr Dühring’s works there is nothing but empty and contradictory
chatter. But let us take an example from the cotton industry. In the
relatively small town of Oldham alone — it is one of a dozen towns round
Manchester with fifty to a hundred thousand inhabitants engaged in the
cotton industry — in this town alone, in the four years 1872 to 1875,
the number of spindles spinning only Number 32 yarn increased from two
and a half to five million; so that in one medium-sized English town
there are as many spindles spinning one single count as the cotton
industry of all Germany, including Alsace, possesses. And the expansion
in the other branches and areas of the cotton industry in England and
Scotland has taken place in approximately the same proportion. In view
of these facts, it requires a strong dose of deep-rooted {555-56}
effrontery to explain the present complete stagnation in the yarn and
cloth markets by the under-consumption of the English masses and not by
the over-production carried on by the English cotton-mill owners. ^(*12)

But enough. One does not argue with people who are so ignorant of
economics as to consider the Leipzig book market in the modern
industrial sense. Let us therefore merely note that Herr Dühring has
only one more piece of information for us on the subject of crises, that
in crises we have nothing

“but the ordinary interplay of overstrain and relaxation” {228}; that
over-speculation “is not only due to the planless multiplication of
private enterprises“, but that "the rashness of individual entrepreneurs
and the lack of private circumspection must also be reckoned among the
causes which give rise to oversupply” {229}.

And what, again, is the “cause which gives rise” to the rashness and
lack of private circumspection? Just precisely this very planlessness of
capitalist production, which manifests itself in the planless
multiplication of private enterprises. And to mistake the translation of
an economic fact into moral reprobation as the discovery of a new cause
is also a piece of extreme “rashness”.

With this we can leave the question of crises. In the preceding section
we showed that they were necessarily engendered by the capitalist mode
of production, and explained their significance as crises of this mode
of production itself, as means of compelling the social revolution, and
it is not necessary to say another word in reply to Herr Dühring's
superficialities on this subject. Let us pass on to his positive
creations, the “natural system of society” {D. Ph. 282}.

This system, built on a “universal principle of justice” {D. C. 320} and
therefore free from all consideration of troublesome material facts,
consists of a federation of economic communes among which there is

“freedom of movement and obligatory acceptance of new members on the
basis of fixed laws and administrative regulations” {323}.

The economic commune itself is above all

“a comprehensive schematism of great import in human history”{341} which
is far superior to the “erroneous half-measures”, for example, of a
certain Marx {342}. It implies “a community of persons linked together
by their public right to dispose of a definite area of land and a group
of productive establishments for use in common, jointly participating in
the proceeds” {322}. This public right is a “right to the object... in
the sense of a _purely publicistic relation to nature_ and to the
productive institutions” {342}.

We leave it to the future jurists of the economic commune to cudgel
their brains as to what this means; we give it up. The only thing we
gather is that

it is not at all the same as the “corporative ownership of workers'
associations” {342} which would not exclude mutual competition and even
the exploitation of wage-labour.

In this connection he drops the remark that

the conception of a “collective ownership”, such as is found also in
Marx, is “to say the least unclear and open to question, as this
conception of the future always gives the impression that it means
nothing more than corporative ownership by groups of workers” {295}.

This is one more instance of Herr Dühring’s usual “vile habits” of
passing off a thing for what it is not, “for whose vulgar nature” — to
use his own words — “only the vulgar word snotty would be quite
appropriate” {D. K. G. 506}; it is just as baseless a lie as Herr
Dühring’s other invention that by collective ownership Marx means an
“ownership which is at once both individual and social” {503, 505}.

In any case this much seems clear: the publicistic right of an economic
commune in its means of labour, is an exclusive right of property at
least as against every other economic commune and also as against
society and the state.

But this right is not to entitle the commune “to cut itself off... from
the outside world, for among the various economic communes there is
freedom of movement and obligatory acceptance of new members on the
basis of fixed laws and administrative regulations... like... belonging
to a political organisation at the present time, or participation in the
economic affairs of the commune” {D. C. 322-23}.

There will therefore be rich and poor economic communes, and the
levelling out takes place through the population crowding into the rich
communes and leaving the poor ones. So that although Herr Dühring wants
to eliminate competition in products between the individual communes by
means of national organisation of trade, he calmly allows competition
among the producers to continue. Things are removed from the sphere of
competition, but men remain subject to it.

But we are still very far from clear on the question of “publicistic
right” {322}. Two pages further on Herr Dühring explains to us:

The trade commune “will at first cover the politico-social area whose
inhabitants form a single legal entity and in this character have at
their disposal the whole of the land, the dwellings and productive
institutions” {325}.

So after all it is not the individual commune at whose disposal these
things are, but the whole nation. “The public right” {322}, “right to
the object”, “publicistic relation to nature” {342} and so forth is
therefore not merely “in the least unclear and open to question” {295}:
it is in direct contradiction with itself. It is in fact, at any rate in
so far as each individual economic commune is likewise a legal entity,
“an ownership which is at once both individual and social” {D. K. G.
503}, and this latter “nebulous hybrid” {504} is once again, therefore,
only to be met with in Herr Dühring’s own works.

In any case the economic commune has at its disposal instruments of
labour for the purpose of production. How is this production carried on?
Judging by all Herr Dühring has told us, precisely as in the past,
except that the commune takes the place of the capitalists. The most we
are told is that everyone will then be free to choose his occupation,
and that there will be equal obligation to work.

The basic form of all production hitherto has been the division of
labour, on the one hand, within society as a whole, and on the other,
within each separate productive establishment. How does the Dühring
“sociality” {see D. C. _263_, _277_, _291}_ stand on this question?

The first great division of labour in society is the separation of town
and country.

This antagonism, according to Herr Dühring, is “in the nature of things
inevitable” {232}. But “it is in general doubtful to regard the gulf
between agriculture and industry... as unbridgeable. In fact, there
already exists, to a certain extent, constancy of interconnection with
promises to increase considerably in the future“ {250}. Already, we
learn, two industries have penetrated agriculture and rural production:
“in the first place, distilling, and in the second, beet-sugar
manufacturing... the production of spirits is already of such importance
that it is more likely to be under-estimated than over-estimated“
{250-51}. And “if it were possible, as a result of some inventions, for
a larger number of industries to develop in such a way that they should
be compelled to localise their production in the country and carry it on
in direct association with the production of raw materials” {251} — then
this would weaken the antithesis between town and country and “provide
the widest possible basis for the development of civilisation”.
Moreover, “a somewhat similar result might also be attained in another
way. Apart from technical requirements, social needs are coming more and
more to the forefront, and if the latter become the dominant
consideration in the grouping of human activities it will no longer be
possible to overlook those advantages which ensue from a close and
systematic connection between the occupations of the countryside and the
technical operations of working up raw materials” {252}.

Now in the economic commune it is precisely social needs which are
coming to the forefront; and so will it really hasten to take advantage,
to the fullest possible extent, of the above-mentioned union of
agriculture and industry? Will Herr Dühring not fail to tell us, at his
accustomed length, his “more exact conceptions” {343} on the attitude of
the economic commune to this question? The reader who expected him not
to would be cruelly disillusioned. The above-mentioned meagre, stale
commonplaces, once again not passing beyond the schnaps-distilling and
beet-sugarmaking sphere of the jurisdiction of Prussian law, are all
that Herr Dühring has to say on the antithesis between town and country
in the present and in the future.

Let us pass on to the division of labour in detail. Here Herr Dühring is
a little “more exact”. He speaks of

“a person who has to devote himself _exclusively_ to _one_ form of
occupation” {D. C. 257}. If the point at issue is the introduction of a
new branch of production, the problem simply hinges on whether a certain
number of _entities_, who are to _devote themselves to the production of
one single article_, can somehow be provided with the consumption (!)
they require {278}. In the socialitarian system no branch of production
would “_require_ many _people_”, and there, too, there would be
“_economic species_” of men “distinguished by their way of life” {329}.

Accordingly, within the sphere of production everything remains much the
same as before. In society up to now, however, an “erroneous division of
labour” {327} has obtained, but as to what this is, and by what it is to
be replaced in the economic commune, we are only told:

“With regard to the division of labour itself, we have already said
above that this question can be considered settled as soon as account is
taken of the various natural conditions and personal capabilities”
{259}.

In addition to capabilities, personal likings are taken into account:

“The pleasure felt in rising to types of activity which involve
additional capabilities and training would depend exclusively on the
inclination felt for the occupation in question and on the joy produced
in the _exercise of precisely this and no other thing”_ {D. Ph. 283}
(exercise of a thing!).

And this will stimulate competition within the socialitarian system, so
that

“production itself will become interesting, and the dull pursuit of it,
which sees in it nothing but a means of earning, will no longer put its
heavy imprint on conditions” {D. C. 265}.

In every society in which production has developed spontaneously — and
our present society is of this type — the situation is not that the
producers control the means of production, but that the means of
production control the producers. In such a society each new lever of
production is necessarily transformed into a new means for the
subjection of the producers to the means of production. This is most of
all true of that lever of production which, prior to the introduction of
modern industry, was by far the most powerful — the division of labour.
The first great division of labour, the separation of town and country,
condemned the rural population to thousands of years of mental
torpidity, and the people of the towns each to subjection to his own
individual trade. It destroyed the basis of the intellectual development
of the former and the physical development of the latter. When the
peasant appropriates his land, and the townsman his trade, the land
appropriates the peasant and the trade the townsman to the very same
extent. In the division of labour, man is also divided. All other
physical and mental faculties are sacrificed to the development of one
single activity. This stunting of man grows in the same measure as the
division of labour, which attains its highest development in
manufacture. Manufacture splits up each trade into its separate partial
operations, allots each of these to an individual labourer as his life
calling, and thus chains him for life to a particular detail function
and a particular tool. “It converts the labourer into a crippled
monstrosity, by forcing his detail dexterity at the expense of a world
of productive capabilities and instincts... The individual himself is
made the automatic motor of a fractional operation” (Marx) — a motor
which in many cases is perfected only by literally crippling the
labourer physically and mentally. The machinery of modern industry
degrades the labourer from a machine to the mere appendage of a machine.
“The life-long speciality of handling one and the same tool, now becomes
the life-long speciality of serving one and the same machine. Machinery
is put to a wrong use, with the object of transforming the workman, from
his very childhood, into a part of a detail-machine” (Marx). And not
only the labourers but also the classes directly or indirectly
exploiting the labourers are made subject, through the division of
labour, to the tool of their function: the empty-minded bourgeois to his
own capital and his own insane craving for profits; the lawyer to his
fossilised legal conceptions, which dominate him as an independent
power; the “educated classes” in general to their manifold species of
local narrow-mindedness and one-sidedness, to their own physical and
mental short-sightedness, to their stunted growth due to their narrow
specialised education and their being chained for life to this
specialised activity — even when this specialised activity is merely to
do nothing.

The utopians were already perfectly clear in their minds as to the
effects of the division of labour, the stunting on the one hand of the
labourer, and on the other of the labour function, which is restricted
to the lifelong uniform mechanical repetition of one and the same
operation. The abolition of the antithesis between town and country was
demanded by Fourier, as by Owen, as the first basic prerequisite for the
abolition of the old division of labour altogether. Both of them thought
that the population should be scattered through the country in groups of
sixteen hundred to three thousand persons; each group was to occupy a
gigantic palace, with a household run on communal lines, in the centre
of their area of land. It is true that Fourier occasionally refers to
towns, but these were to consist in turn of only four or five such
palaces situated near each other. Both writers would have each member of
society occupied in agriculture as well as in industry; with Fourier,
industry covers chiefly handicrafts and manufacture, while Owen assigns
the main role to modern industry and already demands the introduction of
steam-power and machinery in domestic work. But within agriculture as
well as industry both of them also demand the greatest possible variety
of occupation for each individual, and in accordance with this, the
training of the youth for the utmost possible all-round technical
functions. They both consider that man should gain universal development
through universal practical activity and that labour should recover the
attractiveness of which the division of labour has despoiled it, in the
first place through this variation of occupation, and through the
correspondingly short duration of the “sitting” — to use Fourier’s
expression — devoted to each particular kind of work. Both Fourier and
Owen are far in advance of the mode of thought of the exploiting classes
inherited by Herr Dühring, according to which the antithesis between
town and country is inevitable in the nature of things; the narrow view
that a number of “entities” {D. C. _257}_ must in any event be condemned
to the production of _one single_ article, the view that desires to
perpetuate the “economic species” _{329}_ of men distinguished by their
way of life — people who take pleasure in the performance of precisely
this and no other thing, who have therefore sunk so low that they
_rejoice_ in their own subjection and one-sidedness. In comparison with
the basic conceptions even of the “idiot” {D. K. G. 286} Fourier’s most
recklessly bold fantasies; in comparison even with the paltriest ideas
of the “crude, feeble, and paltry” {295, 296} Owen — Herr Dühring,
himself still completely dominated by the division of labour, is no more
than an impertinent dwarf.

In making itself the master of all the means of production to use them
in accordance with a social plan, society puts an end to the former
subjection of men to their own means of production. It goes without
saying that society cannot free itself unless every individual is freed.
The old mode of production must therefore be revolutionised from top to
bottom, and in particular the former division of labour must disappear.
Its place must be taken by an organisation of production in which, on
the one hand, no individual can throw on the shoulders of others his
share in productive labour, this natural condition of human existence;
and in which, on the other hand, productive labour, instead of being a
means of subjugating men, will become a means of their emancipation, by
offering each individual the opportunity to develop all his faculties,
physical and mental, in all directions and exercise them to the full —
in which, therefore, productive labour will become a pleasure instead of
being a burden.

Today this is no longer a fantasy, no longer a pious wish. With the
present development of the productive forces, the increase in production
that will follow from the very fact of the socialisation of the
productive forces, coupled with the abolition of the barriers and
disturbances, and of the waste of products and means of production,
resulting from the capitalist mode of production, will suffice, with
everybody doing his share of work, to reduce the time required for
labour to a point which, measured by our present conceptions, will be
small indeed.

Nor is the abolition of the old division of labour a demand which could
only be carried through to the detriment of the productivity of labour.
On the contrary. Thanks to modern industry it has become a condition of
production itself. “The employment of machinery does away with the
necessity of crystallising the distribution of various groups of workmen
among the different kinds of machines after the manner of Manufacture,
by the constant annexation of a particular man to a particular function.
Since the motion of the whole system does not proceed from the workman,
but from the machinery, a change of persons can take place at any time
without an interruption of the work... Lastly, the quickness with which
machine work is learnt by young people, does away with the necessity of
bringing up for exclusive employment by machinery, a special class of
operatives.” But while the capitalist mode of employment of machinery
necessarily perpetuates the old division of labour with its fossilised
specialisation, although it has become superfluous from a technical
standpoint, the machinery itself rebels against this anachronism. The
technical basis of modern industry is revolutionary. ”By means of
machinery, chemical processes and other methods, it is continually
causing changes not only in the technical basis of production, but also
in the functions of the labourer, and in the social combinations of the
labour-process. At the same time, it thereby also revolutionises the
division of labour within the society, and incessantly launches masses
of capital and of workpeople from one branch of production to another.
Modern industry, by its very nature, therefore necessitates variation of
labour, fluency of function, universal mobility of the labourer... We
have seen how this absolute contradiction ... vents its rage in the
incessant human sacrifices from among the working-class, in the most
reckless squandering of labour-power, and in the devastation caused by
social anarchy. This is the negative side. But if, on the one hand,
variation of work at present imposes itself after the manner of an
overpowering natural law, and with the blindly destructive action of a
natural law that meets with resistance at all points, modern industry,
on the other hand, through its catastrophes imposes the necessity of
recognising, as a fundamental law of production, variation of work,
consequently fitness of the labourer for varied work, consequently the
greatest possible development of his varied aptitudes. It becomes a
question of life and death for society to adapt the mode of production
to the normal functioning of this law. Modern industry makes it a
question of life and death to replace the monstrosity of a destitute
working population kept in reserve at the disposal of capital for the
changing needs of exploitation with the absolute availability of man for
the changing requirements of labour; to replace what is virtually a mere
fragment of the individual, the mere carrier of a social
detail-function, with the fully developed individual, to whom the
different social functions are so many alternating modes of activity”
(Marx, _Capital_).

Modern industry, which has taught us to convert the movement of
molecules, something more or less universally feasible, into the
movement of masses for technical purposes, has thereby to a considerable
extent freed production from restrictions of locality. Water-power was
local; steam-power is free. While water-power is necessarily rural,
steam-power is by no means necessarily urban. It is capitalist
utilisation which concentrates it mainly in the towns and changes
factory villages into factory towns. But in so doing it at the same time
undermines the conditions under which it operates. The first requirement
of the steam-engine, and a main requirement of almost all branches of
production in modern industry, is relatively pure water. But the factory
town transforms all water into stinking manure. However much therefore
urban concentration is a basic condition of capitalist production, each
individual industrial capitalist is constantly striving to get away from
the large towns necessarily created by this production, and to transfer
his plant to the countryside. This process can be studied in detail in
the textile industry districts of Lancashire and Yorkshire; modern
capitalist industry is constantly bringing new large towns into being
there by constant flight from the towns into the country. The situation
is similar in the metal-working districts where, in part, other causes
produce the same effects.

Once more, only the abolition of the capitalist character of modern
industry can bring us out of this new vicious circle, can resolve this
contradiction in modern industry, which is constantly reproducing
itself. Only a society which makes it possible for its productive forces
to dovetail harmoniously into each other on the basis of one single vast
plan can allow industry to be distributed over the whole country in the
way best adapted to its own development, and to the maintenance and
development of the other elements of production.

Accordingly, abolition of the antithesis between town and country is not
merely possible. It has become a direct necessity of industrial
production itself, just as it has become a necessity of agricultural
production and, besides, of public health. The present poisoning of the
air, water and land can be put an end to only by the fusion of town and
country; and only such fusion will change the situation of the masses
now languishing in the towns, and enable their excrement to be used for
the production of plants instead of for the production of disease.

Capitalist industry has already made itself relatively independent of
the local limitations arising from the location of sources of the raw
materials it needs. The textile industry works up, in the main, imported
raw materials. Spanish iron ore is worked up in England and Germany and
Spanish and South-American copper ores, in England. Every coalfield now
supplies fuel to an industrial area far beyond its own borders, an area
which is widening every year. Along the whole of the European coast
steam-engines are driven by English and to some extent also by German
and Belgian coal. Society liberated from the restrictions of capitalist
production can go much further still. By generating a race of producers
with an all-round development who understand the scientific basis of
industrial production as a whole, and each of whom has had practical
experience in a whole series of branches of production from start to
finish, this society will bring into being a new productive force which
will abundantly compensate for the labour required to transport raw
materials and fuel from great distances.

The abolition of the separation of town and country is therefore not
utopian, also, in so far as it is conditioned on the most equal
distribution possible of modern industry over the whole country. It is
true that in the huge towns civilisation has bequeathed us a heritage
which it will take much time and trouble to get rid of. But it must and
will be got rid of, however, protracted a process it may be. Whatever
destiny may be in store for the German Empire of the Prussian nation,
^([119]) Bismarck can go to his grave proudly aware that the desire of
his heart is sure to be fulfilled: the great towns will perish. ^([120])

And now see how puerile is Herr Dühring’s idea that society can take
possession of all means of production in the aggregate without
revolutionising from top to bottom the old method of production and
first of all putting an end to the old division of labour; that
everything will be in order once

“natural opportunities and personal capabilities are taken into account”
{D. C. 259} —

that therefore whole masses of entities will remain, as in the past,
subjected to the production of _one single_ article; whole “populations”
{275} will be engaged in a single branch of production, and humanity
continue to be divided, as in the past, into a number of different
crippled “economic species” {329}, for there still are “porters” and
“architects” {D. K.G. 500}. Society is to become master of the means of
production as a whole, in order that each individual may remain the
slave of his means of production, and have only a choice as to _which_
means of production are to enslave him. And see also how Herr Dühring
considers the separation of town and country as “inevitable in the
nature of things” {D. C. 232}, and can find only a tiny palliative in
schnaps-distilling and beet-sugar manufacturing — two, in their
connection specifically Prussian, branches of industry; how he makes the
distribution of industry over the country dependent on certain future
inventions and on the _necessity_ of associating industry directly with
the procurement of raw materials — raw materials which are already used
at an ever increasing distance from their place of origin! And Herr
Dühring finally tries to cover up his rear by assuring us that in the
long run social wants will carry through the union between agriculture
and industry even _against_ economic considerations, as if this would be
some economic sacrifice!

Certainly, to be able to see that the revolutionary elements which will
do away with the old division of labour, along with the separation of
town and country, and will revolutionise the whole of production; see
that these elements are already contained in embryo in the production
conditions of modern large-scale industry and that their development is
hindered by the existing capitalist mode of production — to be able to
see these things, it is necessary to have a somewhat wider horizon than
the sphere of jurisdiction of Prussian law, than the country where
production of schnaps and beet-sugar are the key industries, and where
commercial crises can be studied on the book market. To be able to see
these things it is necessary to have some knowledge of real large-scale
industry in its historical growth and in its present actual form,
especially in the one country where it has its home and where alone it
has attained its classical development. Then no one will think of
attempting to vulgarise modern scientific socialism and to degrade it
into Herr Dühring’s _specifically Prussian socialism_.



IV. DISTRIBUTION


We have already seen that Dühringian economics comes down to the
following proposition: the capitalist mode of _production is_ quite
good, and can remain in existence, but the capitalist mode of
_distribution is_ of evil, and must disappear. We now find that Herr
Dühring's “socialitarian” system is nothing more than the carrying
through of this principle in fantasy. In fact, it turned out that Herr
Dühring has practically nothing to take exception to in the mode of
production — as such — of capitalist society, that he wants to retain
the old division of labour in all its essentials, and that he
consequently has hardly a word to say in regard to production within his
economic commune. Production is indeed a sphere in which robust facts
are dealt with, and in which consequently “rational fantasy” {D. Ph. 46}
should give but little scope to the soaring of its free soul, because
the danger of making a disgraceful blunder is too great. It is quite
otherwise with distribution — which in Herr Dühring's view has no
connection whatever with production and is determined not by production
but by a pure act of the will — distribution is the predestined field of
his “social alchemising” {D. K. G. 237}.

To the equal obligation to produce corresponds the equal right to
consume, exercised in an organised manner in the economic commune and in
the trading commune embracing a large number of economic communes.
“Labour” is here “exchanged for other labour on the basis of equal
valuation... Service and counterservice represent here real equality
between quantities of labour” {D. C. 256}. And this “equalisation of
human energies” applies “whether the individuals have in fact done more
or less, or perhaps _even nothing at all”_ {D. Ph. 281}; for all
performances, in so far as they involve time and energy, can be regarded
as labour done — therefore even playing bowls or going for a walk {see
D. C. 266}. This exchange, however, does not take place between
individuals as the community is the owner of all means of production and
consequently also of all products; on the one hand it takes place
between each economic commune and its individual members, and on the
other between the various economic and trading communes themselves. “The
individual economic communes in particular will replace retail trade
within their own areas by completely planned sales” {326}. Wholesale
trade will be organised on the same lines: “The system of the free
economic society ... consequently remains a vast exchange institution,
whose operations are carried out on the basis provided by the precious
metals. It is insight into the inevitable necessity of this fundamental
quality which distinguishes our scheme from all those foggy notions
which cling even to the most rational forms of current socialist ideas”
{324}.

For the purposes of this exchange, the economic commune, as the first
appropriator of the social products, has to determine, “for each type of
articles, a uniform price” {277}, based on the average production costs.
“The significance which the so-called costs of production ... have for
value and price today, will be provided” (in the socialitarian system)
“...by the estimates of the quantity of labour to be employed. These
estimates, by virtue of the principle of equal rights for each
individual also in the economic sphere, can be traced back, in the last
analysis, to consideration of the number of persons that participated in
the labour; they will result in the relation of prices corresponding
both to the natural conditions of production and to the social right of
realisation. The output of the precious metals will continue, as now, to
determine the value of money... It can be seen from this that in the
changed constitution of society, one not only does not lose the
determining factor and measure, in the first place of values, and, with
value, of the exchange relations between products, but wins them good
and proper for the first time” {326-327}.

The famous “absolute value” {D. K. G. 499} is at last realised.

On the other hand, however, the commune must also put its individual
members in a position to buy from it the articles produced, by paying to
each, in compensation for his labour, a certain sum of money, daily,
weekly or monthly, but necessarily the same for all. “From the
socialitarian standpoint it is consequently a matter of indifference
whether we say that wages disappear, or, that they must become the
exclusive form of economic income” {D. C. 263}. Equal wages and equal
prices, however, establish “quantitative, if not qualitative equality of
consumption” {268}, and thereby the “universal principle of justice”
{282} is realised in the economic sphere.

As to how the level of this wage of the future is to be determined, Herr
Dühring tells us only

that here too, as in all other cases, there will be an exchange of
“equal labour for equal labour” {D. C. 257}. For six hours of labour,
therefore, a sum of money will be paid which also embodies in itself six
hours of labour.

Nevertheless, the “universal principle of justice” must not in any way
be confounded with that crude levelling down which makes the bourgeois
so indignantly oppose all communism, and especially the spontaneous
communism of the workers. It is by no means so inexorable as it would
like to appear.

The “equality in principle of economic rights does not exclude the
_voluntary_ addition to what justice requires of an expression of
special recognition and honour... Society _honours itself_ in conferring
distinction on the higher types of professional ability by _a moderate
additional allocation_ for consumption” {267}.

And Herr Dühring, too, honours himself, when combining the innocence of
a dove with the subtleness of a serpent, [Matthew 10:16. — _Ed_] he
displays such touching concern for the moderate additional consumption
of the Dührings of the future.

This will finally do away with the capitalist mode of distribution. For

“supposing under such conditions someone actually had a surplus of
private means at his disposal, he would not be able to find any use for
it as capital. No individual and no group would acquire it from him for
production, except by way of exchange or purchase, but neither would
ever have occasion to pay him interest or profit” {264-65}. Hence
“inheritance conforming to the principle of equality” {289} would be
permissible. It cannot be dispensed with, for “a certain form of
inheritance will always be a necessary accompaniment of the family
principle”. But even the right of inheritance “will not be able to lead
to any amassing of considerable wealth, as the building up of property
... can never again aim at the creation of means of production and
purely rentiers’ existences” {291}.

And this fortunately completes the economic commune. Let us now have a
look at how it works.

We assume that all of Herr Dühring's preliminary conditions are
completely realised; we therefore take it for granted that the economic
commune pays to each of its members, for six hours of labour a day, a
sum of money, say twelve marks, in which likewise six hours of labour
are embodied. We assume further that prices exactly correspond to
values, and therefore, on our assumptions, cover only the costs of raw
materials, the wear and tear of machinery, the consumption of
instruments of labour and the wages paid. An economic commune of a
hundred working members would then produce in a day commodities to the
value of twelve hundred marks; and in a year of 300 working-days,
360,000 marks. It pays the same sum to its members, each of whom does as
he likes with his share, which is twelve marks a day or 3,600 marks a
year. At the end of a year, and at the end of a hundred years, the
commune is no richer than it was at the beginning. During this whole
period it will never once be in a position to provide even the moderate
additional allocation for Herr Dühring’s consumption, unless it cares to
take it from its stock of means of production. Accumulation is
completely forgotten. Even worse: as accumulation is a social necessity
and the retention of money provides a convenient form of accumulation,
the organisation of the economic commune directly impels its members to
accumulate privately, and thereby leads it to its own destruction.

How can this conflict in the nature of the economic commune be avoided?
It might take refuge in his beloved “taxes” {24}, the price surcharge,
and sell its annual production for 480,000 instead of 360,000. But as
all other economic communes are in the same position, and would
therefore act in the same way, each of them, in its exchanges with the
others, would have to pay just as much “taxes” as it pockets itself, and
the “tribute” {374} would thus have to fall on its own members alone.

Or the economic commune might settle the matter without more ado by
paying to each member, for six hours of labour, the product of less than
six hours, say, of four hours, of labour; that is to say, instead of
twelve marks only eight marks a day, leaving the prices of commodities,
however, at their former level. In this case it does directly and openly
what it strived to do in a hidden and indirect way in the former case:
it forms Marxian surplus-value to the amount of 120,000 marks annually,
by paying its members, on outright capitalist lines, less than the value
of what they produce, while it sells them commodities, which they can
only buy from it, at their full value. The economic commune can
therefore secure a reserve fund only by revealing itself as an
“ennobled” truck system ^(*13) on the widest possible communist basis.

So have your choice: Either the economic commune exchanges “equal labour
for equal labour” {257}, and in this case it cannot accumulate a fund
for the maintenance and extension of production, but only the individual
members can do this; or it does form such a fund, but in this case it
does not exchange “equal labour for equal labour”.

Such is the content of exchange in the economic commune. What of its
form? The exchange is effected through the medium of metallic money, and
Herr Dühring is not a little proud of the “world-historic import” {D. C.
341} of this reform. But in the trading between the commune and its
members the money is _not_ money at all, it does not function in any way
as money. It serves as a mere labour certificate; to use Marx's phrase,
it is “merely evidence of the part taken by the individual in the common
labour, and of his right to a certain portion of the common produce
destined for consumption”, and in carrying out this function, it is “no
more ‘money’ than a ticket for the theatre”. It can therefore be
replaced by any other token, just as Weitling replaces it by a “ledger”,
in which the labour-hours worked are entered on one side and means of
subsistence taken as compensation on the other. ^([121]) In a word, in
the trading of the economic commune with its members it functions merely
as Owen’s “labour money”, that “phantom” which Herr Dühring looks down
upon so disdainfully, but nevertheless is himself compelled to introduce
into his economics of the future. Whether the token which certifies the
measure of fulfilment of the “obligation to produce”, and thus of the
earned “right to consume” {320} is a scrap of paper, a counter or a gold
coin is absolutely of no consequence for _this_ purpose. For other
purposes, however, it is by no means immaterial, as we shall see.

If therefore, in the trading of an economic commune with its members,
metallic money does not function as money but as a disguised labour
certificate, it performs its money function even less in exchange
between the different economic communes. In this exchange, on the
assumptions made by Herr Dühring, metallic money is totally superfluous.
In fact, mere book-keeping would suffice, which would effect the
exchange of products of equal labour for products of equal labour far
more simply if it used the natural measure of labour-time, with the
labour-hour as unit — than if it first converted the labour-hours into
money. The exchange is in reality simple exchange in kind; all balances
are easily and simply settled by drafts on other communes. But should a
commune really have a deficit in its dealings with other communes, all
“the gold existing in the universe” {D. Ph. 96}, “money by nature” {D.
C. 39} though it be, could not save this commune from the fate of having
to make good this deficit by increasing the quantity of its own labour,
if it does not want to fall into a position of dependence on other
communes on account of its debt. But let the reader always bear in mind
that we are not ourselves constructing any edifice of the future; we are
merely accepting Herr Dühring’s assumptions and drawing the inevitable
conclusions from them.

Thus neither in exchange between the economic commune and its members
nor in exchange between the different communes can gold, which is “money
by nature”, get to realise this its nature. Nevertheless, Herr Dühring
assigns to it the function of money even in the “socialitarian” system.
Hence, we must see if there is any other field in which its money
function can be exercised. And this field exists. Herr Dühring gives
everyone a right to “quantitatively equal consumption” {268}, but he
cannot compel anyone to exercise it. On the contrary, he is proud that
in the world he has created everyone can do what he likes with his
money. He therefore cannot prevent some from setting aside a small money
hoard, while others are unable to make ends meet on the wage paid to
them. He even makes this inevitable by explicitly recognising in the
right of inheritance that family property should be owned in common;
whence comes also the obligation of the parents to maintain their
children. But this makes a wide breach in quantitatively equal
consumption. The bachelor lives like a lord, happy and content with his
eight or twelve marks a day, while the widower with eight minor children
finds it very difficult to manage on this sum. On the other hand, by
accepting money in payment without any question, the commune leaves open
the door to the possibility that this money may have been obtained
otherwise than by the individual’s own labour. _Non olet_. ^([122]) The
commune does not know where it comes from. But in this way all
conditions are created permitting metallic money, which hitherto played
the role of a mere labour certificate, to exercise its real money
function. Both the Opportunity and the motive are present, on the one
hand to form a hoard, and on the other to run into debt. The needy
individual borrows from the individual who builds up a hoard. The
borrowed money, accepted by the commune in payment for means of
subsistence, once more becomes what it is in present-day society, the
social incarnation of human labour, the real measure of labour, the
general medium of circulation. All the “laws and administrative
regulations” {323} in the world are just as powerless against it as they
are against the multiplication table or the chemical composition of
water. And as the builder of the hoard is in a position to extort
interest from people in need, usury is restored along with metallic
money functioning as money.

Up to this point we have only considered the effects of a retention of
metallic money within the field of operation of the Dühring economic
commune. But outside this field the rest of the world, the profligate
world, meanwhile carries on contentedly in the old accustomed way. On
the world market gold and silver remain _world money_, a general means
of purchase and payment the absolute social embodiment of wealth. And
this property of the precious metal gives the individual members of the
economic communes a new motive to accumulate a hoard, get rich, exact
usury; the motive to manoeuvre freely and independently with regard to
the commune and beyond its borders, and to realise on the world market
the private wealth which they have accumulated. The usurers are
transformed into dealers in the medium of circulation, bankers,
controllers of the medium of circulation and of world money, and thus
into controllers of production, and thus into controllers of the means
of production, even though these may still for many years be registered
nominally as the property of the economic and trading communes. And so
that hoarders and usurers, transformed into bankers, become the masters
also of the economic and trading communes themselves. Herr Dühring’s
“socialitarian system” is indeed quite fundamentally different from the
“hazy notions” {D. K. G. 498} of the other socialists. It has no other
purpose but the recreation of high finance, under whose control and for
whose pecuniary advantage it will labour valiantly — if it should ever
happen to be established and to hold together. Its one hope of salvation
would lie in the amassers of hoards preferring, by means of their world
money, to run away from the commune with all possible speed.

Ignorance of earlier socialist thought is so widespread in Germany that
an innocent youth might at this point raise the question whether, for
example, Owen’s labour-notes might not lead to a similar abuse. Although
we are here not concerned with developing the significance of these
labour-notes, space should be given to the following for the purpose of
contrasting Dühring's “comprehensive schematism” {D. C. 341} with Owen's
“crude feeble and meagre ideas” {D. K. G. 295, 296}: In the first place,
such a misuse of Owen's labour-notes would require their conversion into
real money, while Herr Dühring presupposes real money, though attempting
to prohibit it from functioning otherwise than as mere labour
certificate. While in Owen’s scheme there would have to be a real abuse,
in Dühring’s scheme the immanent nature of money, which is independent
of human volition, would assert itself; the specific, correct use of
money would assert itself in spite of the misuse which Herr Dühring
tries to impose on it owing to his own ignorance of the nature of money.
Secondly, with Owen the labour-notes are only a transitional form to
complete community and free utilisation of the resources of society; and
incidentally at most also a means designed to make communism plausible
to the British public. If therefore any form of misuse should compel
Owen's society to do away with the labour-notes, the society would take
a step forward towards its goal, entering upon a more perfect stage of
its development. But if the Dühringian economic commune abolishes money,
it at one blow destroys its “world-historic import”, it puts an end to
its peculiar beauty, ceases to be the Dühring economic commune and sinks
to the level of the befogged notions to lift it from which Herr Dühring
has devoted so much of the hard labour of his rational fantasy. ^(*14)

What, then, is the source of all the strange errors and entanglements
amid which the Dühring economic commune meanders? Simply the fog which,
in Herr Dühring’s mind, envelops the concepts of value and money, and
finally drives him to attempt to discover the value of labour. But as
Herr Dühring has not by any means the monopoly of such fogginess for
Germany, but on the contrary meets with many competitors, we will
“overcome our reluctance for a moment and solve the knot” {497} which he
has contrived to make here.

The only value known in economics is the value of commodities. What are
commodities? Products made in a society of more or less separate private
producers, and therefore in the first place private products. These
private products, however, become commodities only when they are made,
not for consumption by their producers, but for consumption by others,
that is, for social consumption; they enter into social consumption
through exchange. The private producers are therefore socially
interconnected, constitute a society. Their products, although the
private products of each individual, are therefore simultaneously but
unintentionally and as it were involuntarily, also social products. In
what, then, consists the social character of these private products?
Evidently in two peculiarities: first, that they all satisfy some human
want, have a use-value not only for the producers but also for others,
and secondly, that although they are products of the most varied
individual labour, they are at the same time products of human labour as
such, of general human labour. In so far as they have a use-value also
for other persons, they can, generally speaking enter into exchange; in
so far as general human labour, the simple expenditure of human
labour-power is incorporated in all of them, they can be compared with
each other in exchange, be assumed to be equal or unequal, according to
the quantity of this labour embodied in each. In two equal products made
individually, social conditions being equal, an unequal quantity of
individual labour may be contained, but always only an equal quantity of
general human labour. An unskilled smith may make five horseshoes in the
time a skilful smith makes ten. But society does not form value from the
accidental lack of skill of an individual, it recognises as general
human labour only labour of a normal average degree of skill at the
particular time. In exchange therefore, one of the five horseshoes made
by the first smith has no more value than one of the ten made by the
other in an equal time. Individual labour contains general human labour
only in so far as it is socially necessary.

Therefore when I say that a commodity has a particular value, I say (1)
that it is a socially useful product; (2) that it has been produced by a
private individual for private account, (3) that although a product of
individual labour, it is nevertheless at the same time and as it were
unconsciously and involuntarily, also a product of social labour and, be
it noted, of a definite quantity of this labour, ascertained in a social
way, through exchange; (4) I express this quantity not in labour itself,
in so and so many labour-hours, but _in another commodity_. If therefore
I say that this clock is worth as much as that piece of cloth and each
of them is worth fifty marks, I say that an equal quantity of social
labour is contained in the clock, the cloth and the money. I therefore
assert that the social labour-time represented in them has been socially
measured and found to be equal. But not directly, absolutely, as
labour-time is usually measured, in labour-hours or days, etc., but in a
roundabout way, through the medium of exchange, relatively. That is why
I cannot express this definite quantity of labour-time in labour-hours —
how many of them remains unknown to me — but also only in a roundabout
way, relatively, in another commodity, which represents an equal
quantity of social labourtime. The clock is worth as much as the piece
of cloth.

But the production and exchange of commodities, while compelling the
society based on them to take this roundabout way, likewise compel it to
make the detour as short as possible. They single out from the
commonalty of commodities one sovereign commodity in which the value of
all other commodities can be expressed once and for all; a commodity
which serves as the direct incarnation of social labour, and is
therefore directly and unconditionally exchangeable for all commodities
— money. Money is already contained in embryo in the concept of value;
it is value, only in developed form. But since the value of commodities,
as opposed to the commodities themselves, assumes independent existence
in money, a new factor appears in the society which produces and
exchanges commodities, a factor with new social functions and effects.
We need only state this point at the moment, without going more closely
into it.

The political economy of commodity production is by no means the only
science which has to deal with factors known only relatively. The same
is true of physics, where we do not know how many separate gas molecules
are contained in a given volume of gas, pressure and temperature being
also given. But we know that, so far as Boyle’s law is correct, such a
given volume of any gas contains as many molecules as an equal volume of
any other gas at the same pressure and temperature. We can therefore
compare the molecular content of the most diverse volumes of the most
diverse gases under the most diverse conditions of pressure and
temperature; and if we take as the unit one litre of gas at 0° C and 760
mm pressure, we can measure the above molecular content by this unit. —
In chemistry the absolute atomic weights of the various elements are
also not known to us. But we know them relatively, inasmuch as we know
their reciprocal relations. Hence, just as commodity production and its
economics obtain a relative expression for the unknown quantities of
labour contained in the various commodities, by comparing these
commodities on the basis of their relative labour content, so chemistry
obtains a relative expression for the magnitude of the atomic weights
unknown to it by comparing the various elements on the basis of their
atomic weights, expressing the atomic weight of one element in multiples
or fractions of the other (sulphur, oxygen, hydrogen). And just as
commodity production elevates gold to the level of the absolute
commodity, the general equivalent of all other commodities, the measure
of all values, so chemistry promotes hydrogen to the rank of the
chemical money commodity, by fixing its atomic weight at 1 and reducing
the atomic weights of all other elements to hydrogen, expressing them in
multiples of its atomic weight.

Commodity production, however, is by no means the only form of social
production. In the ancient Indian communities and in the family
communities of the southern Slavs, products are not transformed into
commodities. The members of the community are directly associated for
production; the work is distributed according to tradition and
requirements, and likewise the products to the extent that they are
destined for consumption. Direct social production and direct
distribution preclude all exchange of commodities, therefore also the
transformation of the products into commodities (at any rate within the
community) and consequently also their transformation into _values._

From the moment when society enters into possession of the means of
production and uses them in direct association for production, the
labour of each individual, however varied its specifically useful
character may be, becomes at the start and directly social labour. The
quantity of social labour contained in a product need not then be
established in a roundabout way; daily experience shows in a direct way
how much of it is required on the average. Society can simply calculate
how many hours of labour are contained in a steam-engine, a bushel of
wheat of the last harvest, or a hundred square yards of cloth of a
certain quality. It could therefore never occur to it still to express
the quantities of labour put into the products, quantities which it will
then know directly and in their absolute amounts, in a third product, in
a measure which, besides, is only relative, fluctuating, inadequate,
though formerly unavoidable for lack of a better one, rather than
express them in their natural, adequate and absolute measure, _time._
Just as little as it would occur to chemical science still to express
atomic weight in a roundabout way, relatively, by means of the hydrogen
atom, if it were able to express them absolutely, in their adequate
measure, namely in actual weights, in billionths or quadrillionths of a
gramme. Hence, on the assumptions we made above, society will not assign
values to products. It will not express the simple fact that the hundred
square yards of cloth have required for their production, say, a
thousand hours of labour in the oblique and meaningless way, stating
that they have the _value_ of a thousand hours of labour. It is true
that even then it will still be necessary for society to know how much
labour each article of consumption requires for its production. It will
have to arrange its plan of production in accordance with its means of
production, which include, in particular, its labour-powers. The useful
effects of the various articles of consumption, compared with one
another and with the quantities of labour required for their production,
will in the end determine the plan. People will be able to manage
everything very simply, without the intervention of much-vaunted
“value”. ^(*15)

The concept of value is the most general and therefore the most
comprehensive expression of the economic conditions of commodity
production. Consequently, this concept contains the germ, not only of
money, but also of all the more developed forms of the production and
exchange of commodities. The fact that value is the expression of the
social labour contained in the privately produced products itself
creates the possibility of a difference arising between this social
labour and the private labour contained in these same products. If
therefore a private producer continues to produce in the old way, while
the social mode of production develops this difference will become
palpably evident to him. The same result follows when the aggregate of
private producers of a particular class of goods produces a quantity of
them which exceeds the requirements of society. The fact that the value
of a commodity is expressed only in terms of another commodity, and can
only be realised in exchange for it, admits of the possibility that the
exchange may never take place altogether, or at least may not realise
the correct value. Finally, when the specific commodity labour-power
appears on the market, its value is determined, like that of any other
commodity, by the labour-time socially necessary for its production. The
value form of products therefore already contains in embryo the whole
capitalist form of production, the antagonism between capitalists and
wage-workers, the industrial reserve army, crises. To seek to abolish
the capitalist form of production by establishing "true value" {D. K. G.
78} is therefore tantamount to attempting to abolish Catholicism by
establishing the "true" Pope, or to set up a society in which at last
the producers control their product, by consistently carrying into life
an economic category which is the most comprehensive expression of the
enslavement of the producers by their own product.

Once the commodity-producing society has further developed the value
form, which is inherent in commodities as such, to the money form,
various germs still hidden in value break through to the light of day.
The first and most essential effect is the generalisation of the
commodity form. Money forces the commodity form even on the objects
which have hitherto been produced directly for self-consumption; it
drags them into exchange. Thereby the commodity form and money penetrate
the internal husbandry of the communities directly associated for
production; they break one tie of communion after another, and dissolve
the community into a mass of private producers. At first, as can be seen
in India, money replaces joint tillage of the soil by individual
tillage; at a later stage it puts an end to the common ownership of the
tillage area, which still manifests itself in periodical redistribution,
by a final division (for example in the village communities on the
Mosel; and it is now beginning also in the Russian village communes);
finally, it forces the dividing-up of whatever woodland and pasturage is
still owned in common. Whatever other causes arising in the development
of production are also operating here, money always remains the most
powerful means through which their influence is exerted on the
communities. And, despite all “laws and administrative regulations” {D.
C. 323}, money would with the same natural necessity inevitably break up
the Dühring economic commune, if it ever came into existence.

We have already seen above (“Political Economy”, VI) that it is a
contradiction in itself to speak of the value of labour. As under
certain social relations labour produces not only products but also
value, and this value is measured by labour, the latter can as little
have a separate value as weight, as such, can have a separate weight, or
heat, a separate temperature. But it is the characteristic peculiarity
of all social confusion that ruminates on "true value" {D. K. G. 78} to
imagine that in existing society the worker does not receive the full
"value" of his labour, and that socialism is destined to remedy this.
Hence it is necessary in the first place to discover what the value of
labour is, and this is done by attempting to measure labour, not by its
adequate measure, time, but by its product. The worker should receive
the "full proceeds of labour" {D. C. 324}. ^([124]) Not only the labour
product, but labour itself should be directly exchangeable for products
one hour’s labour for the product of another hour's labour. This
however, gives rise at once to a very “serious” hitch. The _whole
product is_ distributed. The most important progressive function of
society, accumulation, is taken from society and put into the hands,
placed at the arbitrary discretion, of individuals. The individuals can
do what they like with their “proceeds”, but society at best remains as
rich or poor as it was. The means of production accumulated in the past
have therefore been centralised in the hands of society only in order
that all means of production accumulated in the future may once again be
dispersed in the hands of individuals. One knocks to pieces one’s own
premises; one has arrived at a pure absurdity.

Fluid labour, active labour-power, is to be exchanged for the product of
labour. Then labour-power is a commodity, just like the product for
which it is to be exchanged. Then the value of this labour-power is not
in any sense determined by its product, but by the social labour
embodied in it, according to the present law of wages.

But it is precisely this which must not be, we are told. Fluid labour,
labour-power, should be exchangeable for its full product. That is to
say, it should be exchangeable not for its _value_, but for its
_use-value;_ the law of value is to apply to all other commodities, but
must be repealed so far as labour-power is concerned. Such is the
self-destructive confusion that lies behind the “value of labour”.

The “exchange of labour for labour on the principle of equal valuation”
{256}, in so far as it has any meaning, that is to say, the mutual
exchangeability of products of equal social labour, hence the law of
value, is the fundamental law of precisely commodity production, hence
also of its highest form, capitalist production. It asserts itself in
present-day society in the only way in which economic laws can assert
themselves in a society of private producers: as a blindly operating law
of nature inherent in things and relations, and independent of the will
or actions of the producers. By elevating this law to the basic law of
his economic commune and demanding that the commune should execute it in
all consciousness, Herr Dühring converts the basic law of existing
society into the basic law of his imaginary society. He wants existing
society, but without its abuses. In this he occupies the same position
as Proudhon. Like him, he wants to abolish the abuses which have arisen
out of the development of commodity production into capitalist
production, by giving effect against them to the basic law of commodity
production, precisely the law to whose operation these abuses are due.
Like him, he wants to abolish the real consequences of the law of value
by means of fantastic ones.

Our modern Don Quixote, seated on his noble Rosinante, the “universal
principle of justice” {D. C. 282}, and followed by his valiant Sancho
Panza, Abraham Enss, sets out proudly on his knight errantry to win
Mambrin's helmet, the “value of labour”; but we fear, fear greatly, he
will bring home nothing but the old familiar barber’s basin.



V. STATE, FAMILY, EDUCATION


With the two last chapters we have about exhausted the economic content
of Herr Dühring’s “new socialitarian system” {D. Ph. 295}. The only
point we might add is that his “universal range of historical survey”
{D. K. G. 2} does not in the least prevent him from safeguarding his own
special interests, even apart from the moderate surplus consumption
referred to above. As the old division of labour continues to exist in
the socialitarian system, the economic commune will have to reckon not
only with architects and porters {500}, but also with professional
writers, and the question will then arise how authors’ rights are to be
dealt with. This question is one which occupies Herr Dühring’s attention
more than any other. Everywhere, for example, in connection with Louis
Blanc and Proudhon {D. C. 302; D. K. G. 482-83}, the reader stumbles
across the question of authors’ rights, until it is finally brought
safely into the haven of “sociality”, after a circumstantial discussion
occupying nine full pages of the _Cursus_, in the form of a mysterious
“remuneration of labour” {D. C. 307} — whether with or without moderate
surplus consumption, is not stated. A chapter on the position of fleas
in the natural system of society would have been just as appropriate and
in any case far less tedious.

The _Philosophie_ gives detailed prescriptions for the organisation of
the state of the future. Here Rousseau, although “the sole important
forerunner” {D. Ph. 264} of Herr Dühring, nevertheless did not lay the
foundations deep enough; his more profound successor puts this right by
completely watering down Rousseau and mixing in remnants of the Hegelian
philosophy of right, also reduced to a watery mess. “The sovereignty of
the individual” {268} forms the basis of the Dühringian state of the
future; it is not to be suppressed by the rule of the majority, but to
find its real culmination in it. How does this work? Very simply.

“If one presupposes agreements between each individual and every other
individual in all directions, and if the object of these agreements is
mutual aid against unjust offences — then the power required for the
maintenance of right is only strengthened, and right is not deduced from
the more superior strength of the many against the individual or of the
majority against the minority” {268}.

Such is the ease with which the living force of the hocus-pocus of the
philosophy of reality surmounts the most impassable obstacles; and if
the reader thinks that after that he is no wiser than he was before,
Herr Dühring replies that he really must not think it is such a simple
matter, for

“the _slightest error_ in the conception of the role of the collective
will would _destroy_ the sovereignty of the individual, and this
sovereignty is the only thing” (!) “conducive to the deduction of real
rights” {268}.

Herr Dühring treats his public as it deserves, when he makes game of it.
He could have laid it on much thicker; the students of the philosophy of
reality would not have noticed it anyhow.

Now the sovereignty of the individual consists essentially in that

“the individual is _subject to absolute compulsion_ by the state”; this
compulsion, however, can only be justified in so far as it “really
serves natural justice” {271}. With this end in view there will be
“legislative and judicial authority”, which, however, “must remain in
the hands of the community” {272}; and there will also be an alliance
for defence, which will find expression in “joint action in the army or
in an executive section for the maintenance of internal security” {273},

that is to say, there will also be army, police, gendarmerie. Herr
Dühring has many times already shown that he is a good Prussian; here he
proves himself a peer of that model Prussian, who, as the late Minister
von Rochow put it, “carries his gendarme in his breast”. This
gendarmerie of the future, however, will not be so dangerous as the
police thugs ^([125]) of the present day. Whatever the sovereign
individual may suffer at their hands, he will always have _one
consolation_:

“the right or wrong which, according to the circumstances, may then be
dealt to him by free society can never be _an_y _worse_ than that which
the _state of nature_ would have brought with it” {D. Ph. 274}!

And then, after Herr Dühring has once more tripped us up on those
authors’ rights of his which are always getting in the way, he assures
us that in his world of the future

there will be, “of course, an absolutely free Bar available to all”
{279}.

“The free society, as it is conceived today” {304}, gets steadily more
and more mixed. Architects, porters, professional writers, gendarmes,
and now also barristers! This “world of sober and critical thought” {D.
C. 556-57} and the various heavenly kingdoms of the different religions,
in which the believer always finds in transfigured form the things which
have sweetened his earthly existence, are as like as two peas. And Herr
Dühring is a citizen of the state where “everyone can be happy in his
own way”. ^([126]) What more do we want?

But it does not matter what we want. What matters is what Herr Dühring
wants. And he differs from Frederick II in this, that in the Dühringian
future state certainly not everyone will be able to be happy in his own
way. The constitution of this future state provides:

“In the free society there can be no religious worship; _for_ every
member of it has got beyond the primitive childish superstition that
there are beings, behind nature or above it, who can be influenced by
sacrifices or prayers” {D. Ph. 286}. A “socialitarian system, rightly
conceived, _has_ therefore ... _to abolish_ all the paraphernalia of
religious magic, and therewith all the essential elements of religious
worship” {D. C. 345}.

Religion is being prohibited.

All religion, however, is nothing but the fantastic reflection in men’s
minds of those external forces which control their daily life, a
reflection in which the terrestrial forces assume the form of
supernatural forces. In the beginnings of history it was the forces of
nature which were first so reflected, and which in the course of further
evolution underwent the most manifold and varied personifications among
the various peoples. This early process has been traced back by
comparative mythology, at least in the case of the Indo-European
peoples, to its origin in the Indian Vedas, and in its further evolution
it has been demonstrated in detail among the Indians, Persians, Greeks,
Romans, Germans and, so far as material is available, also among the
Celts, Lithuanians and Slavs. But it is not long before, side by side
with the forces of nature, social forces begin to be active — forces
which confront man as equally alien and at first equally inexplicable,
dominating him with the same apparent natural necessity as the forces of
nature themselves. The fantastic figures, which at first only reflected
the mysterious forces of nature, at this point acquire social
attributes, become representatives of the forces of history. ^(*16) At a
still further stage of evolution, all the natural and social attributes
of the numerous gods are transferred to _one_ almighty god, who is but a
reflection of the abstract man. Such was the origin of monotheism, which
was historically the last product of the vulgarised philosophy of the
later Greeks and found its incarnation in the exclusively national god
of the Jews, Jehovah. In this convenient, handy and universally
adaptable form, religion can continue to exist as the immediate, that
is, the sentimental form of men's relation to the alien, natural and
social, forces which dominate them, so long as men remain under the
control of these forces. However, we have seen repeatedly that in
existing bourgeois society men are dominated by the economic conditions
created by themselves, by the means of production which they themselves
have produced, as if by an alien force. The actual basis of the
religious reflective activity therefore continues to exist, and with it
the religious reflection itself. And although bourgeois political
economy has given a certain insight into the causal connection of this
alien domination, this makes no essential difference. Bourgeois
economics can neither prevent crises in general, nor protect the
individual capitalists from losses, bad debts and bankruptcy, nor secure
the individual workers against unemployment and destitution. It is still
true that man proposes and God (that is, the alien domination of the
capitalist mode of production) disposes. Mere knowledge, even if it went
much further and deeper than that of bourgeois economic science, is not
enough to bring social forces under the domination of society. What is
above all necessary for this, is a social _act_. And when this act has
been accomplished, when society, by taking possession of all means of
production and using them on a planned basis, has freed itself and all
its members from the bondage in which they are now held by these means
of production which they themselves have produced but which confront
them as an irresistible alien force, when therefore man no longer merely
proposes, but also disposes — only then will the last alien force which
is still reflected in religion vanish; and with it will also vanish the
religious reflection itself, for the simple reason that then there will
be nothing left to reflect.

Herr Dühring, however, cannot wait until religion dies this, its
natural, death. He proceeds in more deep-rooted fashion. He
out-Bismarcks Bismarck; he decrees sharper May laws ^([127]) not merely
against Catholicism, but against all religion whatsoever; he incites his
gendarmes of the future against religion, and thereby helps it to
martyrdom and a prolonged lease of life. Wherever we turn, we find
specifically Prussian socialism.

After Herr Dühring has thus happily destroyed religion,

“man, made to rely solely on himself and nature, and matured in the
knowledge of his collective powers, can intrepidly enter on all the
roads which the course of events and his own being open to him” {D. Ph.
407}.

Let us now consider for a change what “course of events” the man made to
rely on himself can intrepidly enter on, led by Herr Dühring.

The first course of events whereby man is made to rely on himself is:
being born. Then,

for the period of natural minority, he remains committed to the “natural
tutor of children”, his mother. “This period may last, as in ancient
Roman law, until puberty, that is to say, until about the fourteenth
year.” Only when badly brought up older boys do not pay proper respect
to their mother’s authority will recourse be had to paternal assistance,
and particularly to the public educational regulations to remedy this.
At puberty the child becomes subject to “the natural guardianship of his
father”, if there is such a one “of real and uncontested paternity”
{293, 294}; otherwise the community appoints a guardian.

Just as Herr Dühring at an earlier point imagined that the capitalist
mode of production could be replaced by the social without transforming
production itself, so now he fancies that the modern bourgeois family
can be torn from its whole economic foundations without changing its
entire form. To him, this form is so immutable that he even makes
“ancient Roman law” {293}, though in a somewhat “ennobled” form, govern
the family for all time; and he can conceive a family only as a
“bequeathing” {D. C. 291}, which means a possessing, unit. Here the
utopians are far in advance of Herr Dühring. They considered that the
socialisation of youth education and, with this, real freedom in the
mutual relations between members of a family, would directly follow from
the free association of men and the transformation of private domestic
work into a public industry. Moreover, Marx has already shown
(_Capital_, {Vol. I,} p. 515 _et seqq_.) that “modern industry, by
assigning as it does an important part in the socially organised process
of production, outside the domestic sphere, to women, to young persons,
and to children of both sexes, creates a new economic foundation for a
higher form of the family and of the relations between the sexes”.

“Every dreamer of social reforms,” says Herr Dühring, “naturally has
ready a pedagogy corresponding to his new social life” {D. K. G. 295}.

If we are to judge by this thesis, Herr Dühring is “a veritable monster”
{261} among the dreamers of social reforms. For the school of the future
occupies his attention at the very least as much as the author’s rights,
and this is really saying a great deal. He has his curricula for school
and university all ready and complete, not only for the whole
“foreseeable future” {D. Ph. 1} but also for the transition period. But
we will confine ourselves to what will be taught to the young people of
both sexes in the final and ultimate socialitarian system.

The universal people’s school will provide

“everything which by itself and in principle can have any attraction for
man”, and therefore in particular the “foundations and main conclusions
of all sciences touching on the understanding of the world and of life”
{284}. In the first place, therefore, it teaches mathematics, and indeed
to such effect that the field of all fundamental concepts and methods,
from simple numeration and addition to the integral calculus, is
“completely compassed” {418}.

But this does not mean that in this school anyone will really
differentiate or integrate. On the contrary. What is to be taught there
will be, rather, entirely new elements of general mathematics, which
contain in embryo both ordinary elementary and higher mathematics. And
although Herr Dühring asserts that

he already has in his mind “schematically, in their main outlines”, “the
contents of the textbooks” {415} which the school of the future will
use,

he has unfortunately not as yet succeeded in discovering these

“elements of general mathematics”;

and what he cannot achieve

“can only really be expected from the free and enhanced forces of the
new social order” {D. Ph. 418}.

But if the grapes of the mathematics of the future are still very sour,
future astronomy, mechanics and physics will present all the less
difficulty and will

“provide the kernel of all schooling”, while “the science of plants and
animals, which, in spite of all theories, is mainly of a descriptive
character” will serve “rather as topics for light conversation”
{416-17}.

There it is, in black and white, in the _Philosophie_, page 417. Even to
the present day Herr Dühring knows no other botany and zoology than
those which are mainly descriptive. The whole of organic morphology,
which embraces the comparative anatomy, embryology, and palaeontology of
the organic world, is entirely unknown to him even by name. While in the
sphere of biology totally new sciences are springing up, almost by the
dozen, behind his back, his puerile spirit still goes to Raff’s
_Naturgeschichte fur Kinder_ for “the eminently modern educative
elements provided by the natural-scientific mode of thought” {D. K.G.
504}, and this constitution of the organic world he decrees likewise for
the whole . Here, too, as is his wont, he entirely forgets chemistry.

As for the aesthetic side of education, Herr Dühring will have to
fashion it all anew. The poetry of the past is worthless for this
purpose. Where all religion is prohibited, it goes without saying that
the “mythological or other religious trimmings” characteristic of poets
up to now cannot be tolerated in this school. “Poetic mysticism”, too,
“such as, for example, Goethe practiced so extensively”, is to be
condemned. Herr Dühring will therefore have to make up his mind to
produce for us those poetic masterpieces which “are in accord with the
higher claims of an imagination reconciled with reason”, and represent
the genuine ideal, which “denotes the consummation of the world” {D. Ph.
423}. Let him not tarry with it! The economic commune can achieve its
conquest of the world only when it moves along at the Alexandrine
double, reconciled with reason.

The adolescent citizen of the future will not be much troubled with
philology.

“The dead languages will be entirely discarded ... the foreign living
languages, however, ... will remain of secondary importance.” Only where
intercourse between nations extends to the movement of the masses of the
peoples themselves would these languages be made accessible, according
to needs and in an easy form. “Really educative study of language” will
be provided by a kind of general grammar, and particularly by study of
the “substance and form of one’s own language” {426-27}.

The national narrow-mindedness of modern man is still much too
cosmopolitan for Herr Dühring. He wants also to do away with the two
levers which in the world as it is today give at least the opportunity
of rising above the narrow national standpoint: knowledge of the ancient
languages, which opens a wider common horizon at least to those people
of various nationalities who have had a classical education; and
knowledge of modern languages, through the medium of which alone the
people of different nations can make themselves understood by one
another and acquaint themselves with what is happening beyond their own
borders. On the contrary, the grammar of the mother tongue is to be
thoroughly drilled in. “Substance and form of one’s own language”,
however, become intelligible only when its origin and gradual evolution
are traced, and this cannot be done without taking into account, first,
its own extinct forms, and secondly, cognate languages, both living and
dead. But this brings us back again to territory which has been
expressly forbidden. If Herr Dühring strikes out of his curriculum all
modern historical grammar, there is nothing left for his language
studies but the old-fashioned technical grammar, cut to the old
classical philological pattern, with all its casuistry and
arbitrariness, based on the lack of any historical basis. His hatred of
the old philology makes him elevate the very worst product of the old
philology to “the central point of the really educative study of
language” {427}. It is clear that we have before us a linguist who has
never heard a word of the tremendous and successful development of the
historical science of language which took place during the last sixty
years, and who therefore seeks “the eminently modern educative elements”
{D. K. G. 504} of linguistics, not in Bopp, Grimm and Diez, but in Heyse
and Becker of blessed memory.

But all this would still fall far short of making the young citizen of
the future “rely on himself”. To achieve this, it is necessary here
again to lay a deeper foundation, by means of

“the assimilation of the latest philosophical principles”. “Such a
deepening of the foundation, however, will not be... at all a gigantic
task”, now that Herr Dühring has cleared the path. In fact, “if one
purges of the spurious, scholastic excrescences those few strictly
scientific truths of which the general schematics of being can boast,
and determines to admit as valid only the reality authenticated” by Herr
Dühring, elementary philosophy becomes perfectly accessible also to the
youth of the future. “Recall to your mind the _extremely simple_ methods
by which we helped forward the concepts of infinity and their critique
to a hitherto unknown import” — and then “you will not be able to see at
all why the elements of the universal conception of space and time,
which have been given such simple form by the deepening and sharpening
now effected, should not eventually pass into the ranks of the
elementary studies... The most deep-rooted ideas” of Herr Dühring
“should play no secondary role in the universal educational scheme of
the new society” {D. Ph. 427-28}. The self-equal state of matter and the
counted uncountable are on the contrary destined “not merely to put man
on his own feet but also to make him realise of himself that he _has the
so-called absolute underfoot”._

The people’s school of the future, as one can see, is nothing but a
somewhat “ennobled” Prussian grammar school in which Greek and Latin are
replaced by a little more pure and applied mathematics and in particular
by the elements of the philosophy of reality, and the teaching of German
is brought back to Becker, of blessed memory, that is, down to about a
fourth-form level. And in fact, now that we have demonstrated Herr
Dühring’s mere schoolboy “knowledge” in all the spheres on which he has
touched, the reader will “not be able to see at all” why it, or rather,
such of it as is left after our preliminary thorough “purging”, should
not all and sundry “eventually pass into the ranks of the elementary
studies” — inasmuch as in reality it has never left these ranks. True,
Herr Dühring has heard something about the combination of work and
instruction in socialist society, which is to ensure an all-round
technical education as well as a practical foundation for scientific
training; and this point, too is therefore brought in, in his usual way,
to help the socialitarian scheme {284, 414}. But because, as we have
seen, the old division of labour, in its essentials, is to remain
undisturbed in the Dühringian production of the future, this technical
training at school is deprived of any practical application later on, or
any significance for production itself; it has a purpose only within the
school: it is to replace gymnastics, which our deep-rooted
revolutioniser wants to ignore altogether. He can therefore offer us
only a few phrases, as for example,

“young and old will work, in the serious sense of the word” {D. C. 328}.

This spineless and meaningless ranting is really pitiful when one
compares it with the passage in _Capital_, pages 508 to 515, in which
Marx develops the thesis that “from the Factory system budded, as Robert
Owen has shown us in detail, the germ of the education of the future, an
education that will, in the case of every child over a given age,
combine productive labour with instruction and gymnastics, not only as
one of the methods of adding to the efficiency of production, but as the
only method of producing fully developed human beings”.

We must skip the university of the future, in which the philosophy of
reality will be the kernel of all knowledge, and where, alongside the
Faculty of Medicine, the Faculty of Law will continue in full bloom; we
must also omit the “special training institutions”, about which all we
learn is that they will be only “for a few subjects”. Let us assume that
the young citizen of the future has passed all his educational courses
and has at last been “made to rely upon himself” sufficiently to be able
to look about for a wife. What is the course of events which Herr
Dühring offers him in this sphere?

“In view of the importance of propagation for the conservation,
elimination, blending, and even new creative development of qualities,
the ultimate roots of the human and unhuman must to a great extent be
sought in sexual union and selection, and furthermore in the care taken
for or against the ensuring of certain birth results. We must leave it
practically to a later epoch to judge the brutality and stupidity now
rife in this sphere. Nevertheless we must at least make clear from the
outset, even in spite of the weight of prejudice, that far more
important than the number of births is surely whether nature or human
circumspection succeeded or failed in regard to their quality. It is
true that at all times and under all legal systems monstrosities have
been destroyed; but there is a wide range of degrees between the normal
human being and deformities which lack all resemblance to the human
being... It is obviously an advantage to prevent the birth of a human
being who would only be a defective creature” {D. Ph. 246}.

Another passage runs:

“Philosophic thought can find no difficulty ... in comprehending the
right of the unborn world to the best possible composition... Conception
and, if need be, also birth offer the opportunity for preventive, or in
exceptional cases selective, care in this connection” {395-96}.

Again:

“Grecian art — the idealisation of man in marble — will not be able to
retain its historical importance when the less artistic, and therefore,
from the standpoint of the fate of the millions, far more important task
of perfecting the human form in flesh and blood is taken in hand. This
form of art does not merely deal with stone, and its aesthetics is not
concerned with the contemplation of dead forms” {256} — and so on.

Our budding citizen of the future is brought to earth again. Even
without Herr Dühring's help he certainly knew that marriage is not an
art which merely deals with stone, or even with the contemplation of
dead forms; but after all, Herr Dühring had promised him that he would
be able to strike out along all roads which the course of events and his
own nature opened to him, in order to discover a sympathetic female
heart together with the body belonging to it. Nothing of the kind — the
“deeper and stricter morality” {D. Ph. 396} thunders at him. The first
thing that he must do is to cast off the brutality and stupidity now
rife in the sphere of sexual union and selection, and bear in mind the
right of ‘the new-born world to the best possible composition‘. At this
solemn moment it is to him a matter of perfecting the human form in
flesh and blood, of becoming a Phidias, so to speak, in flesh and blood.
How is he to set about it? Herr Dühring’s mysterious utterances quoted
above give him not the slightest indication, although Herr Dühring
himself says it is an “art”. Has Herr Dühring perhaps “in his mind’s
eye, schematically”, a textbook also on this subject — of the kind of
which, in sealed wrappers, German bookshops are now so full? Indeed, we
are no longer in socialitarian society, but rather in the _Magic Flute_
^([128]) — the only difference being that Sarastro, the stout Masonic
priest, would hardly rank as a “priest of the second order” {460} in
comparison with our deeper and stricter moralist. The tests ~ to which
Sarastro put his couple of love’s adepts are mere child's play compared
with the terrifying examination through which Herr Dühring puts his two
sovereign individuals before he permits them to enter the state of “free
and ethical marriage” {296}. And so it may happen that our
“made-to-be-self-reliant” Tamino of the future may indeed have the
so-called absolute underfoot, but one of his feet may be a couple of
rungs short of what it should be, so that evil tongues call him a
club-foot. It is also within the realm of the possible that his
best-beloved Pamina of the future does not hold herself quite straight
on the above-said absolute, owing to a slight deviation in the direction
of her right shoulder which jealous tongues might even call a little
hump. What then? Will our deeper and stricter Sarastro forbid them to
practice the art of perfecting humanity, in flesh and blood; will he
exercise his “preventive care” at “conception”, or his “selective care”
at “birth” {396}? Ten to one, things will happen otherwise; the pair of
lovers will leave Sarastro-Dühring where he stands and go off to the
registry office.

Hold on there! Herr Dühring cries. This is not at all what was meant.
Give me a chance to explain!

If the “higher, genuinely human motives of wholesome sexual unions...
the humanly ennobled form of sexual excitement, which in its intense
manifestation is _passionate love_, when reciprocated is the best
guarantee of a union which will be acceptable also in its result... it
is only an effect of the second order that from a relation which in
itself is harmonious a symphoniously composed product should result.
From this in turn it follows that any compulsion must have harmful
effects” {247} — and so on.

And thus all ends the very best way in the best of all possible
socialitarian worlds: club-foot and hunchback love each other
passionately, and therefore in their reciprocal relation offer the best
guarantee for a harmonious “effect of the second order”; it is all just
like a novel — they love each other, they get each other, and all the
deeper and stricter morality {396} turns out as usual to be harmonious
twaddle.

Herr Dühring’s noble ideas about the female sex in general can be
gathered from the following indictment of existing society:

“In a society of oppression based on the sale of human being to human
being, prostitution is accepted as the natural complement of compulsory
marriage ties in the men's favour, and it is one of the most
comprehensible but also _most significant_ facts _that nothing of the
kind is possible for the women_” {291-92}.

I would not care, for anything in the world, to have the thanks which
might accrue to Herr Dühring from the women for this compliment. But has
Herr Dühring really never heard of the form of income known as a
petticoat-pension _{Schurzenstipendien}_, which is now no longer quite
an exceptional thing? Herr Dühring himself was once a referendary
^([129]) and he lives in Berlin, where even in my day, thirty-six years
ago, to say nothing of lieutenants _Referendarius_ was used often enough
to rhyme with _Schurzenstipendarius!_

* * *

May the reader permit us to take leave of our subject, which has often
been dry and gloomy enough, on a note of facetiousness and
reconciliation. So long as we had to deal with the separate issues
raised, our judgment was bound by the objective, incontrovertible facts,
and on the basis of these facts it was often enough necessarily sharp
and even hard. Now when philosophy, economics and socialitarian system
all lie behind us; when we have before us the picture of the author as a
whole, which we had previously to judge in detail — now human
considerations can come into the foreground; at this point we shall be
permitted to trace back to personal causes many otherwise
incomprehensible scientific errors and conceits, and to sum up our
verdict against Herr Dühring in the words: _mental incompetence due to
megalomania._



NOTES _FROM MARX-ENGELS COLLECTED WORKS_


1. _Anti-Dühring is_ the title under which Engels’ classic work _Herrn
Eugen Dühring’s Revolution in Science is_ widely known.

The attention of Marx and Engels was first drawn to Dühring when his
review of Volume One of _Capital_ was published in _Ergänzungsblätter_,
Vol. III, issue No. 3, in December 1867. They expressed a critical
attitude towards him in a number of letters of January to March 1868.

In the mid-1870s, Dühring exerted quite a significant influence on
German Social-Democrats. The second edition of _Kritische Geschichte der
Nationalökonomie und des Sozialismus_ (November 1875) and the
publication of _Cursus der Philosophie als Streng Wissenschaftlicher
Weltanschauung und Lebensgestaltung_ (the last issue appeared in
February 1875) made his views more popular. His most active followers
were Johann Most, Friedrich Wilhelm Fritzsche and Eduard Bernstein. Even
August Bebel came under the influence of Dühring's views for a short
time. In March 1874, two of Bebel's articles about Dühring published
anonymously under the title “Ein neuer ‘Communist’” in the _Volksstaat_,
the central organ of the Social-Democratic Workers’ Party (Eisenachers),
aroused sharp protest on the part of Marx and Engels.

The spread of Dühring's views made Liebknecht, on February 1 and April
21, 1875, propose to Engels that they be criticised in the _Volksstaat._

Engels criticised Dühring for the first time in February 1876, in an
article “Prussian Vodka in the German Reichstag”, published in
_Volksstaat_ (see present edition, Vol. 24). Later, in his letter to
Marx of May 24, 1876, he writes of the need to initiate a campaign
against the spread of Dühring’s views in Germany. Replying on May 25,
Marx supported Engels’ idea and suggested that, first of all, Dühring
himself be sharply criticised (see present edition, Vol. 45). Engels
broke off his work on _Dialectics of Nature_, and by May 28 informed
Marx of the general plan and character of the proposed work.

Engels worked on _Anti-Dühring_ for two years — from late May 1876 to
early July 1878. Part I of the book was written mainly between September
1876 and January 1877. It was published as a series of articles entitled
_Herrn Eugen Dühring’s Umwälzung der Philosophie_ in _Vorwärts_ in
January-May 1877 (Nos. 1-7, 10 and 11, January 3, 5, 7, 10, 12, 14, 17,
24 and 26; Nos. 17, 24 and 25, February 9, 25 and 28; Nos. 36 and 37,
March 25 and 28; Nos. 44, 45, 49 and 50, April 15, 18, 27 and 29; Nos.
55 and 56, May 11 and 13). Later, beginning in 1878, with the first
separate edition, the first two chapters of this part were made into an
independent general introduction to all three parts.

Part II of the book was written mainly between June and August 1877. The
last,_x_ chapter of this part was written by Marx (see this volume, pp.
9, 15). In addition, in his letters to Engels of March 7 and August 8,
1877, Marx explained a number of economic problems, especially those
connected with Quesnay's _Tabkau économique_, which was difficult to
understand. Engels also read the whole manuscript of _Anti-Dühring_ to
Marx before sending it to the printers.

Part II was published under the title _Herrn Eugen Dühring's Umwälzung
der politischen Oekonomie_ in _Wissenschaftliche Beilage_ and in the
supplement to _Vorwärts_ from July to December 1877 (No. 87, July 27;
Nos. 93 and 96, August 10 and 17; Nos. 105 and 108, September 7 and 14;
No. 127, October 28; Nos. 130 and 139, November 4 and 28; No. 152,
December 30).

Part III of the book was written mainly between August 1877 and April
1878. It was published as _Herrn Eugen Dühring's Umwälzung des
Sozialismus_ in the supplement to _Vorwärts_ in May to July 1878 (Nos.
52 and 61, May 5 and 26; Nos. 64 and 75, June 2 and 28; No. 79, July 7).

The publication of _Anti-Dühring_ in _Vorwärts_ aroused strong
resistance on the part of Dühring’s followers. At the next congress of
the Socialist Workers' Party of Germany, in Gotha from May 27 to 29,
1877, they attempted to ban the publication of this work in the Party's
central organ. It was due to them that _Anti-Dühring_ was being printed
at lengthy intervals.

In July 1877, Part I of Engels’ work was published in Leipzig as a
separate pamphlet: _Herrn Eugen Dühring's Umwälzung der Wissenschaft. 1.
Philosophie._ In July 1878, Parts 11 and III were also published as a
separate pamphlet: _Herrn Eugen Dühring's Umwälzung der Wissenschaft.
11. Politische Oekonomie. Sozialismus._

The entire work was first published in book form in Leipzig on about
July 8, 1878, with a preface by Engels: F. Engels, _Herrn Eugen
Dühring’s Umwälzung der Wissenschaft. Philosophie. Politische Oekonomie.
Sozialismus._ Its title is an ironical paraphrase of the title of
Dühring's work _Carey's Umwälzung der Volkswirtschaftslehre und
Socialwissenschaft._ At the end of October 1878, after the
Anti-Socialist Law had been put into force in Germany, _Anti-Dühring_
was banned along with Engels’ other works. Its second edition appeared
in Zurich, in 1886. The third, revised and supplemented edition was
published in Stuttgart, in 1894, i.e., after the Anti-Socialist Law was
repealed (1890). This was the last edition during Engels’ lifetime. The
second and third editions bore the same title. but the subtitle
_Philosophie. Politische Oekonomie. Sozialismus_ was omitted.

In 1880, at Paul Lafargue's request, Engels used three chapters of
_Anti-Dühring_ (Chapter I of the Introduction and chapters I and 11 of
Part III) to provide a separate popular pamphlet, first published under
the title _Socialism Utopian and Scientific_, and later as _The
Development of Socialism from Utopia to Science_ (see present edition,
Vol. 24).

_Anti-Dühring_ was published in English for the first time in 1907, in
Chicago as F. Engels, _Landmarks of Scientific Socialism. Anti-Dühring._
Translated and edited by Austin Lewis. This work has been repeatedly
reprinted.

2. At the congress held in Gotha from May 22 to 27, 1875, the two trends
in the German working-class movement — the Social-Democratic Workers'
Party (Eisenachers), headed by August Bebel and Wilhelm Liebknecht, and
the Lassallean General Association of German Workers — united into the
Socialist Workers' Party of Germany.

3. The reference is in particular to August Bebel's article "Ein neuer
'Communist'", printed anonymously in the _Volksstaat_ on March 13 and
20, 1874 with a favourable review of Dühring's book _Cursus der
National- und Sozialökonomie_, _einschlieslich der Hauptpunkte der
Finanzpolitik_ and describing Dühring as a supporter of scientific
socialism.

4. The reference is to lectures given to the Berlin workers on the
solution of social problems, in July 1876 by Most, who popularised
Dühring's views. These lectures came out as a separate pamphlet in 1876
in Berlin: J. Most, _Die Lösung der socialen Frage._ Dühring's views
were also actively disseminated by the Social-Democratic newspaper
_Berliner Freie Presse._

5. This refers to the protest lodged by Most with the editors of the
_Volksstaat_, who did not print his article praising Dühring and
Fritzsche's speech at the regular congress of the Socialist Workers'
Party of Germany in August 1876, demanding that the Party's central
organ _Volksstaat_ disseminate Dühring's ideas.

6. The Sixth World Industrial Fair opened in Philadelphia on May 10,
1876 in connection with the centenary of the founding of the USA (July
4, 1776). Reuleaux, director of the Berlin Industrial Academy appointed
by the German Government as chairman of the German panel of judges, had
to admit that German-made goods were far inferior to those of other
countries and that German industry's guiding principle was "cheap and
nasty". This statement evoked wide comment in the press. From July to
September, the _Volksstaat_, for instance, published a series of
articles on this scandalous fact.

7. The phrase "really never learnt a word", which gained wide currency,
is to be found in a letter by the French Admiral de Panat. It is
sometimes ascribed to Talleyrand. It was made with reference to the
royalists, who proved incapable of drawing any lessons from the French
Revolution of the late 18th century.

8. The _Anti-Socialist Law_ was passed by the German Reichstag on
October 21, 1878, to counter the socialist and working-class movement.
Extended in 1881, 1884, 1886, 1888, it banned all party organisations,
mass workers' organisations and the socialist and labour press;
Social-Democrats were subjected to reprisals. The Social-Democratic
Party, with the help of Marx and Engels, managed, however, to overcome
the opportunist (Hochberg, Bernstein and others) and "ultra-Left" (Most
and others) tendencies in its ranks and, while the law was in force,
correctly combined legal and illegal work to strengthen and extend its
influence considerably among the masses. The law was abrogated on
October 1, 1890. Engels assesses it in the article "Bismarck and the
German Working Men's Party" for _The Labour Standard_.

9. The _Holy Alliance_ — an association of European monarchs, founded in
1815 by Tsarist Russia, Austria and Prussia, to suppress revolutionary
movements and preserve feudal monarchies in European countries.

10. This manuscript, to which Marx himself gave the title _Randnoten zu
Dührings Kritische Geschichte der National ökonomie_, was written before
March 5, 1877 and then sent to Engels. It was first published by the
Institute of Marxism-Leninism, CC CPSU in: _Marx / Engels
Gesamiausgabe_, F. Engels, _Herrn Eugen Dühring's Umwälzung der
Wissenschaft/Dialektik der Natur._ Sonderausgabe, Moscow-Leningrad,
1935, pp. 341-71.

11. Dühring attempted to refute some of Engels' criticisms in the book:
Dühring, _Kritische Geschichte der Nationalökonomie und des
Sozialismus_, Dritte, theilweise umgearbeitete Auflage, Leipzig, 1879,
pp. 566-67.

12. In July 1877, Dühring was deprived of the right to lecture at Berlin
University for his sharp criticism of university practices. His
dismissal sparked off a vociferous protest campaign by his supporters
and was condemned by broad democratic circles.

13. Initially, the French translation was made by Lafargue, and
published under the title _Socialisme utopique et socialisme
scientifique_ in the journal _Revue socialiste_, Nos. 3-5, March-May
1880. p. 10

14. The Russian translation was first published, as _Scientific
Socialism_, in the illegal journal _Students_, No. 1, of December 1882,
a separate pamphlet _The Development of Scientific Socialism_ was put
out by the Emancipation of Labour group in Geneva, in 1884.

15. Engels left his Manchester business on July 1, 1869 and moved to
London on September 20, 1870.

16. In the introduction to his fundamental work on agrochemistry, Justus
Liebig speaks of the evolution of his scientific views and notes:
"Chemistry is moving forward at an incredible speed, and the chemists
wishing to keep up with it are in a state of constant moulting. One
sheds one's old feathers, no longer suitable for flight, but new ones
grow in their stead and one flies all the better." See 1. Liebig, _Die
Chemie in ibrer Anwendung auf Agricultur und Physiologiz_, 7. Aufl.,
Braunschweig, 1862, Th. I, p. 26.

17. This refers to the letter written by the German Social-Democrat
Heinrich Wilhelm Fabian to Marx on November 6, 1880 (Engels described
Fabian in his letters to Kautsky of April 11, 1884, to Bernstein of
September 13, 1884, and to Sorge of June 3, 1885. See _MECW_, Vol. 47).

18. Marx's 1,000-odd sheets of mathematical manuscripts were written
mainly in the 1860s, 1870s and early 1880s. The most complete texts of
these manuscripts and the abstracts and excerpts of Marx's own notes
were first published by the Institute of Marxism-Leninism in the
language of the original and translated into Russian in _K. Marx_,
_Mathematical Manuscripts_, Moscow, 1968.

19. A reference to the works of the Irish physicist Thomas Andrews
(1869), the French physicist Louis Paul Cailletet and the Swiss
physicist Raoul Pierre Pictet (1877).

20. According to the theory expounded by Rudolf Virchow in _Die
Cellularpathologie_, first published in 1858, the individual animal
breaks up into tissue, the tissue into cell-states, and the cell-states
into cells, so that, in the final analysis, the individual animal is a
mechanical sum of separate cells.

Speaking of the "progressive" nature of this theory, Engels alludes to
Virchow's membership of the German bourgeois Party of Progress,
organised in June 1861. p. I}

21. This refers to Rousseau's theory of equality (see this volume, p.
129) expounded in his _Discours sur l'origine et les fondemens de
l'inégalité parmi les hommes_, Amsterdam, 1755, and _Du contrat social;
ou_, _Principes du droit politique_, Amsterdam, 1762.

22. The _Reformation_ (16th century) — a broad socio-political and
ideological movement of a complex social content and composition. It
assumed a religious form of struggle against the Catholic doctrine and
Church and was basically anti-feudal in character; it spread over most
of Western and Central Europe.

The _Peasant War of 1524-26_ — the biggest insurrection of German
peasants (supported by townspeople) against the feudal yoke in
South-western and Middle Germany.

The _Levelers_ — the "true Levellers" or "Diggers" — representatives of
the ultra-Left trend during the English bourgeois revolution of the
mid-17th century, consisting of the poorest sections of the population,
suffering from feudal and capitalist exploitation in town and
countryside.

23. Engels has in mind, first of all, the works of Thomas More _(Utopia_
published in 1516) and Tommaso Campanella _(City of the Sun_, published
in 1623).

24. Denis Diderot's discourse _Le neveu de Rameau_ was written in about
1762 and subsequently revised twice by the author. It was first
published, in Goethe's German translation, in Leipzig in 1805; in French
in _Oeuveres inédites de Diderot_, Paris, 1821, put out, in fact, in
1823.

25. The _Alexandrian period_ (the Alexandrian culture, the Alexandrian
age) derives its name from the Egyptian city of Alexandria, which was a
major centre of Hellenic culture. Alexandria, to which city thousands of
Greeks moved in the 3rd century B.C., witnessed a rapid advance of
mathematics, mechanics (Euclid, Archimedes), geography, astronomy,
physiology and other sciences.

26. Laplace's hypothesis of the origin of the solar system was first
expounded in the last chapter of his treatise _Exposition du systéme du
monde_, T. I-II, Paris, 4th year of the French Republic {1796}. In the
last, sixth edition of this book, prepared during Laplace's lifetime and
published posthumously, in 1835, the hypothesis is expounded in the
last, seventh note.

The existence of incandescent masses of gas was proved in 1864 by the
English astronomer William Huggins, who made widespread use of the
method of spectral analysis (evolved in 1859 by Gustav Kirchhoff and
Robert Bunsen) in astronomy. Here Engels used A. Secchi's _Die Sonne_,
Braunschweig, 1872, pp. 787, 789-90.

27. In the first German edition of _Die Entwicklung des Sozialismus von
der Utopie zur Wissenschaft_ (1882), Engels introduced fundamental
specification, which was repeated in the authorised English edition
(1892). He formulated the given proposition in the following words:
"..._all_ past history, with the exception of its primitive stages, was
the history of class struggles..."

28. Dühring's works, quoted by Engels, are referred to in brackets in
abbreviated form in the following way:

D.Ph. stands for: Dühring, _Cursus der Philosophie_, Leipzig, 1875

D.K.G. stands for: Dühring, _Kritische Geschichte der Nationalökonomie
und des Sozialismus_, 2. Aufl., Berlin, 1875;

D.C. stands for: Dühring, _Cursus der National- und Socialökonomie_, 2.
Aufl., Leipzig, 1876,

and the relevant pages.

29. _Phalansteries_ — the buildings in which, according to the French
utopian socialist Charles Fourier, the members of phalanges, ideal
harmonious communities, would live and work.

30. G. W. F. Hegel's _Encyclopädie der philosophischen Wissenschaften im
Grundrisse_, Heidelberg, 1817 consists of three parts: 1) logic, 2)
philosophy of nature, 3) philosophy of the mind.

In his work on _Anti-Dühring_ and _Dialectics of Nature_, Engels used
Hegel's writings primarily published after Hegel's death by his pupils
in: G. W. F. Hegel, _Werke. Vollständige Ausgabe durch einen Verein von
Freunden des Verewigten: Ph. Marheineke_, _J. Schulze_, _Ed. Gans_, _Lp.
v. Henning_, _H. Hotho_, _C. Michekt_, _F. Förster_, Bd. I-XVIII,
Berlin, 1832-1845.

31. Engels is presumably alluding to _Die Epiphanie der ewigen
Persönlichkeit des Christes_ (published in separate installments in
1844, 1847 and 1852), the work of the Hegelian philosopher K. L.
Michelet, who published the works of his teacher.

32. Engels made a note here, which he subsequently included in
_Dialectics of Nature_.

33. In the original, here and elsewhere, the term "Ideologie" is used,
as a rule, as a synonym for "idealism".

34. This is an allusion to the servile submissiveness of the Prussians,
who accepted the Constitution granted by King Frederick William IV on
December 5, 1848, when the Prussian Constituent Assembly was dissolved.
The Constitution drawn up with the participation of the Minister of the
Interior, Baron Manteuffel, was finally approved by Frederick William IV
on January 31, 1850, after numerous amendments had been introduced.

35. In Part I of _Anti-Dühring_, all page references made by Engels are
to Dühring's _Cursus der Philosophie._

36. Engels enumerates a number of major battles in European wars of the
nineteenth century.

The _battle of Austerlitz_ (now Slavkov in Czechoslovakia), December 2,
1805, in which Napoleon I defeated a combined Russo-Austrian army.

The _battle of Jena_, October 14, 1806, in which Napoleon I crushed the
Prussian army.

The _battle of Königgrätz_ (now Hradec Kralove), or of Sadowa, July 3,
1866, in Bohemia, in which Prussian forces defeated the army of Austria
and Saxony, thereby securing Prussia's victory over Austria in the war
of 1866.

The _battle of Sedan_, September 1-2, 1870, in which Prussian forces
defeated the French army under MacMahon and compelled it to surrender.
This was the decisive battle in the Franco-Prussian war of 1870-71.

37. A reference to the research carried out by the German mathematician
Karl Friedrich Gauss into non-Euclidean geometry.

37a. In the original a play on words: _Eslesbrücke_ (asses' bridge)
means in German also an unauthorised aid in study used by dull-headed or
lazy students; a crib or pony.

38. In 1886, in his _Ludwig Feuerbach and the End of Classical German
Philosophy_, Engels wrote the following on the Copernican system: "For
three hundred years the Copernican solar system was a hypothesis with a
hundred, a thousand or ten thousand chances to one in its favour, but
still always a hypothesis. But when Leverrier, by means of the data
provided by this system, not only deduced the necessity of the existence
of an unknown planet, but also calculated the position in the heavens
which this planet must necessarily occupy, and when Galle really found
this planet, the Copernican system was proved". The planet mentioned in
the quotation is Neptune, which was discovered in 1846 by Johann Galle
of the Berlin Observatory.

39. Engels made a note here, which he subsequently included in
_Dialectics of Nature_ (see MECW, volume 25, pp. 530-34).

40. _Protista_ (from the Greek _protistos_ — meaning first) are,
according to Haeckel's classification, a vast group of simple, both
unicellular and non-cellular, organisms.

_Monera_ (from the Greek _moneres_ — meaning single) are, according to
Haeckel, structureless masses of albumen, devoid of a nucleus but
performing all the essential vital functions: eating, locomotion,
reaction to irritation, multiplication.

The terms _protista_ and _monera_ were introduced by Haeckel in 1866 in
his book _Generelle Morphologie der Organismen._

41. The reference is to the Sumerian epic of Gilgamesh and the Accadian
version of the Deluge story discovered in 1872 by George Smith, the
English Assyriologist and archaeologist.

42. _Ring of the Nibelung_ — Richard Wagner's monumental tetralogy:
_Rheingold_, _Valkyrie_, _Siegfried_ and _Götterdämmerung._

Here Engels jokingly calls Dühring the "composer of the future",
referring to the term "composition" proposed by Dühring. Wagner's
adversaries had ironically called his music the "music of the future",
the occasion being Wagner's book _Das Kunstwerk der Zukunft_, Leipzig,
1850.

43. _Zoophytes_ — a name which, from the sixteenth century onwards,
designated a group of invertebrates (mainly sponges and coelenterata).
From the mid-nineteenth century, the term _zoophytes_ was used as a
synonym for coelenterata; it has now dropped out of use.

44. This classification was given in Huxley's _Lectures on the Elements
of Comparative Anatomy_, London, 1864, Lecture V. It provided the basis
for H. A. Nicholson's _Manual of Zoology_ (first published in 1870),
which Engels used in his work on _Anti-Dühring_ and _Dialectics of
Nature._

45. _Traube's artificial cells_ — inorganic formations representing a
model of living cells; they were created by the German chemist and
physiologist Moritz Traube by mixing colloidal solutions. He read a
paper on his experiments to the 47th Congress of German Naturalists and
Physicians in Breslau, on September 23 1874. Marx and Engels thought
highly of Traube's discovery (see Marx's letter to Pyotr Lavrov of June
18, 1875, and to Wilhelm Alexander Freund of January 21, 1877, _MECW_,
Vol. 45).

46. Here Engels relates a report in the journal _Nature_ of November 16,
1876 dealing with the paper read by Dmitry Mendeleyev on September 3,
1876 at the 5th Congress of Russian Naturalists and Physicians in
Warsaw. Mendeleyev reported on the results of his experiments, conducted
jointly with Jozef Jerzy Boguski in 1875-76, to verify the
Boyle-Mariotte law.

Engels evidently wrote this note when checking the proof of this chapter
of _Anti-Dühring_, which was printed in _Vorwärts_ on February 28, 1877.
Engels added the end of the note, given in parentheses, in 1885, when he
was preparing the second edition of _Anti-Dühring._

47. Rousseau's _Discours sur l'origine et les fondemens de l'inégalité
parmi les hommes_ was written in 1754 and published in 1755.

48. The _Thirty Years' War_ (1618-48) — an all-European war caused by
the struggle between Protestants and Catholics. Germany became the main
arena of this war, and consequently the object of military pillage and
the predatory claims of the belligerents.

49. This refers to Stirner's _Der Einzige und sein Eigenthum_, Leipzig,
1845; for criticism of it see _The German Ideology_ by Marx and Engels.

50. Engels' main source of data on these events was, evidently, the
American diplomat Eugene Schuyler's _Turkistan. Notes of a Journey in
Russian Turkistan_, _Khokand_, _Buthara_, _and Kuldja_, in two volumes,
Vol. II, London, 1876, pp. 356-59.

51. The _American Constitution of 1787_, officially proclaiming the USA
a federal republic, was the most progressive bourgeois constitution of
its time. Yet it virtually legalised slavery. Marx wrote on this: "The
Constitution ... recognises slaves as property and obliges the Union
government to protect this property" (see _MECW_, Vol. 19, p. 36).

52. Karl Marx, _Das Kapital_, Bd. 1, 2. Aufl., Hamburg, 1872, p. 36
(Part 1, Chapter 1, Section 3, A, 3: The Equivalent Form of Value).

In _Anti-Dühring_, Engels quotes from the 2nd German edition of Vol. I
of _Capital._ He used the 3rd German edition of _Capital_, Vol. I only
when he revised Part II, Chapter_X_ for the 3rd edition of
_Anti-Dühring._

53. Lassalle was arrested in February 1848 on a charge of inciting to
steal a cash-box with documents to be used in the divorce case of
Countess Sophie Hatzfeldt, whose lawyer he was from 1846 to 1854.
Lassalle's trial took place from August 5 to 11, 1848; he was acquitted
by a jury.

54. _Code pénal_ — the French Penal Code, adopted in 1810, which came
into force in France and French-conquered regions of Western and
South-western Germany in 1811; along with the Civil Code, it remained in
force in the Rhine Province after it had been annexed by Prussia in
1815.

55. _Code Napoléon_ — the French Civil Code was adopted in 1804. Engels
called it "a classical legal code of bourgeois society" in his _Ludwig
Feuerbach and the End of Classical German Philosophy_ (see _MECW_, Vol.
26).

Here Engels is speaking of it in the broad sense, having in mind the
five codes adopted under Napoleon from 1804 to 1810: civil,
civil-procedure, trade, criminal and criminal-procedure.

56. In _Ethica ordine geometrico demonstrata et in quinque parses
distincta_ (first published in Amsterdam in 1677), Part 1, Addendum,
Spinoza said that ignorance is no argument, in opposition to the
clerical-teleological view that everything is determined by "divine
Providence" as the final cause and that the only means of argumentation
is the plea of ignorance of other causes.

57. _Corpus juris civilis_ — code of civil laws regulating property
relations in Roman slave-owning society; it was drawn up from 528 to 534
under the Byzantine Emperor Justinian. In _Ludwig Feuerbach and the End
of Classical German Philosophy_, Engels described it as the "first world
law of a commodity-producing society" (see _MECW_, Vol. 26).

58. The law on the compulsory civil registration of births, marriages
and deaths was passed in Prussia on October 1, 1874 and a similar one
for the whole German Empire on February 6, 1875. The law deprived the
Church of the right to such registration, thereby considerably
curtailing its influence and income. It was directed primarily against
the Catholic Church.

59. The reference is to the provinces of Brandenburg, East Prussia, West
Prussia, Posen, Pomerania and Silesia, which were part of the Kingdom of
Prussia until the Vienna Congress of 1815.

60 ._Personal equation_ — a correction made for variation in
astronomical observation due to a person's individual peculiarities.

61. Dühring drew these data on the structure of Marx's _Capital_ from
the Preface to the first German edition (see present edition, Vol. 35).
From 1867 onwards, when Vol. I of _Capital_ was published, Marx's plan
was to have the entire work brought out in three volumes in four books,
the 2nd and the 3rd of which were to comprise Vol. II. After Marx's
death, Engels published the 2nd and 3rd books as vols. II and III. The
last, fourth book, _Theories of Surplus-Value_, was published after
Engels' death.

62. Chapter XXIV of Vol. I of _Capital — "The_ So-called Primitive
Accumulation" — takes up pp. 742-93 of the 1872 German edition. The
last, seventh paragraph of this chapter — "Historical Tendency of
Capitalist Accumulation" — begins on p. 791 of that edition.

63. The reference is to Rousseau's _Discours sur l'origine et les
fondemens de l'inégalité' parmi les hommes_, written in 1754. Below,
Engels quotes the second part of this work (1755 edition, pp. 116, 118,
146, 175-76 and 176-77).

64. The expression _determinatio est negatio is_ to be found in
Spinoza's letter to Jarigh Jelles of June 2, 1674 (see B. Spinoza,
_Epistolae doctorum quorundam virorum ad B. de Spinoza et auctoris
responsiones ..._, Letter 50), where it is used in the sense of
"determination is a negation". The expression _omnis determinatio est
negatio_ and its interpretation as "every determination is a negation"
are to be found in Hegel's works, from which they have become widely
known (see G. W. F. Hegel, _Encyclopadie der philosophischen
Wissenschaften_, Erster Teil, § 91, Zusatz _Die Wissenschaft der Logik_,
Erstes Buch, Erster Abschnitt, Zweites Kapitei: "b. Qualitat";
_Vorlesungen uber die Geschichte dkr Philosophie_, Erster Teil, Erster
Abschnitt, Erstes Kapitel, Paragraph uber Parmenides).

65. Engels has in mind, above all, Marx's works _The Poverty of
Philosophy_ (1847), _A Contribution to the Critique of Political
Economy_ (1859) and Vol. I of _Capital_ (1867). Marx carried out a
thorough study of pre-capitalist forms of production in his _Economic
Manuscripts of 1857-58_ (first version of _Capital_).

66. In Part II, except Chapter X, of _Anti-Dühring_, Engels quotes from
the second (1876) edition of Dühring's _Cursus der National- und
Socialökonomie._

67. _Reptiles_ — a nickname widespread in Germany in the 1870s for
journalists subsidised by the government. This expression, but in a
different sense, was used by Bismarck on January 30, 1869, in the
Prussian Chamber of Deputies, this time with reference to the
government's adversaries.

68. Engels is referring to the July _Revolution of 1830_ in France,
which brought big bankers and industrialists to power; from this time
on, as a result of the final victory of the bourgeoisie over the
nobility, the struggle between the proletariat and the bourgeoisie came
to the fore.

69. The _Restoration_ — the second rule of the Bourbon dynasty in France
(1814-15, 1815-30), overthrown by the Revolution at the end of the 18th
century. It was brought to an end by the July Revolution of 1830.

70. Engels took these facts from W. Wachsmuth's _Hellinische
Alterthumskunde aus dem Gesichtspunkte des Staates_, Th. II, Abth. I,
Halle, 1829.

The source for the number of slaves in Corinth and Aegina during the
Greco-Persian wars (5th cent. B.C.), is _Banquet of Sophists_, Book VI,
by the ancient Greek writer Athenaeus.

71. This refers to absolute monarchy (absolutism) — a form of state in
the last period of the existence of feudalism.

72. The reference is to the guns produced by Krupps, the biggest German
steel firm, and rifles designed and produced by the German engineers and
entrepreneurs, the Mauser brothers.

73. Engels means the protracted economic crisis of 1873-79 in German
industry, in spite of the seizure of Alsace and East Lorraine and the
5,000 million francs of war indemnities that France paid to Germany
under the terms of the Frankfurt peace treaty (1871), after her defeat
in the Franco-Prussian war of 1870-71.

74. The War of Independence in North America (1775-83) was the first
bourgeois revolution on the American continent.

75. A reference to the bourgeois-democratic revolution in France at the
end of the 18th century.

76. The Prussian _Landwehr system_ provided for the formation of army
units from among people of the older age groups who were liable to
military service and had served in the regular army and been in the
reserve for the established period. The _Landwehr_ first appeared in
Prussia in 1813-14 as a people's militia to combat Napoleon.

77. The reference is to the Austro-Prussian war of 1866.

78. In the _battle of Saint-Privat_, or of _Cravelotte_, August 18,
1870, the German troops defeated the French Rhenish army at the cost of
enormous losses.

79. The _Crimean war_ (1853-56) between Russia and a coalition of
Britain, France, Turkey and Sardinia, broke out as a result of a clash
of their economic and political interests in the Middle East.

80. The reference is to the guns produced by Krupps, the biggest German
steel firm, and rifles designed and produced by the German engineers and
entrepreneurs, the Mauser brothers.

81. The phrase in parentheses was added by Engels in the third edition
of _Anti-Dühring_.

82. Dühring called his "dialectics" "natural dialectics" to distinguish
it from Hegel's "unnatural" dialectics. See E. Dühring, _Naturliche
Dialektik. Neue logische Grundlegungen der Wissenschaft und
Philosophie_, Berlin, 1865, p. 13.

83. Dealing with a common subject, the works of Georg Ludwig Maurer (12
volumes) study the agrarian, urban and state system of mediaeval
Germany. These works are: _Einleitung zur Geschichte der Mark-_, _Hof-_,
_Dorf- und Stadt Verfassung und der öffentlichen Gewalt_, Munchen, 1854;
_Geschichte der Markenverfassung in Deutschland_, Erlangen, 1856;
_Geschichte der Fronhöfe_, _der Bauernhöfe und der Hofverfassung in
Deutschland_, Bd. I-IV, Erlangen, 1862-63; _Geschichte der
Dorfverfassung in Deutschland_, Bd. 1-11, Erlangen, 1865-66; _Geschichte
der Städteverfassung in Deutschechland_ Bd. I-IV, Erlangen, 1869-71. The
first, second and fourth of these works are devoted to a study of the
German mark system.

84. Engels ironically changes the title of Heinrich LXXII — one of the
two influential Reuss princes of the Younger branch
(Reuss-Lobenstein-Ebersdorf). Greiz — capital of the Reuss principality
(Elder branch, Reuss-Greiz). Schleiz — a domain of the Reuss princes
(Younger branch, Reuss-Schleiz) — was not a possession of Heinrich
LXXII.

85. This is an expression from Frederick William IV's New Year message
(January 1, 1849) to the Prussian Army. For a critical assessment of
this message see Marx's article "A New-Year Greeting" (_MECW_, Vol. 8,
pp. 222-26).

86. The reference is to the laws on maximum prices adopted by the
revolutionary government during the War of Independence in North America
and the National Convention during the French Revolution.

87. A detailed criticism of the Lassallean slogan of "full" or unlimited
"proceeds of labour" is given in Section 1 of Marx's _Critique of the
Gotha Programme_.

88. Marx intended to include the third book in Vol. II of _Capital_.

89. According to a Biblical story, when Jericho was besieged by the
Israelites under Joshua, its impregnable walls came tumbling down at the
sound of holy trumpets and the shouts of the besiegers (Joshua 6: 1-4,
9, 19).

90. This is an allusion to King Frederick Wilhelm IV's speech from the
throne at the opening of the United Diet in Prussia on April 11, 1847,
in which he stated that he would never allow "the natural relations
between the monarch and the people" to be turned into "conventional,
constitutional ones" and "the used up sheet of paper" take the place of
"primordial holy loyalty".

91. Engels enumerates a number of major battles in European wars of the
nineteenth century.

The _battle of Austerlitz_ (now Slavkov in Czechoslovakia), December 2,
1805, ; in which Napoleon I defeated a combined Russo-Austrian army.

The _battle of Jena_, October 14, 1806, in which Napoleon I crushed the
Prussian army.

The _battle of Königgrätz_ (now Hradec Kralove), or of Sadowa, July 3,
1866, in Bohemia, in which Prussian forces defeated the army of Austria
and Saxony, thereby securing Prussia's victory over Austria in the war
of 1866.

The _battle of Sedan_, September 1-2, 1870, in which Prussian forces
defeated -the French army under MacMahon and compelled it to surrender.
This was the decisive battle in the Franco-Prussian war of 1870-71.

92. This chapter, based on Marx's manuscript of 1877 was evidently
edited by Engels in the second half of May 1894, while he was preparing
the third German edition of _Anti-Dühring._ That is why this chapter
contains a reference to the third German edition of Marx's _Capital_
(1883). Engels restored Marx's original text as fully as possible. The
main object of Marx's criticism here was the second edition of Dühring's
_Kritische Geschichte der Nationalökonomie und des Sozialismus_, in
which the author attempted to describe the history of political economy
and in which Marx's teaching was the object of his libellous attacks.

93. _Mercantilism_ — a school of bourgeois political economy, that
emerged in the last third of the fifteenth century; it expressed the
interests of the merchant bourgeoisie in the age of the primitive
accumulation of capital, identified the wealth of the country with the
accumulation of money and attached primary importance in this to the
state. Marx called the early period of mercantilism the monetary system
(see _MECW_, Vol. 36).

94. William Petty's _Quantulumcunque concerning Money_ was written in
1682 in the form of an address to Lord Halifax and published in London
in 1695. Marx used the 1760 edition.

Petty's _The Political Anatomy of Ireland_ was written in 1672 and
published in London in 1691.

95. The reference here is to the French chemist A. L. Lavoisier's "De la
richesse territoriale du royaume de France" and "Essai sur la population
de la ville de Paris, sur la richesse et ses consommations", as well as
the joint work "Essai d'arithmétique politique", written by Lavoisier
and the French mathematician Lagrange published in _Mélanges d'économie
politique. Précédés de notices historiques sur chaque auteur_, _et
accompagnés de commentaires et de notes explicatives_, _par MM E. Daire
et G. de Molinari_, Vol. 1, Paris, 1847, pp. 575-620.

96. Engels is referring here to the attempt by John Law, a Scottish
economist, to put paper money into circulation in France, where his idea
received support in court quarters. In 1716 he founded a private bank,
the Banque generale which, in 1718, was reorganised into the state
Banque royale. The unlimited issue of bank-notes by Law's bank was
accompanied by the withdrawal of coins from circulation. As a result,
Stock Exchange speculation reached an unprecedented scale and
culminated, in 1720, in the bankruptcy of the bank and of the Law system
itself.

97. An inaccuracy in the text: the first edition of Richard Cantillon's
_Essai sur la nature du commerce en général_ appeared not in 1752, but
in 1755, as Marx himself pointed out in _Capital_, Vol. I (Part VI,
Chapter XXI). Adam Smith mentions Cantillon's work in Volume I of his
_An Inquiry into the Nature and Causes of the Wealth of Nations_,
Chapter VIII, Of the Wages of Labour.

98. In 1866, acting through his adviser Hermann Wagener, Bismarck
requested Dühring to draw up a memorandum for the Prussian government on
the labour question. Dühring, who advocated harmony between capital and
labour, complied with this request. His work was published, however,
without his knowledge, first anonymously, and later under the signature
of Wagener. This gave Dühring grounds for initiating proceedings against
Wagener on a charge of breaking copyright laws. In 1868, Dühring won his
case. At the height of this scandalous trial, Dühring published _Die
Schicksale meiner socialen Denkschrift für das Preussische
Staatsministerium_.

99. _Livre tournois_ — a French coin named after the town of Tour; from
1740 onwards it was equal to one franc; in 1799, it was replaced by the
franc.

100. Engels is referring to the beginning of Chapter I of the
"Introduction". He wrote this footnote when _Anti-Dühring_ was published
in the newspaper. It remained unchanged in all editions of the book
published during Engels' lifetime. In all subsequent separate editions,
the first two chapters were joined together under the heading
"Introduction". The numbers of the other chapters were not changed, so
"Philosophy" now begins with Chapter III.

101. The _Reign of Terror_ — the period of Jacobin
revolutionary-democratic dictatorship (June 1793-July 1794), which
relied on the revolutionary bloc of the urban petty and middle
bourgeoisie, the majority of the peasants and plebeians.

The _Directorate_ — the organ of executive power in France (from
November 1795), formed under the 1795 Constitution. Existing until the
Napoleon's _coup d'état_ of November 9 (18 Brumaire), 1799 it upheld the
interests of big bourgeoisie and brutally suppressed the revolutionary
actions of the popular masses.

In 1804, Bonaparte, who actually became the head of the state under the
Consulate after 18 Brumaire, was proclaimed Emperor of the French.

102. A reference to the slogan "Liberty, Equality, Fraternity" current
during the French Revolution.

103. Saint-Simon's first work, _Lettres d'un habitant de Genève à ses
contemporains_ was written in Geneva in 1802 and published anonymously
in Paris in 1803, without the place and date of publication being
indicated. When working on _Anti-Dühring_, Engels made use of: G.
Hubbard, _Saint-Simon. Sa vie et ses travaux. Suivi de fragments des
plus célèbres écrits de Saint-Simon_, Paris, 1857. This edition contains
inaccuracies regarding the publication dates of various works by
Saint-Simon.

The first most important work of Charles Fourier was _Théorie des quatre
mouvements et des destinées générales_, written in the early nineteenth
century and published anonymously in Lyons in 1808 (the title page gives
Leipzig as the place of publication).

104. The allied armies of the sixth anti-French coalition (Russia,
Austria, Britain, Prussia and other countries) entered Paris on March
31, 1814. Napoleon's empire fell and Napoleon himself, after abdicating,
was banished to the Island of Elba. The Bourbon monarchy was restored in
France for the first time (1814-15).

105. The _Hundred Days_ — the period of brief restoration of the
Napoleonic Empire — from the day of Napoleon's return from exile on Elba
to Paris on March 20, 1815, until his second abdication on June 22 of
the same year, after his army's defeat at Waterloo on June 18, 1815 by
Anglo-Dutch forces under Wellington and by the Prussian army under
Blücher.

106. After Dühring had been deprived of the right to lecture at Berlin
University for criticising university practices and attacking such
prominent scientists as Helmholtz, Virchow and others, a just campaign,
in the columns of the Social-Democratic press included, grew into an
unrestrained apologia for Dühring, owing to the efforts of his
supporters. This is what Engels is hinting at. Dühring's attacks on the
German Social-Democrats in reactionary newspapers, in the autumn of the
same year led, however, to a fall in his authority and influence not
only among socialists, but also among people of progressive views in
general.

107. This idea had been enunciated in Charles Fourier's first book —
_Théorie des quatre mouvements_ — which contains the following general
thesis: "Social progress and changes of a period are accompanied by the
progress of women towards freedom, while the decay of the social system
brings with it a reduction of the freedoms enjoyed by women." Fourier
concludes: "Extension of the rights of women is the basic principle of
all social progress" (Fourier, _Oeuvres complètes_, t. I, Paris, 1841,
pp. 195-96). p. 248

108. In a note to the relevant passage in _Socialism Utopian and
Scientific_, Engels gives the source of the last three quotations: R.
Owen, _The Revolution in the Mind and Practice of the Human Race; or_,
_the Coming Change from Irrationality to Rationality_, London, 1849, pp.
21, 22. The facts from Owen's biography mentioned above are from the
same source.

109. The Bill moved on Owen's initiative in June 1815, was passed by
Parliament only in July 1819, having been greatly curtailed. The Act
regulating labour in cotton mills banned the employment of children
under the age of nine, limited the working day to 12 hours for young
people under 18 and established for all workers two breaks, one for
breakfast and the other for lunch. with a total duration of one and a
half hours.

110. A Congress of Co-operative Societies and Trades Unions, presided
over by Owen, was held in London in October 1833. This Congress formally
founded the Grand National Consolidated Trades Union, the Charter of
which was adopted in February 1834. It was Owen's intention that this
Union would take over the management of production and remake society
peacefully. This utopian plan collapsed very soon. In the face of strong
opposition from employers and the state, the Union ceased to exist in
1834.

111. _Equitable Labour Exchange Bazaars_ were founded by workers'
co-operatives in various towns of England; the first of these bazaars
was founded by Owen in London in September 1832 and existed until
mid-1834.

112. The reference is to Proudhon's idea of organising an exchange bank,
first put forward in his pamphlet _Organisation du Crédit et de la
Circulation et Solution du problème sociale_, which was published in
early April 1848. This idea was developed in detail in his other works.
Proudhon's main idea was to replace gold and silver as a means of
circulation, with bank-notes, which were, in fact, impersonal bills.
These bank-notes of the exchange bank were secured by products of labour
and, in this, according to Proudhon, lay their principal difference from
other paper money issued by banks and secured by precious metals, landed
property, etc.

To put this idea into practice, the Banque du peuple was founded in
Paris on January 31, 1849. It went bankrupt, however, and closed in
early April 1849.

113. _Harmon_y _Hall_ — the name of the communist community founded by
English utopian socialists, led by Owen, at the close of 1839 in
Queenwood, Hampshire, England. It existed until 1845.

114. In _Socialism Utopian and Scientific_, Engels gives a note
referring to his work _The Mark_ (see _MECW_, Vol. 24).

115. This refers to the wars between the major European powers in the
seventeenth and eighteenth centuries for control of trade with India and
America and for seizure of colonial markets. The principal rivals were
initially England and Holland, later England and France. England won
these wars and, towards the close of the eighteenth century, almost all
world trade was concentrated in her hands.

116. The reference is to the Prussian Royal Maritime Company, which was
founded as a commercial and banking company in 1772 and granted a number
of important privileges by the state. It advanced big loans to the
government and, in fact, became its banker and broker.

117. The slogan _"a free people's state" — is_ criticised in section IV
of Marx's _Critique of the Gotha Programme_, Engels' letter to August
Bebel of March 18-28, 1875, and Lenin's _The State and Revolution_,
Chapter 1, Paragraph 4, and Chapter IV, Paragraph 3 _(Collected Works_
Vol. 25, pp. 395-401 and 439-42).

118. These figures are from Robert Giffen's paper "Recent Accumulations
of Capital in the United Kingdom", read at the Statistical Society on
January 15, 1878 and printed in the London _Journal of the Statistical
Society_ in March 1878.

119. Speaking about the "German Empire of the Prussian nation", Engels
underlines, on the one hand, that the country's unification under
Prussian supremacy was completed by Bismarck on a militaristic basis
and, on the other, alludes to the name "the Holy Roman Empire of the
German nation" which, from the end of the fifteenth century until its
formal liquidation in 1806, was part of the archaic state formation, the
mediaeval feudal empire, founded in 962 by the German king Otto I and
embracing the territory of Germany and several other Central European
states. The empire was a precarious unity of feudal principalities and
free towns recognising the supreme power of an emperor.

120. Engels had in mind a speech delivered by Bismarck in the Lower
Chamber of the Prussian Landtag on March 20, 1852, stating that, if
there were another upsurge of the revolutionary movement, large towns,
as centres of the revolutionary movement, ought to be wiped out from the
face of the earth.

121. The ledger _(Kommerzbuch)_ is described by Wilhelm Weitling in
_Garantien der Harmonie und Freiheit_, Section II, Ch. 10, Vivis, 1842.
According to Weitling's utopian plan, in the future society, every
able-bodied person would have to work a certain number of hours a day
and, in return, would receive the necessary means of subsistence. Every
person would have the right to work several "commercial hours" over and
above this time and, in return, to receive luxury items, different
entertainments, theatre and concert tickets, etc. These additional
working hours and the products received for them would be recorded in a
ledger.

122. _Non olet_ (it {money} does not stink): these words were spoken by
the Roman Emperor Vespasian (69-79 A.D.) in reply to his son, who
reproached him for introducing a tax on lavatories.

123. _Equitable Labour Exchange Bazaars_ were founded by workers'
co-operatives in various towns of England; the first of these bazaars
was founded by Owen in London in September 1832 and existed until
mid-1834.

124. A detailed criticism of the Lassallean slogan of "full" or
unlimited "proceeds of labour" is given in Section 1 of Marx's _Critique
of the Gotha Programme_.

125. In the original _"Zarücker"_ — from the German _zurück_ (_zarück_ —
in Berlin dialect), meaning "retrograde person", "reactionary"
("Rückschrittler", "Reaktionär"). See A. Glassbrenner, _Herr Buffe_, _in
der Zarück-Gesellschaft_ in: _Berlin wie es ist und — trinkt_, Leipzig,
1848, pp. 14-15.

126. An expression from the resolution written by Prussian King
Frederick II on July 22, 1740 in reply to an inquiry from Minister von
Brand and President of the Consistory Reichenbach as to whether Catholic
schools might be permitted in a Protestant Prussian state.

127. _May laws_ — four laws on creed adopted on Bismarck's initiative in
May 1873. These laws established rigid state control over the Catholic
Church and were the culmination of Bismarck's so-called drive for
culture from 1872 to 1875, which was directed against the Catholic
clergy as the mainstay of the "Centre" party, representing the interests
of the separatists in South and South-western Germany. Police
persecution met with desperate resistance by Catholics and brought them
the halo of martyrdom. From the late 1870s, in order to unite all the
reactionary forces against the working-class movement, Bismarck's
government was compelled first to relax and then to repeal almost all
the anti-Catholic laws.

128. The _Magic Flute_ — a Mozart opera with a libretto by Emanuel
Schikaneder. Composed and performed in 1791, it mirrored Masonic ideas;
both the author of the libretto and Mozart himself having been Masons.

129. _Referendary_ — Germany a junior official, chiefly a lawyer trained
at court or in a state office.

------------------------------------------------------------------------



ENGELS' NOTES


*1. It is much easier, along with the unthinking mob _à la_ Karl Vogt,
to assail the old philosophy of nature than to appreciate its historical
significance. It contains a great deal of nonsense and fantasy but not
more than the unphilosophical theories of the empirical natural
scientists contemporary with that philosophy, and that there was also in
it much that was sensible and rational began to be perceived after the
theory of evolution became widespread. Haeckel was therefore fully
justified in recognising the merits of Treviranus and Oken. In his
primordial slime and primordial vesicle Oken put forward as a biological
postulate what was in fact subsequently discovered as protoplasm and
cell. As far as Hegel is specifically concerned, he is in many respects
head and shoulders above his empiricist contemporaries, who thought that
they had explained all unexplained phenomena when they had endowed them
with some force or power — the force of gravity, the power of buoyancy,
the power of electrical contact, etc. — or where this would not do, with
some unknown substance: the substance of light, of heat, of electricity,
etc. The imaginary substances have now been pretty well discarded, but
the power humbug against which Hegel fought still pops up gaily, for
example, as late as 1869 in Helmholtz's Innsbruck lecture (Helmholtz,
_Populäre Vorlesungen_, Issue II, 1871, p. 190). In contrast to the
deification of Newton which was handed down from the French of the
eighteenth century, and the English heaping of honours and wealth on
Newton, Hegel brought out the fact that Kepler, whom Germany allowed to
starve, was the real founder of the modern mechanics of the celestial
bodies, and that the Newtonian law of gravitation was already contained
in all three of Kepler's laws, in the third law even explicitly. What
Hegel proves by a few simple equations in his _Naturphilosophie_, _§_
270 and Addenda (Hegel's _Werke_, 1842, Vol. 7, pp. 98 and 113 to 115),
appears again as the outcome of the most recent mathematical mechanics
in Gustav Kirchhoff's _Vorlesungen uber mathematische Physik_, 2nd ea.,
Leipzig, 1877, p. 10 and in essentially the same simple mathematical
form as had first been developed by Hegel. The natural philosophers
stand in the same relation to consciously dialectical natural science as
the utopians to modern communism.

*2. Since I wrote the above it would seem already to have been
confirmed. According to the latest researches carried out with more
exact apparatus by Mendeleyev and Boguski, all true gases show a
variable relation between pressure and volume; the coefficient of
expansion for hydrogen, at all the pressures so far applied, has been
positive (that is, the diminution of volume was slower than the increase
of pressure); in the case of atmospheric air and the other gases
examined there is for each a zero point of pressure, so that with
pressure below this point the coefficient is positive, and with pressure
above this point their coefficient is negative. So Boyle's law, which
has always hitherto been usable for practical purposes, will have to be
supplemented by a whole series of special laws. (We also know now — in
1885 — that there are no "true" gases at all. They have all been reduced
to a liquid form.) [46]

*3. This derivation of the modern ideas of equality from the economic
conditions of bourgeois society was first demonstrated by Marx in
_Capital_.

*4. This is already perfectly well known to the Prussian General Staff.
"The _basis_ of warfare is primarily the _economic_ way of life of the
peoples in general" said herrn Max Jahns, a captain of the General
Staff, in a scientific lecture (_Kölnische Zeitung_, April 20, 1876, p
3)

*5. The perfecting of the latest product of modern industry for use in
naval warfare, the self-propelled torpedo, seems likely to bring this to
pass; it would mean that the smallest torpedo boat would be superior to
the most powerful armoured warship. (It should be borne in mind that the
above was written in 1878 [81].)

*6. And not even this. Rodbertus says (_Sociale Briefe_ Letter 2, p.
59): "Rent according to this" (his) "theory, is all income obtained
without personal labour, solely _on the ground of possession_."

*7. Cf. _Philosophy_ I. [100]

*8. It is hardly necessary in this connection to point out that, even if
the _form_ of appropriation remains the same, the _character_ of the
appropriation is just as much revolutionised as production is by the
changes described above. It is, of course, a very different matter
whether I appropriate to myself my own product or that of another. Note
in passing that wage-labour, which contains the whole capitalistic mode
of production in embryo, is very ancient; in a sporadic, scattered form
it existed for centuries alongside slave-labour. But the embryo could
duly develop into the capitalistic mode of production only when the
necessary historical preconditions had been furnished.

*9. _The Condition of the Working-Class in England_, p. 109.

*10. I say "have to". For only when the means of production and
distribution have _actually_ outgrown the form of management by
joint-stock companies, and when, therefore, the taking them over by the
state has become _economically_ inevitable, only then — even if it is
the state of today that effects this — is there an economic advance, the
attainment of another step preliminary to the taking over of all
productive forces by society itself. But of late, since Bismarck went in
for state-ownership of industrial establishments, a kind of spurious
socialism has arisen, degenerating, now and again, into something of
flunkeyism, that without more ado declares _all_ state ownership, even
of the Bismarckian sort, to be socialistic. Certainly, if the taking
over by the state of the tobacco industry is socialistic, then Napoleon
and Metternich must be numbered among the founders of socialism. If the
Belgian state, for quite ordinary political and financial reasons,
itself constructed its chief railway lines; if Bismarck, not under any
economic compulsion, took over for the state the chief Prussian lines,
simply to be the better able to have them in hand in case of war, to
bring up the railway employees as voting cattle for the government, and
especially to create for himself a new source of income independent of
parliamentary votes — this was, in no sense, a socialistic measure,
directly or indirectly, consciously or unconsciously. Otherwise, the
Royal Maritime Company, [116] the Royal porcelain manufacture, and even
the regimental tailor of the army would also be socialistic
institutions.

*11. A few figures may serve to give an approximate idea of the enormous
expansive force of the modern means of production, even under capitalist
pressure. According to Mr. Giffen, [118] the total wealth of Great
Britain and Ireland amounted, in round numbers, in

1814 to £2,200,000,000 = 44 mld marks
1865 to £6,100,000,000 = 122 mld marks
1875 to £8,500,000,000 = 170 mld marks.

As an instance of the squandering of means of production and of products
during a crisis, the total loss in the _German iron industry_ alone, in
the recent crisis {of 1873-78} was given at the second German Industrial
Congress (Berlin, February 21, 1878) as 455,000,000 marks.

*12. The "under-consumption" explanation of crises originated with
Sismondi, and in his exposition it still had a certain meaning.
Rodbertus took it from Sismondi, and Herr Dühring has in turn copied it,
in his usual vulgarising fashion, from Rodbertus.

*13. The TRUCK SYSTEM in England, also well known in Germany, is that
system under which the manufacturers themselves run shops and compel
their workers to buy their goods there.

*14. It may be noted in passing that the part played by labour-notes in
Owen's communist society is completely unknown to Herr Dühring. He knows
these notes — from Sargant — only in so far as they figure in the labour
exchange bazaars [123] which of course were failures, inasmuch as they
were attempts by means of the direct exchange of labour to pass from
existing society into communist society.

*15. As long ago as 1844 I stated that the above-mentioned balancing of
useful effects and expenditure of labour on making decisions concerning
production was all that would be left, in a communist society, of the
politico-economic concept of value. (_Deutsch-Französische Jahrbücher_,
p. 95) The scientific justification for this statement, however, as can
be seen, was made possible only by Marx's _Capital_.

*16. This twofold character assumed later on by the divinities was one
of the causes of the subsequently widespread confusion of mythologies —
a cause which comparative mythology has overlooked, as it pays attention
exclusively to their character as reflections of the forces of nature.
Thus in some Germanic tribes the war-god is called Tyr (Old Nordic) or
Zio (Old High German) and so corresponds to the Greek Zeus, Latin
Jupiter for Diespiter; in other Germanic tribes, Er, Eor, corresponds
therefore to the Greek Ares, Latin Mars.

Frederick Engels “Anti-Dühring” 1877

From the Preparatory Notes

------------------------------------------------------------------------

First published: in the original German _Marx-Engels Archiv, Zeitschrift
des Marx-Engels Instituts in Moskau_, Band 2, Frankfurt a. M. 1927;
Source: _Marx and Engels on Ireland_, Progress Publishers, Moscow 1971;
Transcribed: by Andy Blunden.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

When the Indo-Germanic people immigrated into Europe they ousted the
original inhabitants by _force_ and tilled the land which they held as
communal property. The latter can be shown to have existed historically
among Celts, Germans and Slavs, and it is still in existence — even in
the form of direct bondage (Russia) or indirect bondage (Ireland) among
Slavs, Germans and even Celts [_rundale_]. After the Lapps and Basques
were driven out force was no longer used. Equality, or alternatively,
voluntarily conceded preferential treatment obtained within the
community. Where communal ownership gave rise to private ownership of
land by individual peasants, the division among the members of the
community took place purely spontaneously up to the sixteenth century;
it was mostly a very gradual process and remnants of communal property
generally continued to exist. There was no question of using _force,_
force was employed only against the remnants of communal property (in
England in the eighteenth and nineteenth centuries, in Germany chiefly
in the nineteenth century). Ireland is a special case.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Anti-Dühring Engels 1877

On Thomas More

Abstract

------------------------------------------------------------------------

From: Frederick Engels, Preparatory Writings for _Anti-Dühring_;
Source: _Marx Engels On Literature and Art_, Moscow 1976;
Transcribed: by Andy Blunden.

------------------------------------------------------------------------

Hitherto, force — from now on, sociality. A pure pious wish, the demand
for “Justice.” But Th. More made this demand 360 years ago, and it has
yet to be fulfilled.

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------
